


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















Business Invoice Factoring -

























 





















Factor Your Accounts Receivable in 24 Hours. Don't let outstanding receivables slow your business’s growth. Factor your receivables with BlueVine and get cash now. 





Desired Credit Line






Desired Financing Type



















Get started











How it works
Pricing






Trustpilot




















Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software












How Invoice Factoring Works with BlueVine






























 















Toggle navigation






Apply NowSign In(888) 216-9619
Line of Credit
Invoice Factoring
Why BlueVine
About Us

Overview
Team
In The News


(888) 216-9619Sign In







			How It Works		






see how blueVine works
Click to watch our short video tour



Fast Funding. Hassle Free.

Open a free account in under two minutes
Applying is free, and takes minutes. The application is completely
online and paperless. There are no long-term contracts or termination fees.
Fund one or more invoices with a click of a button
You decide which invoices from what customers to submit, and only pay for what you use,
so you have complete control over your funding needs.
Get a response within 24 hours for your first advance
Once approved your credit line will be set, and you can use it as needed.
Subsequent funding requests can be approved in as fast as an hour.
Update your customer with your BlueVine Account
You are assigned a PO Box, where you can accept checks, and a bank account where
you can accept electronic payments, both in your business name.
Receive the funds directly to your bank account
Choose ACH as your payment option for 1-2 day delivery or choose wire for same
day availability. Use the funds to run, manage & grow your business!
 



Free Up Your Cash Today
Apply Now


BlueVine works with the most  popular accounting software






Don’t use accounting software, yet? Not a problem! Questions? Call us at (888) 216-9619 or view our FAQ



 













Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software












BlueVine FlexCredit - Business Line of Credit






























 















Toggle navigation






Apply NowSign In(888) 216-9619
Line of Credit
Invoice Factoring
Why BlueVine
About Us

Overview
Team
In The News


(888) 216-9619Sign In







			Line of Credit
					







A fast and flexible business line of credit

Get the security of a true revolving line of credit.  Draw whenever you want, pay only for what you use.


Sign up for free 







Already have an account? Login







Fast cash, always there for you.

Get approved in 24 hours


Draw funds whenever you need


Available credit replenishes as you repay








Draw funds with a click of a button

Access your online dashboard from any computer or mobile device. Draw funds anytime in minutes. Repay in fixed weekly installments over 6 months. 









Our clients give us 5 stars
 Trustpilot 







Transparent fees. Interest as low as 6.9%
Transparent fees.Interest as low as 6.9%
No maintenance fees
No unused credit fees
No prepayment penalties


Sample pricing for $10,000 draw repaid after...




4 weeks
6 months



Total repayment
$10,227
$10,830








Draw from your credit line today


Sign up for free 

Want to speak with a financing advisor?




 













Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software












Clear, Transparent, Pricing.




























 















Toggle navigation






Apply NowSign In(888) 216-9619
Line of Credit
Invoice Factoring
Why BlueVine
About Us

Overview
Team
In The News


(888) 216-9619Sign In







			Pricing		




Full Flexibility. No Strings.
 No origination fees No termination fees No monthly minimums No long-term contracts No daily/weekly payments No pre-payment penalties




Simple and Transparent Pricing
We give you 85% of the invoice amount upfront and the rest, minus our fees, when your client pays. Our standard rate is 1% per week with a minimum of 3 weeks.  There are no hidden fees, no surprises and absolutely no nickel and diming.  









							Invoice Amount						

$3000





							Invoice Due Within						

3 Weeks 










$2550

								Advance Payment? 


$360

								+ Rebate? 


$2910

								Total Payment							

$90
								Fees
							









Reduced Rates
You may qualify for a 20-30% discount on the standard rate as you build history with us. 
Invoicing over $30,000 per month? Contact us and get a customized quote immediately.
Apply Now




 














Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software












Contact Us




























 















Toggle navigation






Apply NowSign In(888) 216-9619
Line of Credit
Invoice Factoring
Why BlueVine
About Us

Overview
Team
In The News


(888) 216-9619Sign In






			Contact Us		







 

Call us
(888) 216-9619
Office Hours
Monday through Friday
7am to 4:30pm Pacific Time
 




 














Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software










Business Factors & Finance






























 
























Close















Call Us Anytime: 800-672-3844


Se habla español









Reliable cash flow starts here. 


Say goodbye to the hassle of NET 30/60/90 and get paid faster.  Give your cash flow the boost it needs with secure and reliable invoice factoring from California Factors.  Start with a no-risk, no-obligation invoice factoring assessment.


California Factoring Experts


Watch "How It Works" Video


*We NEVER sell your information





Free Factoring Assessment











First Name





Last Name





Business Email





Business Phone





Outstanding Invoices: 

Under $10k



$10k - $25k



$25k - $100k



Over $100k
















GET STARTED



































Cash In 24-48 Hours Upon Approval









Ratings & Reviews


We've been helping fund businesses for decades. Check out what our customers are saying:




Trustpilot











Since 1999, California Factors (a division of Business Factors & Finance) has been the premier commercial financing services provider for California businesses, offering both traditional and alternative financial solutions to businesses of a range of sizes and industries. Supported by more than 40 years of industry expertise, Business Factors & Finance provides financial services for business valued at $900 million per year. As a result of its robust credit line, businesses large and small can rely on the strength of California Factors when they need to secure cash to support their growing enterprise. 


Trusted Since 1999












Submit Invoices


Get paid immediately on new invoices & use that cash flow to grow.


Receive Immediate Cash





Grow


Send your invoices directly to us.


Receive up to 96% of the invoice value wired directly to your bank account.


2





3


1


How It Works









Companies We've Factored








































Copyright 2017 California Factors |  10430-1 Pioneer Blvd Santa Fe Springs, CA 90670 


Privacy Policy | About Us | Contact Us




















Business Factors & Finance






























 
























Close















Call Us Anytime: 800-672-3844


Se habla español









Reliable cash flow starts here. 


Say goodbye to the hassle of NET 30/60/90 and get paid faster.  Give your cash flow the boost it needs with secure and reliable invoice factoring from California Factors.  Start with a no-risk, no-obligation invoice factoring assessment.


California Factoring Experts


Watch "How It Works" Video


We are committed to your privacy





Free Factoring Assessment











First Name





Last Name





Business Email





Business Phone





Outstanding Invoices



-- Select one --
Under $10K
$10K - $25K
$25K - $100K
Over $100K


















GET STARTED















































Ratings & Reviews


We've been helping fund businesses for decades. Check out what our customers are saying:




Trustpilot











Since 1999, California Factors (a division of Business Factors & Finance) has been the premier commercial financing services provider for California businesses, offering both traditional and alternative financial solutions to businesses of a range of sizes and industries. Supported by more than 40 years of industry expertise, Business Factors & Finance provides financial services for business valued at $900 million per year. As a result of its robust credit line, businesses large and small can rely on the strength of California Factors when they need to secure cash to support their growing enterprise.


Trusted Since 1999












Submit Invoices


Get paid immediately on new invoices & use that cash flow to grow.


Receive Immediate Cash





Grow


Send your invoices directly to us.


Receive up to 96% of the invoice value wired directly to your bank account.


2





3


1


How It Works









Companies We've Factored








































Copyright 2017 California Factors |  10430-1 Pioneer Blvd Santa Fe Springs, CA 90670 


Privacy Policy | About Us | Contact Us


















 AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING CORP II (Form: 8-K, Received: 06/25/2001 16:10:17) 












SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION




Washington, D.C. 20549








FORM 8-K




CURRENT REPORT

PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE

SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934




Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) June 12, 2001







AMERICAN EXPRESS                    AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES
 CENTURION BANK                       FINANCING CORPORATION II









(as Originators of the American Express Credit Account Master Trust)


(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)


on behalf of

American Express Credit Account Master Trust









      Utah           11-2869526      333-91473          Delaware         13-3854638       333-91473
(State or Other   (I.R.S. Employer  (Commission     (State or Other   (I.R.S. Employer   (Commission
Jurisdiction of    Identification   File Number)    Jurisdiction of    Identification    File Number)
Incorporation or       Number)                      Incorporation or       Number)
 Organization)                                       Organization)














6985 Union Park Center                      World Financial Center
 Midvale, Utah 84047                           200 Vesey Street
   (801) 565-5000                          New York, New York 10285
                                                (212) 640-4473








(Address, Including Zip Code, and Telephone Number,

Including Area Code, of each Registrant's Principal Executive Offices)








             N/A                                           N/A
(Former Name or Former Address,             (Former Name or Former Address,
 if Changed Since Last Report)               if Changed Since Last Report)












INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT




Item 1.           Not Applicable.




Item 2.           Not Applicable.




Item 3.           Not Applicable.




Item 4.           Not Applicable.




Item 5.           On June 12, 2001, American Express Credit Account Master


Trust supplemented its Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated
as of May 16, 1996, with its Series 2001-6 Supplement, dated
as of June 12, 2001. The Series Supplement is attached hereto
as Exhibit 5.1.


On June 12, 2001, American Express Credit Account Master Trust
issued its $577,500,000 Class A Floating Rate Asset Backed
Certificates, Series 2001-6 and $56,000,000 Class B Floating
Rate Asset Backed Certificates, Series 2001-6 (the "Series
2001-6 Certificates").



Item 6.           Not Applicable.






Item 7.           Exhibits.



The following are filed as Exhibits to this Report under Exhibit 5.








Exhibit 5.1       Series 2001-6 Supplement, dated as of June 12,
                  2001, supplementing the Pooling and Servicing
                  Agreement, dated as of May 16, 1996.









Item 8.           Not Applicable.




Item 9.           Not Applicable.










SIGNATURES



Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on
their behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


American Express Centurion Bank,
on behalf of the American Express
Credit Account Master Trust






By:       /s/ Maureen A. Ryan
    ---------------------------------
Name:     Maureen A. Ryan
Title:    Assistant Treasurer











SIGNATURES



Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on
their behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


American Express Receivables Financing
Corporation II
on behalf of the American Express Credit
Account Master Trust






By:       /s/ Leslie R. Scharfstein
     -----------------------------------
Name:     Leslie R. Scharfstein
Title:    President














EXHIBIT INDEX











Exhibit                    Description
-------                    -----------

Exhibit 5.1                Series 2001-6 Supplement, dated as of June 12, 2001,
                           supplementing the Pooling and Servicing Agreement,
                           dated as of May 16, 1996.

















EXHIBIT 5.1







EXECUTION COPY






SERIES 2001-6 SUPPLEMENT

Dated as of June 12, 2001



to



POOLING AND SERVICING AGREEMENT

Dated as of May 16, 1996



$700,000,000





AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST




Series 2001-6





among



AMERICAN EXPRESS CENTURION BANK

AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING CORPORATION II

as Transferors




AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED SERVICES COMPANY, INC.

as Servicer



And



THE BANK OF NEW YORK


as Trustee



on behalf of the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders








TABLE OF CONTENTS







                                                                                                          Page

ARTICLE I       Creation of the Series 2001-6 Certificates.................................................1

         Section 1.01.  Designation........................................................................1

ARTICLE II      Definitions................................................................................2

         Section 2.01.  Definitions........................................................................2

ARTICLE III     Servicing Fee.............................................................................13

         Section 3.01.  Servicing Compensation............................................................13

ARTICLE IV      Rights of Series 2001-6 Certificateholders and
                Allocation and Application of Collections.................................................14

         Section 4.01.  Collections and Allocations.......................................................14

         Section 4.02.  Determination of Monthly Interest.................................................16

         Section 4.03.  Principal Funding Account; Controlled Accumulation Period.........................18

         Section 4.04.  Required Amount...................................................................19

         Section 4.05.  Application of Class A Available Funds, Class B Available
                        Funds, Collateral Available Funds and Available Principal Collections.............20

         Section 4.06.  Defaulted Amounts; Investor Charge-Offs...........................................22

         Section 4.07.  Excess Spread; Excess Finance Charge Collections..................................23

         Section 4.08.  Reallocated Principal Collections.................................................24

         Section 4.09.  Excess Finance Charge Collections.................................................25

         Section 4.10.  Reallocated Investor Finance Charge Collections...................................25

         Section 4.11.  Shared Principal Collections......................................................26

         Section 4.12.  Reserve Account...................................................................26

         Section 4.13.  Investment Instructions...........................................................28

         Section 4.14.  Determination of LIBOR............................................................28

ARTICLE V       Distributions and Reports to Series 2001-6 Certificateholders.............................29

         Section 5.01.  Distributions.....................................................................29

         Section 5.02.  Reports and Statements to Series 2001-6 Certificateholders........................30

ARTICLE VI      Pay-Out Events............................................................................30

         Section 6.01.  Pay-Out Events....................................................................30

ARTICLE VII     Optional Repurchase; Series Termination...................................................31

         Section 7.01.  Optional Repurchase...............................................................31

         Section 7.02.  Series Termination................................................................32







-i-











                                                                                                          Page

ARTICLE VIII    Final Distributions.......................................................................32

         Section 8.01.  Sale of Receivables or Certificateholders' Interest pursuant to Section
                        2.06 or 10.01 of the Agreement and Section 7.01 or 7.02 of this Supplement........32

         Section 8.02.  Distribution of Proceeds of Sale, Disposition or Liquidation of the
                        Receivables pursuant to Section 9.01 of the Agreement.............................34

ARTICLE IX      Miscellaneous Provisions..................................................................35

         Section 9.01.  Ratification of Agreement.........................................................35

         Section 9.02.  Counterparts......................................................................35

         Section 9.03.  Governing Law.....................................................................35

         Section 9.04.  Certain Accounting Related Amendments.............................................35








-ii-





SERIES 2001-6 SUPPLEMENT, dated as of June 12, 2001 (the
"Supplement"), among AMERICAN EXPRESS CENTURION BANK, a
Utah-chartered industrial loan company, and AMERICAN EXPRESS
RECEIVABLES FINANCING CORPORATION II, a Delaware corporation,
as Transferors, AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED SERVICES
COMPANY, INC., a New York corporation, as Servicer, and THE
BANK OF NEW YORK, a banking corporation organized and existing
under the laws of the State of New York, not in its individual
capacity, but solely as Trustee.


Pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as of
May 16, 1996 (as amended and supplemented, the "Agreement"), among the
Transferors, the Servicer and the Trustee, the Transferors have created the
AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST (the "Trust"). Section 6.03 of the
Agreement provides that the Transferors may from time to time direct the Trustee
to authenticate one or more new Series of Investor Certificates representing
fractional undivided interests in the Trust. The Principal Terms of any new
Series are to be set forth in a Supplement to the Agreement.


Pursuant to this Supplement, the Transferors and the Trustee
shall create a new Series of Investor Certificates and specify the Principal
Terms thereof.



ARTICLE I




Creation of the Series 2001-6 Certificates



Section 1.01. Designation.


(a) There is hereby created a Series of Investor Certificates
to be issued pursuant to the Agreement and this Supplement to be known as
"American Express Credit Account Master Trust, Series 2001-6." The Series 2001-6
Certificates shall be issued in two Classes, the first of which shall be known
as the "Class A Series 2001-6 Floating Rate Asset Backed Certificates" and the
second of which shall be known as the "Class B Series 2001-6 Floating Rate Asset
Backed Certificates." In addition, there is hereby created a third Class of
uncertificated interests in the Trust which shall be known as the "Collateral
Interest, Series 2001-6" and which shall be deemed to be "Investor Certificates"
for all purposes under the Agreement and this Supplement other than for purposes
of the definition of the term "Tax Opinion" in Section 1.01 of the Agreement.
The Collateral Interest shall be considered a Class of Series 2001-6 for all
purposes of the Agreement and this Supplement, including for purposes of voting
concerning the liquidation of the Trust pursuant to Section 9.01 of the
Agreement. The Collateral Interest Holder shall be deemed to be the Series
Enhancer for all purposes under the Agreement and this Supplement.


(b) Series 2001-6 shall be included in Group II and shall be a
Principal Sharing Series. Series 2001-6 shall be an Excess Allocation Series.
Series 2001-6 shall not be subordinated to any other Series. Notwithstanding any
provision in the Agreement or in this Supplement to the contrary, the first
Distribution Date with respect to Series 2001-6 shall be the July 2001
Distribution Date and the first Monthly Period shall begin on and include the
Closing Date and end on and include June 23, 2001.


(c) Except as expressly provided herein, the provisions of
Article VI and Article XII of the Agreement relating to the registration,
authentication, delivery, presentation, cancellation and surrender of Registered
Certificates shall not be applicable to the Collateral Interest.


1






ARTICLE II




Definitions



Section 2.01. Definitions.


(a) Whenever used in this Supplement, the following words and
phrases shall have the following meanings, and the definitions of such terms are
applicable to the singular as well as the plural forms of such terms and the
masculine as well as the feminine and neuter genders of such terms.


"Additional Interest" means, with respect to any Distribution
Date, the Class A Additional Interest, the Class B Additional Interest and the
Collateral Additional Interest for such Distribution Date.


"Adjusted Invested Amount" shall mean, with respect to any
date of determination, an amount equal to the Invested Amount less the Principal
Funding Account Balance on such date of determination.


"Available Principal Collections" shall mean, with respect to
any Monthly Period, an amount equal to the sum of (a) (i) an amount equal to the
Principal Allocation Percentage of Series 2001-6 Allocable Principal Collections
received during such Monthly Period minus (ii) the amount of Reallocated
Principal Collections with respect to such Monthly Period which pursuant to

Section 4.08 are required to fund the Required Amount for the related
Distribution Date, (b) any Shared Principal Collections with respect to other
Series that are allocated to Series 2001-6 in accordance with Section 4.04 of
the Agreement and Section 4.11 of this Supplement, and (c) any other amounts
which pursuant to Section 4.05 or 4.07 of this Supplement are to be treated as
Available Principal Collections with respect to the related Distribution Date.


"Available Reserve Account Amount" shall mean, with respect to
any Distribution Date, the lesser of (a) the amount on deposit in the Reserve
Account on such date (before giving effect to any deposit to be made to the
Reserve Account on such date) and (b) the Required Reserve Account Amount.


"Base Rate" shall mean, with respect to any Monthly Period,
the annualized percentage equivalent of a fraction, the numerator of which is
equal to the sum of the Class A Monthly Interest, the Class B Monthly Interest
(calculated as if the Class B Invested Amount equals the outstanding principal
balance of the Class B Certificates), the Collateral Monthly Interest and the
Monthly Servicing Fee with respect to the related Distribution Date and the
denominator of which is the Invested Amount as of the last day of the preceding
Monthly Period.


"Class A Additional Interest" shall have the meaning specified
in subsection 4.02(a).


"Class A Adjusted Invested Amount" shall mean, with respect to
any date of determination, an amount equal to the Class A Invested Amount less
the Principal Funding Account Balance (but not in excess of the Class A Invested
Amount) on such date.


"Class A Available Funds" shall mean, with respect to any
Monthly Period, an amount equal to the sum of (a) if such Monthly Period relates
to a Distribution Date with respect to the Controlled Accumulation Period, the
Class A Floating Percentage of Principal Funding Account Investment Proceeds, if
any, with respect to such Distribution Date, (b) the Class A Floating Percentage
of the Reallocated Investor Finance Charge Collections and (c) the amount of
funds, if any, to be withdrawn from the Reserve Account which, pursuant to
subsection 4.12(d), are required to be included in Class A Available Funds with
respect to such Distribution Date.


2





"Class A Certificate Rate" shall mean, for any Interest
Accrual Period with respect to the Class A Certificates, a per annum rate equal
to LIBOR plus 0.12%.


"Class A Certificateholder" shall mean the Person in whose
name a Class A Certificate is registered in the Certificate Register.


"Class A Certificates" shall mean any one of the Certificates
executed by the Transferors and authenticated by or on behalf of the Trustee,
substantially in the form of Exhibit A-l.


"Class A Floating Percentage" shall mean, with respect to any
Monthly Period, the percentage equivalent (which percentage shall never exceed
100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which is equal to the Class A Adjusted
Invested Amount as of the close of business on the last day of the preceding
Monthly Period and the denominator of which is equal to the Adjusted Invested
Amount as of such day; provided, however, that with respect to the first Monthly
Period, the Class A Floating Percentage shall mean the percentage equivalent of
a fraction, the numerator of which is the Class A Initial Invested Amount and
the denominator of which is the Initial Invested Amount.


"Class A Initial Invested Amount" shall mean $577,500,000.


"Class A Interest Shortfall" shall have the meaning specified
in subsection 4.02(a).


"Class A Invested Amount" shall mean, on any date of
determination, an amount equal to (a) the Class A Initial Invested Amount, minus

(b) the aggregate amount of principal payments made to the Class A
Certificateholders on or prior to such date, minus (c) the excess, if any, of

(i) the aggregate amount of Class A Investor Charge-Offs for all prior
Distribution Dates over (ii) Class A Investor Charge-Offs reimbursed pursuant to
subsection 4.07(b) prior to such date.


"Class A Investor Charge-Offs" shall have the meaning
specified in subsection 4.06(a).


"Class A Investor Default Amount" shall mean, with respect to
each Distribution Date, an amount equal to the product of (i) the Investor
Default Amount for the related Monthly Period and (ii) the Class A Floating
Percentage for such Monthly Period.


"Class A Monthly Interest" shall have the meaning specified in
subsection 4.02(a).


"Class A Principal Percentage" shall mean, with respect to any
Monthly Period (i) during the Revolving Period, the percentage equivalent (which
percentage shall never exceed 100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which is the
Class A Invested Amount as of the last day of the immediately preceding Monthly
Period and the denominator of which is the Invested Amount as of such day and

(ii) during the Controlled Accumulation Period, the Early Amortization Period or
any Partial Amortization Period, the percentage equivalent (which percentage
shall never exceed 100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which is the Class A
Invested Amount as of the close of business on the date on which the Revolving
Period shall have terminated and the denominator of which is the Invested Amount
as of the close of business on the date on which the Revolving Period shall have
terminated; provided, however, that with respect to the first Monthly Period,
the Class A Principal Percentage shall mean the percentage equivalent of a
fraction, the numerator of which is the Class A Initial Invested Amount and
denominator of which is the Initial Invested Amount.


"Class A Required Amount" shall have the meaning specified in
subsection 4.04(a).


"Class A Servicing Fee" shall have the meaning specified in

Section 3.01.


"Class B Additional Interest" shall have the meaning specified
in subsection 4.02(b).


3





"Class B Adjusted Invested Amount" shall mean an amount equal
to the Class B Invested Amount less the positive difference, if any, between the
Principal Funding Account Balance and the Class A Invested Amount on such date.


"Class B Available Funds" shall mean, with respect to any
Monthly Period, an amount equal to the sum of (a) Class B Floating Percentage of
the Reallocated Investor Finance Charge Collections and (b) if such Monthly
Period relates to a Distribution Date with respect to the Controlled
Accumulation Period, the Class B Floating Percentage of the Principal Funding
Account Investment Proceeds, if any, with respect to such Distribution Date.


"Class B Certificate Rate" shall mean, for any Interest
Accrual Period with respect to the Class B Certificates, a per annum rate equal
to LIBOR plus 0.35%.


"Class B Certificateholder" shall mean the Person in whose
name a Class B Certificate is registered in the Certificate Register.


"Class B Certificates" shall mean any one of the Certificates
executed by the Transferors and authenticated by or on behalf of the Trustee,
substantially in the form of Exhibit A-2.


"Class B Floating Percentage" shall mean, with respect to any
Monthly Period, the percentage equivalent (which percentage shall never exceed
100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which is equal to the Class B Adjusted
Invested Amount as of the close of business on the last day of the preceding
Monthly Period and the denominator of which is equal to the Adjusted Invested
Amount as of the close of business on such day; provided, however, that with
respect to the first Monthly Period, the Class B Floating Percentage shall mean
the percentage equivalent of a fraction, the numerator of which is the Class B
Initial Invested Amount and the denominator of which is the Initial Invested
Amount.


"Class B Initial Invested Amount" shall mean $56,000,000.


"Class B Interest Shortfall" shall have the meaning specified
in subsection 4.02(b).


"Class B Invested Amount" shall mean, on any date of
determination, an amount equal to (a) the Class B Initial Invested Amount, minus

(b) the aggregate amount of principal payments made to the Class B
Certificateholders prior to such date, minus (c) the aggregate amount of Class B
Investor Charge-Offs for all prior Distribution Dates, minus (d) the amount of
Reallocated Principal Collections allocated on all prior Distribution Dates
pursuant to subsection 4.08(a) (excluding any Reallocated Principal Collections
that have resulted in a reduction in the Collateral Invested Amount pursuant to

Section 4.08), minus (e) an amount equal to the amount by which the Class B
Invested Amount has been reduced on all prior Distribution Dates pursuant to
subsection 4.06(a) and plus (f) the amount of Excess Spread and Excess Finance
Charge Collections allocated and available on all prior Distribution Dates
pursuant to subsection 4.07(e) for the purpose of reimbursing amounts deducted
pursuant to the foregoing clauses (c), (d) and (e); provided, however, that the
Class B Invested Amount may not be reduced below zero.


"Class B Investor Charge-Offs" shall have the meaning
specified in subsection 4.06(b).


"Class B Investor Default Amount" shall mean, with respect to
each Distribution Date, an amount equal to the product of (i) the Investor
Default Amount for the related Monthly Period and (ii) the Class B Floating
Percentage for such Monthly Period.


"Class B Monthly Interest" shall have the meaning specified in
subsection 4.02(b).


4





"Class B Principal Percentage" shall mean, with respect to any
Monthly Period, (i) during the Revolving Period, the percentage equivalent
(which percentage shall never exceed 100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which
is the Class B Invested Amount as of the last day of the immediately preceding
Monthly Period and the denominator of which is the Invested Amount as of such
day and (ii) during the Controlled Accumulation Period, the Early Amortization
Period or any Partial Amortization Period, the percentage equivalent (which
percentage shall never exceed 100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which is the
Class B Invested Amount as of the close of business on the date on which the
Revolving Period shall have terminated and the denominator of which is the
Invested Amount as of the close of business on the date on which the Revolving
Period shall have terminated; provided, however, that with respect to the first
Monthly Period, the Class B Principal Percentage shall mean the percentage
equivalent of a fraction, the numerator of which is the Class B Initial Invested
Amount and the denominator of which is the Initial Invested Amount.


"Class B Required Amount" shall have the meaning set forth in
subsection 4.04(b).


"Class B Servicing Fee" shall have the meaning specified in

Section 3.01.


"Closing Date" shall mean June 12, 2001; provided that, for
purposes of determining the date on which the first Monthly Period begins, the
Closing Date shall be deemed to be the close of business on the last day of the
seventh billing cycle applicable to the Accounts ending in April 2001.


"Collateral Additional Interest" shall have the meaning
specified in subsection 4.02(c).


"Collateral Available Funds" shall mean with respect to any
Distribution Date, the Collateral Floating Percentage of Reallocated Investor
Finance Charge Collections with respect to the preceding Monthly Period.


"Collateral Charge-Offs" shall have the meaning specified in
subsection 4.06(c).


"Collateral Default Amount" shall mean, with respect to any
Distribution Date, the product of the Investor Default Amount for the related
Monthly Period and the Collateral Floating Percentage.


"Collateral Floating Percentage" shall mean, with respect to
any Distribution Date, the percentage equivalent (which percentage shall never
exceed 100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which is equal to the Collateral
Invested Amount as of the close of business on the last day of the preceding
Monthly Period and the denominator of which is the Adjusted Invested Amount as
of the close of business on such last day; provided, however, that with respect
to the first Monthly Period, the Collateral Floating Percentage shall mean the
percentage equivalent of a fraction, the numerator of which is the Collateral
Initial Invested Amount and the denominator of which is the Initial Invested
Amount.


"Collateral Initial Invested Amount" shall mean $66,500,000.


"Collateral Interest" shall mean a fractional undivided
interest in the Trust which shall consist of the right to receive, to the extent
necessary to make the required payments to the Collateral Interest Holder under
this Supplement, the portion of Collections allocable thereto under the
Agreement and this Supplement and funds on deposit in the Collection Account
allocable thereto pursuant to the Agreement and this Supplement.


"Collateral Interest Holder" shall mean the entity so
designated in the Loan Agreement.


"Collateral Interest Shortfall" shall have the meaning
specified in subsection 4.02(c).


5





"Collateral Invested Amount" shall mean, when used with
respect to any date, an amount equal to (a) the Collateral Initial Invested
Amount, minus (b) the aggregate amount of principal payments made to the
Collateral Interest Holder prior to such date, minus (c) the aggregate amount of
Collateral Charge-Offs for all prior Distribution Dates pursuant to subsection
4.06(c), minus (d) the aggregate amount of Reallocated Principal Collections
allocated on all prior Distribution Dates pursuant to Section 4.08 allocable to
the Collateral Invested Amount, minus (e) an amount equal to the amount by which
the Collateral Invested Amount has been reduced on all prior Distribution Dates
pursuant to subsections 4.06(a) and (b), and plus (f) the amount allocated and
available on all prior Distribution Dates pursuant to subsection 4.07(i), for
the purpose of reimbursing amounts deducted pursuant to the foregoing clauses

(c), (d) and (e); provided, however, that the Collateral Invested Amount may not
be reduced below zero.


"Collateral Monthly Interest" shall have the meaning specified
in subsection 4.02(c).


"Collateral Principal Percentage" shall mean, with respect to
any Monthly Period, (i) during the Revolving Period, the percentage equivalent
(which percentage shall never exceed 100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which
is the Collateral Invested Amount as of the last day of the immediately
preceding Monthly Period and the denominator of which is the Invested Amount as
of such day and (ii) during the Controlled Accumulation Period, the Early
Amortization Period or any Partial Amortization Period, the percentage
equivalent (which percentage shall never exceed 100%) of a fraction, the
numerator of which is the Collateral Invested Amount as of the close of business
on the date on which the Revolving Period shall have terminated and the
denominator of which is the Invested Amount as of the close of business on the
date on which the Revolving Period shall have terminated; provided, however,
that with respect to the first Monthly Period, the Collateral Principal
Percentage shall mean the percentage equivalent of a fraction, the numerator of
which is the Collateral Initial Invested Amount and the denominator of which is
the Initial Invested Amount.


"Collateral Rate" shall mean the rate specified in the Loan
Agreement.


"Collateral Servicing Fee" shall have the meaning set forth in

Section 3.01.


"Controlled Accumulation Amount" shall mean, for any
Distribution Date with respect to the Controlled Accumulation Period,
$52,791,666.67; provided, however, that, if the Controlled Accumulation Period
Length is determined to be less than 12 months, the Controlled Accumulation
Amount for each Distribution Date with respect to the Controlled Accumulation
Period will be equal to (i) the product of (x) the sum of the Class A Initial
Invested Amount and the Class B Initial Invested Amount and (y) the Controlled
Accumulation Period Factor for the related Monthly Period divided by (ii) the
Required Accumulation Factor Number.


"Controlled Accumulation Period" shall mean, unless a Pay-Out
Event shall have occurred prior thereto, the period commencing at the close of
business on the last day of the April 2005 Monthly Period or such later date as
is determined in accordance with subsection 4.03(c) and ending on the first to
occur of (a) the commencement of the Early Amortization Period, (b) the payment
in full of the Invested Amount and (c) the Series 2001-6 Termination Date.


"Controlled Accumulation Period Factor" shall mean, for each
Monthly Period, a fraction, the numerator of which is equal to the sum of the
series invested amounts as of the last day of the prior Monthly Period of all
outstanding Series, and the denominator of which is equal to the sum (without
duplication) of (a) the Series Invested Amount as of the last day of the prior
Monthly Period, (b) the series invested amounts as of the last day of the prior
Monthly Period of all outstanding Series (other than Series 2001-6) that are not
expected to be in their revolving periods, and (c) the series invested amounts
as of the last day of the prior Monthly Period of all other outstanding Series
that are not Principal Sharing Series and are in their revolving periods.


6





"Controlled Accumulation Period Length" has the meaning
specified in subsection 4.03(c).


"Controlled Deposit Amount" shall mean, for any Distribution
Date with respect to the Controlled Accumulation Period, an amount equal to the
sum of the Controlled Accumulation Amount for such Distribution Date and any
Deficit Controlled Accumulation Amount for the immediately preceding
Distribution Date.


"Covered Amount" shall mean, for any Distribution Date with
respect to the Controlled Accumulation Period or the first Special Payment Date,
if such Special Payment Date occurs prior to the date the Class A Invested
Amount is paid in full, an amount equal to the sum of (x) with respect to the
Class A Certificates, the product of (i) the Class A Certificate Rate, (ii) a
fraction, the numerator of which is the actual number of days from and including
the prior Distribution Date to but excluding the then current Distribution Date
and the denominator of which is 360 and, (iii) the Principal Funding Account
Balance, if any, as of the preceding Distribution Date that is allocable to the
principal of the Class A Certificates and (y) with respect to the Class B
Certificates, the product of (i) the Class B Certificate Rate, (ii) a fraction,
the numerator of which is the actual number of days from and including the prior
Distribution Date to but excluding the then current Distribution Date and the
denominator of which is 360 and (iii) the Principal Funding Account Balance, if
any, as of the preceding Distribution Date that is allocable to the principal of
the Class B Certificates.


"Deficit Controlled Accumulation Amount" shall mean (a) on the
first Distribution Date with respect to the Controlled Accumulation Period, the
excess, if any, of the Controlled Accumulation Amount for such Distribution Date
over the amount deposited in the Principal Funding Account on such Distribution
Date and (b) on each subsequent Distribution Date with respect to the Controlled
Accumulation Period, the excess, if any, of the Controlled Deposit Amount for
such subsequent Distribution Date over the amount deposited in the Principal
Funding Account on such subsequent Distribution Date.


"Distribution Date" shall mean July 16, 2001, and the 15th day
of each calendar month thereafter, or if such 15th day is not a Business Day,
the next succeeding Business Day.


"Early Amortization Period" shall mean the period commencing
at the close of business on the Business Day immediately preceding the day on
which a Pay-Out Event with respect to Series 2001-6 is deemed to have occurred,
and ending on the first to occur of (i) the payment in full of the Invested
Amount or (ii) the Series 2001-6 Termination Date.


"Excess Spread" shall mean, with respect to any Distribution
Date, the sum of the amounts, if any, specified pursuant to subsections
4.05(a)(iv), 4.05(b)(iii) and 4.05(c)(ii) with respect to such Distribution
Date.


"Expected Final Payment Date" shall mean the May 2006
Distribution Date.


"Finance Charge Shortfall" shall have the meaning specified in

Section 4.09.


"Floating Allocation Percentage" shall mean, with respect to
any Monthly Period, the percentage equivalent (which percentage shall never
exceed 100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which is the Adjusted Invested
Amount as of the last day of the preceding Monthly Period (or with respect to
the first Monthly Period, the Initial Invested Amount) and the denominator of
which is the product of (x) the Series 2001-6 Allocation Percentage with respect
to such Monthly Period and (y) the sum of (i) the total amount of Principal
Receivables in the Trust as of such day (or with respect to the first Monthly
Period, the total amount of Principal Receivables in the Trust on the Closing
Date) and (ii) the principal amount on deposit in the Special Funding Account as
of such last day (or with respect to the first Monthly Period,


7





as of the Closing Date); provided, however, that with respect to any Monthly
Period in which an Addition Date for an Aggregate Addition or a Removal Date
occurs the amount in (y)(i) above shall be (1) the aggregate amount of Principal
Receivables in the Trust at the end of the day on the last day of the prior
Monthly Period for the period from and including the first day of such Monthly
Period to but excluding the related Addition Date or Removal Date and (2) the
aggregate amount of Principal Receivables in the Trust at the end of the day on
the related Addition Date or Removal Date for the period from and including the
related Addition Date or Removal Date to and including the last day of such
Monthly Period.


"Group II" shall mean Series 2001-6 and each other Series
specified in the related Supplement to be included in Group II.


"Group II Investor Additional Amounts" shall mean, with
respect to any Distribution Date, the sum of (a) Series 2001-6 Additional
Amounts for such Distribution Date and (b) for all other Series included in
Group II, the sum of (i) the aggregate net amount by which the Invested Amounts
of such Series have been reduced as a result of investor charge-offs,
subordination of principal collections and funding the investor default amounts
in respect of any Class or Series Enhancement interests of such Series as of
such Distribution Date and (ii) if the applicable Supplements so provide, the
aggregate unpaid amount of interest at the applicable certificate rates that has
accrued on the amounts described in the preceding clause (i) for such
Distribution Date.


"Group II Investor Default Amount" shall mean, with respect to
any Distribution Date, the sum of (a) the Investor Default Amount for such
Distribution Date and (b) the aggregate amount of the investor default amounts
for all other Series included in Group II for such Distribution Date.


"Group II Investor Finance Charge Collections" shall mean,
with respect to any Distribution Date, the sum of (a) Investor Finance Charge
Collections for such Distribution Date and (b) the aggregate amount of the
investor finance charge collections for all other Series included in Group II
for such Distribution Date.


"Group II Investor Monthly Fees" shall mean with respect to
any Distribution Date, the sum of (a) Series 2001-6 Monthly Fees for such
Distribution Date and (b) the aggregate amount of the servicing fees, investor
fees, fees payable to any Series Enhancer and any other similar fees, which are
payable out of reallocated investor finance charge collections pursuant to the
related Supplements, for all other Series included in Group II for such
Distribution Date.


"Group II Investor Monthly Interest" shall mean, with respect
to any Distribution Date, the sum of (a) Series 2001-6 Monthly Interest for such
Distribution Date and (b) the aggregate amount of monthly interest, including
overdue monthly interest and interest on such overdue monthly interest, if such
amounts are payable out of reallocated investor finance charge collections
pursuant to the related Supplements, for all other Series included in Group II
for such Distribution Date.


"Initial Invested Amount" shall mean $700,000,000.


"Interest Accrual Period" shall mean, with respect to any
Distribution Date, the period (a) from and including the Distribution Date
immediately preceding such Distribution Date (or, in the case of the first
Distribution Date, from and including the Closing Date) and (b) to but excluding
such Distribution Date.


"Invested Amount" shall mean, as of any date of determination,
an amount equal to the sum of (a) the Class A Invested Amount as of such date,

(b) the Class B Invested Amount as of such date and (c) the Collateral Invested
Amount as of such date.


8





"Investor Charge-Offs" shall mean Class A Investor
Charge-Offs, Class B Investor Charge-Offs and Collateral Charge-Offs.


"Investor Default Amount" shall mean, with respect to any
Distribution Date, an amount equal to the product of (a) the Series 2001-6
Allocable Defaulted Amount for the related Monthly Period and (b) the Floating
Allocation Percentage for such Monthly Period.


"Investor Finance Charge Collections" shall mean with respect
to any Distribution Date, an amount equal to the product of (a) the Floating
Allocation Percentage for the related Monthly Period and (b) Series 2001-6
Allocable Finance Charge Collections deposited in the Collection Account for the
related Monthly Period.


"LIBOR" shall mean, for any Interest Accrual Period, a per
annum interest rate determined by the Trustee for such Interest Accrual Period
in accordance with the provisions of Section 4.14.


"LIBOR Determination Date" shall mean June 8, 2001 for the
period from the Closing Date to but excluding July 16, 2001, and for every other
Interest Accrual Period, the second London Business Day prior to the
commencement of such Interest Accrual Period.


"Loan Agreement" shall mean the agreement among the
Transferors, the Trustee, the Servicer and the Collateral Interest Holder, dated
as of the date hereof.


"London Business Day" shall mean any day on which dealings in
deposits in United States dollars are transacted in the London interbank market.


"Monthly Interest" means, with respect to any Distribution
Date, the Class A Monthly Interest, the Class B Monthly Interest and the
Collateral Monthly Interest for such Distribution Date.


"Monthly Servicing Fee" shall have the meaning specified in
subsection 3.01.


"Pay-Out Event" shall mean any Pay-Out Event specified in

Section 6.01.


"Principal Allocation Percentage" shall mean, with respect to
any day during a Monthly Period, the percentage equivalent (which percentage
shall never exceed 100%) of a fraction, the numerator of which is (a) during the
Revolving Period, the Series Adjusted Invested Amount for Series 2001-6 as of
the last day of the immediately preceding Monthly Period (or, in the case of the
first Monthly Period, the Initial Invested Amount) and (b) during the Controlled
Accumulation Period, the Early Amortization Period or any Partial Amortization
Period, the Series Adjusted Invested Amount for Series 2001-6 as of the close of
business on the date on which the Revolving Period shall have terminated and the
denominator of which is the product of (x) the sum of (i) the total amount of
Principal Receivables in the Trust as of the last day of the immediately
preceding Monthly Period (or with respect to the first Monthly Period, the total
amount of Principal Receivables in the Trust as of the Closing Date) and (ii)
the principal amount on deposit in the Special Funding Account as of such last
day (or with respect to the first Monthly Period, the Closing Date) and (y) the
Series 2001-6 Allocation Percentage as of the last day of the immediately
preceding Monthly Period; provided, however, that with respect to any Monthly
Period in which an Addition Date for an Aggregate Addition or a Removal Date
occurs the amount in (x)(i) above shall be (1) the aggregate amount of Principal
Receivables in the Trust at the end of the day on the last day of the prior
Monthly Period for the period from and including the first day of such Monthly
Period to but excluding the related Addition Date or Removal Date and (2) the
aggregate amount of Principal Receivables in the Trust at the end of the day on
the related Addition Date or Removal Date for the period from and including the
related Addition Date or Removal Date to and including the last day of such
Monthly Period; and provided further, that if after the commencement of


9





the Controlled Accumulation Period a Pay-Out Event occurs with respect to
another Series that was designated in the Supplement therefor as a Series that
is a "Paired Series" with respect to Series 2001-6, the Transferors may, by
written notice delivered to the Trustee and the Servicer, designate a different
numerator for the foregoing fraction, provided that (x) such numerator is not
less than the Adjusted Invested Amount as of the last day of the revolving
period for such Paired Series, (y) the Transferors shall have received written
notice from each Rating Agency that the Rating Agency Condition has been
satisfied with respect to such designation and shall have delivered copies of
each such written notice to the Servicer and the Trustee and (z) the Transferors
shall have delivered to the Trustee an Officer's Certificate to the effect that,
based on the facts known to such officer at such time, in the reasonable belief
of the Transferors, such designation will not cause a Pay-Out Event or an event
that, after the giving of notice or the lapse of time, would constitute a
Pay-Out Event, to occur with respect to Series 2001-6.


"Principal Funding Account" shall have the meaning specified
in subsection 4.03(a)(i).


"Principal Funding Account Balance" shall mean, with respect
to any date of determination during the Controlled Accumulation Period, the
principal amount, if any, on deposit in the Principal Funding Account on such
date of determination.


"Principal Funding Investment Proceeds" shall have the meaning
specified in subsection 4.03(a)(ii).


"Principal Funding Investment Shortfall" shall mean, with
respect to each Distribution Date during the Controlled Accumulation Period, the
amount, if any, by which the Principal Funding Investment Proceeds are less than
the Covered Amount.


"Reallocated Investor Finance Charge Collections" shall mean
that portion of Group II Investor Finance Charge Collections allocated to Series
2001-6 pursuant to Section 4.10.


"Reallocated Principal Collections" shall mean, with respect
to any Monthly Period, the product of (a) the Series 2001-6 Allocable Principal
Collections deposited in the Collection Account for such Monthly Period and (b)
the sum of the Class B Principal Percentage and the Collateral Principal
Percentage.


"Reassignment Amount" shall mean, with respect to any
Distribution Date, after giving effect to any deposits and distributions
otherwise to be made on such Distribution Date, the sum of (i) the Adjusted
Invested Amount on such Distribution Date, plus (ii) Monthly Interest for such
Distribution Date and any Monthly Interest previously due but not distributed to
the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date, plus (iii)
the amount of Additional Interest, if any, for such Distribution Date and any
Additional Interest previously due but not distributed to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date.


"Reference Banks" shall mean four major banks in the London
interbank market selected by the Servicer.


"Required Accumulation Factor Number" shall be equal to a
fraction, rounded upwards to the nearest whole number, the numerator of which is
one and the denominator of which is equal to the lowest monthly principal
payment rate on the Accounts, expressed as a decimal, for the three months
preceding the date of such calculation.


"Required Amount" shall mean, with respect to any Monthly
Period, the sum of the Class A Required Amount and the Class B Required Amount.


10





"Required Collateral Invested Amount" shall mean (i) initially
$66,500,000 and (ii) on any Distribution Date thereafter, 9.50% of the sum of
the Class A Adjusted Invested Amount on such Distribution Date, the Class B
Adjusted Invested Amount on such Distribution Date (in each case after taking
into account payments to be made on such Distribution Date) and the Collateral
Invested Amount on such Distribution Date after taking into account any
adjustments made on such Distribution Date, but not less than $21,000,000;
provided, however, that (1) if either (a) there is a reduction in the Collateral
Invested Amount pursuant to clauses (c), (d) or (e) of the definition thereof
during the Controlled Accumulation Period or (b) a Pay-Out Event with respect to
the Series 2001-6 Certificates has occurred, the Required Collateral Invested
Amount for such Distribution Date thereafter shall equal the Required Collateral
Invested Amount for such Distribution Date immediately preceding such reduction
or Pay-Out Event, (2) in no event shall the Required Collateral Invested Amount
exceed the unpaid principal amount of the Series 2001-6 Certificates as of the
last day of the Monthly Period preceding such Distribution Date after taking
into account payments to be made on the related Distribution Date and (3) the
Required Collateral Invested Amount may be reduced to a lesser amount at any
time if the Rating Agency Condition is satisfied.


"Required Reserve Account Amount" shall mean, with respect to
any Distribution Date on or after the Reserve Account Funding Date, an amount
equal to (1) 0.50% of the Class A Invested Amount as of the preceding
Distribution Date (after giving effect to all changes therein on such date) or

(2) any other percentage (which may be 0%) of the Class A Invested Amount
designated by the Transferors, provided that if such percentage is less than the
percentage specified in clause (1) above, the Transferors shall have received
the prior written consent of the Collateral Interest Holder and written notice
from each Rating Agency that the Rating Agency Condition shall have been
satisfied with respect to such designation and shall have delivered copies of
each such written notice to the Servicer and the Trustee.


"Reserve Account" shall have the meaning specified in
subsection 4.12(a).


"Reserve Account Funding Date" shall mean the Distribution
Date which occurs not later than the earliest of (a) the Distribution Date with
respect to the Monthly Period that commences not later than three months prior
to the Distribution Date with respect to the first Monthly Period in the
Controlled Accumulation Period, (b) in the event that the average Excess Spread
Percentage for any three consecutive Monthly Periods ending in the June 2004
Monthly Period or any Monthly Period thereafter is less than 2%, the
Distribution Date with respect to such Monthly Period, (c) in the event that the
average Excess Spread Percentage for any three consecutive Monthly Periods
ending in the December 2004 Monthly Period or any Monthly Period thereafter is
less than 3%, the Distribution Date with respect to such Monthly Period and (d)
such earlier Distribution Date as the Transferors may determine by written
notice to the Trustee and the Servicer. For this purpose, the "Excess Spread
Percentage" for any Monthly Period shall be equal to the Series Adjusted
Portfolio Yield for such Monthly Period minus the Base Rate for such Monthly
Period.


"Reserve Account Surplus" shall mean, as of any date of
determination, the amount, if any, by which the amount on deposit in the Reserve
Account exceeds the Required Reserve Account Amount.


"Reserve Draw Amount" shall have the meaning specified in
subsection 4.12(c).


"Revolving Period" shall mean the period beginning at the
close of business on the Series Cut-Off Date and ending on the earlier of (a)
the close of business on the day immediately preceding the day the Controlled
Accumulation Period commences and (b) the close of business on the day
immediately preceding the day the Early Amortization Period commences.


11





"Series Adjusted Portfolio Yield" shall mean, with respect to
any Monthly Period, the annualized percentage equivalent of a fraction, (A) the
numerator of which is equal to (a) Reallocated Investor Finance Charge
Collections with respect to such Monthly Period, plus (b) the amount of any
Principal Funding Investment Proceeds for the related Distribution Date, plus

(c) provided that each Rating Agency has consented in writing to the inclusion
thereof in calculating the Series Adjusted Portfolio Yield, any Excess Finance
Charge Collections that are allocated to Series 2001-6 with respect to such
Monthly Period plus (d) the amount of funds, if any, withdrawn from the Reserve
Account which pursuant to subsection 4.12(d) are required to be included as
Class A Available Funds for the Distribution Date with respect to such Monthly
Period minus (e) the Investor Default Amount for the Distribution Date with
respect to such Monthly Period, and (B) the denominator of which is the Invested
Amount as of the last day of the preceding Monthly Period.


"Series Cut-Off Date" shall mean the close of business on June
12, 2001.


"Series 2001-6" shall mean the Series of Certificates the
terms of which are specified in this Supplement.


"Series 2001-6 Additional Amounts" shall mean, with respect to
any Distribution Date, the sum of the amounts determined pursuant to subsections
4.07(b), (e) and (i) for such Distribution Date.


"Series 2001-6 Allocable Defaulted Amount" shall mean the
Series Allocable Defaulted Amount with respect to Series 2001-6.


"Series 2001-6 Allocable Finance Charge Collections" shall
mean the Series Allocable Finance Charge Collections with respect to Series
2001-6.


"Series 2001-6 Allocable Principal Collections" shall mean the
Series Allocable Principal Collections with respect to Series 2001-6.


"Series 2001-6 Allocation Percentage" shall mean the Series
Allocation Percentage with respect to Series 2001-6.


"Series 2001-6 Certificate" shall mean a Class A Certificate
or a Class B Certificate or the Collateral Interest.


"Series 2001-6 Certificateholder" shall mean a Class A
Certificateholder or a Class B Certificateholder or the Collateral Interest
Holder.


"Series 2001-6 Certificateholders' Interest" shall mean the
Certificateholders' Interest for Series 2001-6, including the Collateral
Interest.


"Series 2001-6 Monthly Fees" shall mean, with respect to any
Distribution Date, the amount determined pursuant to subsections 4.05(a)(ii),

(b)(ii) and (c)(i) and subsection 4.07(g).


"Series 2001-6 Monthly Interest" shall mean the amounts
determined pursuant to subsections 4.02(a), (b) and (c).


"Series 2001-6 Principal Shortfall" shall have the meaning
specified in Section 4.11.


"Series 2001-6 Termination Date" shall mean the December 2008
Distribution Date.


"Series Invested Amount" shall mean the Initial Invested
Amount.


12





"Series Required Transferor Amount" shall mean an amount equal
to 7% of the Invested Amount.


"Servicing Base Amount" shall have the meaning specified in

Section 3.01.


"Servicing Fee Rate" shall mean 2.0% per annum.


"Special Payment Date" shall mean each Distribution Date with
respect to the Early Amortization Period.


"Telerate Page 3750" shall mean the display page currently so
designated on the Dow Jones Service (or such other page as may replace that page
on that service for the purpose of displaying comparable rates or prices).


"Transferor Percentage" shall mean 100% minus (a) the Floating
Allocation Percentage, when used at any time with respect to Finance Charge
Receivables and Defaulted Receivables, or (b) the Principal Allocation
Percentage, when used at any time with respect to Principal Receivables.


(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this
Supplement or the Agreement, the term "Rating Agency" shall mean, whenever used
in this Supplement or the Agreement with respect to Series 2001-6, Moody's and
Standard & Poor's. As used in this Supplement and in the Agreement with respect
to Series 2001-6, "highest investment category" shall mean (i) in the case of
Standard & Poor's, AAA or A-1+, as applicable and (ii) in the case of Moody's,
Aaa or P-1, as applicable.


(c) Each capitalized term defined herein shall relate to the
Series 2001-6 Certificates and no other Series of Certificates issued by the
Trust, unless the context otherwise requires. All capitalized terms used herein
and not otherwise defined herein have the meanings ascribed to them in the
Agreement. In the event that any term or provision contained herein shall
conflict with or be inconsistent with any term or provision contained in the
Agreement, the terms and provisions of this Supplement shall govern.


(d) The words "hereof," "herein" and "hereunder" and words of
similar import when used in this Supplement shall refer to this Supplement as a
whole and not to any particular provision of this Supplement; references to any
Article, subsection, Section or Exhibit are references to Articles, subsections,
Sections and Exhibits in or to this Supplement unless otherwise specified; and
the term "including" means "including without limitation."



ARTICLE III




Servicing Fee



Section 3.01. Servicing Compensation. The share of the
Servicing Fee allocable to the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders with respect to
any Distribution Date (the "Monthly Servicing Fee") shall be equal to
one-twelfth of the product of (a) the Servicing Fee Rate and (b) (i) the
Adjusted Invested Amount as of the last day of the Monthly Period preceding such
Distribution Date minus (ii) the product of the amount, if any, on deposit in
the Special Funding Account as of the last day of the Monthly Period preceding
such Distribution Date and the Series 2001-6 Allocation Percentage with respect
to such Monthly Period (the amount calculated pursuant to this clause (b) is
referred to as the "Servicing Base Amount"). The share of the Monthly Servicing
Fee allocable to the Class A Certificateholders with respect to any Distribution
Date (the "Class A Servicing Fee") shall be equal to one-twelfth of the product
of (a) the Class A Floating Percentage, (b) the Servicing Fee Rate and (c) the
Servicing Base Amount. The share of the Monthly Servicing Fee allocable to the
Class B Certificateholders with respect to any Distribution Date (the "Class B
Servicing Fee") shall be equal to


13





one-twelfth of the product of (a) the Class B Floating Percentage, (b) the
Servicing Fee Rate and (c) the Servicing Base Amount. The share of the Monthly
Servicing Fee allocable to the Collateral Interest with respect to any
Distribution Date (the "Collateral Servicing Fee") shall be equal to one-twelfth
of the product of the (a) Collateral Floating Percentage, (b) the Servicing Fee
Rate and (c) the Servicing Base Amount. The remainder of the Servicing Fee shall
be paid by the Holders of the Transferor Certificates or the investor
certificateholders of other Series (as provided in the related Supplements) and
in no event shall the Trust, the Trustee or the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders
be liable for the share of the Servicing Fee to be paid by the Holders of the
Transferor Certificates or the investor certificateholders of any other Series.
To the extent that the Class A Servicing Fee, the Class B Servicing Fee and the
Collateral Servicing Fee are not paid in full pursuant to the preceding
provisions of this Section 3.01, and Sections 4.05 and 4.07, they shall be paid
by the Holders of the Transferor Certificates.



ARTICLE IV



Rights of Series 2001-6 Certificateholders and
Allocation and Application of Collections


Section 4.01. Collections and Allocations.


(a) Allocations. Collections of Finance Charge Receivables and
Principal Receivables and Defaulted Receivables allocated to Series 2001-6
pursuant to Article IV of the Agreement (and, as described herein, Collections
of Finance Charge Receivables reallocated from other Series in Group II) shall
be allocated and distributed or reallocated as set forth in this Article.


(b) Payments to the Transferor. The Servicer shall on each
Deposit Date withdraw from the Collection Account and pay to the Holders of the
Transferor Certificates the following amounts:


(i) an amount equal to the Transferor Percentage for
the related Monthly Period of Series 2001-6 Allocable Finance
Charge Collections to the extent such amount is deposited in
the Collection Account; and


(ii) an amount equal to the Transferor Percentage for
the related Monthly Period of Series 2001-6 Allocable
Principal Collections deposited in the Collection Account, if
the Transferor Amount (determined after giving effect to any
Principal Receivables transferred to the Trust on such Deposit
Date) exceeds zero.


The withdrawals to be made from the Collection Account
pursuant to this subsection 4.01(b) do not apply to deposits into the Collection
Account that do not represent Collections, including payment of the purchase
price for the Certificateholders' Interest pursuant to Section 2.06 or 10.01 of
the Agreement, payment of the purchase price for the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders' Interest pursuant to Section 7.01 of this Supplement and
proceeds from the sale, disposition or liquidation of Receivables pursuant to

Section 9.01 or 12.02 of the Agreement.


(c) Allocations to the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders. The
Servicer shall, prior to the close of business on each Deposit Date, allocate to
the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders the following amounts as set forth below:


(i) Allocations of Finance Charge Collections. The
Servicer shall allocate to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders and retain in the Collection Account for
application as provided herein an amount equal to the product
of (A) the Floating Allocation Percentage and (B) the Series
2001-6 Allocation Percentage and (C) the aggregate amount of
Collections of Finance Charge Receivables deposited in the
Collection Account on such Deposit Date.


14





(ii) Allocations of Principal Collections. The
Servicer shall allocate to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders the following amounts as set forth below:


(x) Allocations During the Revolving Period.
During the Revolving Period (A) an amount equal to
the product of (I) the sum of the Class B Principal
Percentage and the Collateral Principal Percentage
and (II) the Principal Allocation Percentage and

(III) the Series 2001-6 Allocation Percentage and

(IV) the aggregate amount of Collections of Principal
Receivables deposited in the Collection Account on
such Deposit Date, shall be allocated to the Series
2001-6 Certificateholders and retained in the
Collection Account until applied as provided herein
and (B) an amount equal to the product of (I) the
Class A Principal Percentage and (II) the Principal
Allocation Percentage and (III) the Series 2001-6
Allocation Percentage and (IV) the aggregate amount
of Collections of Principal Receivables deposited in
the Collection Account on such Deposit Date shall be
allocated to the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders
and, to the extent needed to make any distribution
pursuant to subsection 4.05(d)(i), deposited in the
Collection Account, and otherwise first, if any other
Principal Sharing Series is outstanding and in its
amortization period or accumulation period, retained
in the Collection Account for application, to the
extent necessary, as Shared Principal Collections on
the related Distribution Date, and second paid to the
Holders of the Transferor Certificates; provided,
however, that such amount to be paid to the Holders
of the Transferor Certificates on any Deposit Date
shall be paid to such Holders only if the Transferor
Amount on such Deposit Date is greater than the
Required Transferor Amount (after giving effect to
all Principal Receivables transferred to the Trust on
such day) and otherwise shall be deposited in the
Special Funding Account.


(y) Allocations During the Controlled
Accumulation Period. During the Controlled
Accumulation Period (A) an amount equal to the
product of (I) the sum of the Class B Principal
Percentage and the Collateral Principal Percentage
and (II) the Principal Allocation Percentage and

(III) the Series 2001-6 Allocation Percentage and

(IV) the aggregate amount of Collections of Principal
Receivables deposited in the Collection Account on
such Deposit Date, shall be allocated to the Series
2001-6 Certificateholders and retained in the
Collection Account until applied as provided herein
and (B) an amount equal to the product of (I) the
Class A Principal Percentage and (II) the Principal
Allocation Percentage and (III) the Series 2001-6
Allocation Percentage and (IV) the aggregate amount
of Collections of Principal Receivables deposited in
the Collection Account on such Deposit Date (the
product specified in this clause (B) for any such
date is hereinafter referred to as a "Percentage
Allocation") shall be allocated to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders and retained in the Collection
Account until applied as provided herein; provided,
however, that if the sum of such Percentage
Allocation and all preceding Percentage Allocations
with respect to the same Monthly Period exceeds the
Controlled Deposit Amount during the Controlled
Accumulation Period for the related Distribution
Date, then such excess shall not be treated as a
Percentage Allocation and shall be first, if any
other Principal Sharing Series is outstanding and in
its amortization period or accumulation period,
retained in the Collection Account for application,
to the extent necessary, as Shared Principal
Collections on the related Distribution Date, and
second paid to the Holders of the Transferor
Certificates only if the Transferor Amount on such
Deposit Date is greater than the Required Transferor
Amount (after giving effect to all Principal
Receivables transferred to the Trust on such day) and
otherwise shall be deposited in the Special Funding
Account.


15





(z) Allocations During the Early
Amortization Period. During the Early Amortization
Period, an amount equal to the product of (A) the
Principal Allocation Percentage and (B) the Series
2001-6 Allocation Percentage and (C) the aggregate
amount of Collections of Principal Receivables
deposited in the Collection Account on such Deposit
Date, shall be allocated to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders and retained in the Collection
Account until applied as provided herein; provided,
however, that after the date on which an amount of
such Collections equal to the Adjusted Invested
Amount has been deposited into the Collection Account
and allocated to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders, the remainder that has not been
so deposited and allocated shall be first, if any
other Principal Sharing Series is outstanding and in
its amortization period or accumulation period,
retained in the Collection Account for application,
to the extent necessary, as Shared Principal
Collections on the related Distribution Date, and
second paid to the Holders of the Transferor
Certificates only if the Transferor Amount on such
date is greater than the Required Transferor Amount
(after giving effect to all Principal Receivables
transferred to the Trust on such day) and otherwise
shall be deposited in the Special Funding Account.


Section 4.02. Determination of Monthly Interest.


(a) The amount of monthly interest ("Class A Monthly
Interest") distributable from the Collection Account with respect to the Class A
Certificates on any Distribution Date shall be an amount equal to the product of

(i) a fraction, the numerator of which is the actual number of days in the
period from (and including) the immediately preceding Distribution Date (or in
the case of the first Distribution Date, the Closing Date) to (but excluding)
such Distribution Date and the denominator of which is 360, (ii) the Class A
Certificate Rate for such Distribution Date and (iii) the outstanding principal
balance of the Class A Certificates as of close of business on the immediately
preceding Record Date.


On the Determination Date preceding each Distribution Date,
the Servicer shall determine the excess, if any (the "Class A Interest
Shortfall"), of (x) the Class A Monthly Interest for such Distribution Date over

(y) the aggregate amount of funds allocated and available to pay such Class A
Monthly Interest on such Distribution Date. If the Class A Interest Shortfall
with respect to any Distribution Date is greater than zero, on each subsequent
Distribution Date until such Class A Interest Shortfall is fully paid, an
additional amount ("Class A Additional Interest") equal to the product of (i) a
fraction, the numerator of which is the actual number of days in the period from
(and including) the immediately preceding Distribution Date (or in the case of
the first Distribution Date, the Closing Date) to (but excluding) such
Distribution Date and the denominator of which is 360, (ii) the sum of (x) the
Class A Certificate Rate and (y) 2.0% per annum and (iii) such Class A Interest
Shortfall (or the portion thereof which has not been paid to the Class A
Certificateholders) shall be payable as provided herein with respect to the
Class A Certificates. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, Class A
Additional Interest shall be payable or distributed to the Class A
Certificateholders only to the extent permitted by applicable law.


(b) The amount of monthly interest ("Class B Monthly
Interest") distributable from the Collection Account with respect to the Class B
Certificates on any Distribution Date shall be an amount equal to the product of

(i) a fraction, the numerator of which is the actual number of days in the
period from (and including) the immediately preceding Distribution Date (or in
the case of the first Distribution Date, the Closing Date) to (but excluding)
such Distribution Date and the denominator of which is 360, (ii) the Class B
Certificate Rate for such Distribution Date and (iii) the Class B Invested
Amount as of the close of business on the immediately preceding Record Date.


16





On the Determination Date preceding each Distribution Date,
the Servicer shall determine the excess, if any (the "Class B Interest
Shortfall"), of (x) the Class B Monthly Interest for such Distribution Date over

(y) the aggregate amount of funds allocated and available to pay such Class B
Monthly Interest on such Distribution Date. If the Class B Interest Shortfall
with respect to any Distribution Date is greater than zero, on each subsequent
Distribution Date until such Class B Interest Shortfall is fully paid, an
additional amount ("Class B Additional Interest") equal to the product of (i) a
fraction, the numerator of which is the actual number of days in the period from
(and including) the immediately preceding Distribution Date (or in the case of
the first Distribution Date, the Closing Date) to (but excluding) such
Distribution Date and the denominator of which is 360, (ii) the sum of (x) the
Class B Certificate Rate and (y) 2.0% per annum and (iii) such Class B Interest
Shortfall (or the portion thereof which has not been paid to the Class B
Certificateholders) shall be payable as provided herein with respect to the
Class B Certificates. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, Class B
Additional Interest shall be payable or distributed to the Class B
Certificateholders only to the extent permitted by applicable law.


(c) The amount of monthly interest ("Collateral Monthly
Interest") distributable from the Collection Account with respect to the
Collateral Invested Amount on any Distribution Date shall be an amount equal to
the product of (i) (A) a fraction, the numerator of which is the actual number
of days in the period from (and including) the immediately preceding
Distribution Date (or in the case of the first Distribution Date, the Closing
Date) to (but excluding) such Distribution Date and the denominator of which is
360, (B) the Collateral Rate in effect with respect to the period from (and
including) the immediately preceding Distribution Date (or in the case of the
first Distribution Date, the Closing Date) to (but excluding) such Distribution
Date, and (ii) the Collateral Invested Amount as of the close of business on the
last day of the preceding Monthly Period; provided, however, with respect to the
first Distribution Date, Collateral Monthly Interest shall be equal to the
interest accrued on the Collateral Initial Invested Amount at the Collateral
Rate for the period from the Closing Date to but excluding the first
Distribution Date.


On the Determination Date preceding each Distribution Date,
the Servicer shall determine an amount (the "Collateral Interest Shortfall")
equal to (x) the aggregate Collateral Monthly Interest for such Distribution
Date minus (y) the aggregate amount of funds allocated and available to pay such
Collateral Monthly Interest on such Distribution Date. If the Collateral
Interest Shortfall with respect to any Distribution Date is greater than zero,
on each subsequent Distribution Date until such Collateral Interest Shortfall is
fully paid, an additional amount ("Collateral Additional Interest") shall be
payable as provided herein with respect to the Collateral Invested Amount equal
to the product of (i) (A) a fraction, the numerator of which is the actual
number of days in the period from (and including) the immediately preceding
Distribution Date to (but excluding) such Distribution Date and the denominator
of which is 360, (B) the Collateral Rate in effect during the period from (and
including) the immediately preceding Distribution Date to (but excluding) such
Distribution Date, and (ii) such Collateral Interest Shortfall (or the portion
thereof which has not been paid to the Collateral Interest Holder).
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, Collateral Additional Interest
shall be payable or distributed to the Collateral Interest Holder only to the
extent permitted by applicable law.


Section 4.03. Principal Funding Account; Controlled
Accumulation Period.


(a) (i) The Servicer, for the benefit of the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders, shall establish and maintain in the name of the Trustee, on
behalf of the Trust, an Eligible Deposit Account (the "Principal Funding
Account"), bearing a designation clearly indicating that the funds deposited
therein are held for the benefit of the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders. The
Principal Funding Account shall initially be established with The Bank of New
York.


(ii) At the written direction of the Servicer, funds
on deposit in the Principal Funding Account shall be invested by the Trustee in
Eligible Investments selected by the


17





Servicer. All such Eligible Investments shall be held by the Trustee for the
benefit of the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders; provided that on each
Distribution Date all interest and other investment income (net of losses and
investment expenses) ("Principal Funding Account Investment Proceeds") on funds
on deposit therein shall be applied as set forth in paragraph (iii) below. Funds
on deposit in the Principal Funding Account shall be invested in Eligible
Investments that will mature so that such funds will be available at the close
of business on the Transfer Date preceding the following Distribution Date.
Unless the Servicer directs otherwise, funds deposited in the Principal Funding
Account on a Transfer Date (which immediately precedes a Payment Date) upon the
maturity of any Eligible Investments are not required to be invested overnight.
No such Eligible Investment shall be disposed of prior to its maturity;
provided, however, that the Trustee may sell, liquidate or dispose of any such
Eligible Investment before its maturity, at the written direction of the
Servicer, if such sale, liquidation or disposal would not result in a loss of
all or part of the principal portion of such Eligible Investment or if, prior to
the maturity of such Eligible Investment, a default occurs in the payment of
principal, interest or any other amount with respect to such Eligible
Investment.


(iii) On each Distribution Date with respect to the
Controlled Accumulation Period, the Servicer shall direct the Trustee in writing
to withdraw from the Principal Funding Account and deposit into the Collection
Account all Principal Funding Account Investment Proceeds then on deposit in the
Principal Funding Account and such Principal Funding Account Investment Proceeds
shall be treated as a portion of Class A Available Funds and Class B Available
Funds.


(iv) Reinvested interest and other investment income
on funds deposited in the Principal Funding Account shall not be considered to
be principal amounts on deposit therein for purposes of this Supplement.


(b) (i) The Trustee shall possess all right, title and
interest in all funds on deposit from time to time in the Principal Funding
Account and in all proceeds thereof. The Principal Funding Account shall be
under the sole dominion and control of the Trustee for the benefit of the Series
2001-6 Certificateholders. If, at any time, the Principal Funding Account ceases
to be an Eligible Deposit Account, the Trustee (or the Servicer on its behalf)
shall within 10 Business Days (or such longer period, not to exceed 30 calendar
days, as to which each Rating Agency may consent) establish a new Principal
Funding Account meeting the conditions specified in paragraph (a)(i) above as an
Eligible Deposit Account and shall transfer any cash or any investments to such
new Principal Funding Account.


(ii) Pursuant to the authority granted to the
Servicer in subsection 3.01(b) of the Agreement, the Servicer shall have the
power to make withdrawals and payments or to instruct the Trustee to make
withdrawals and payments from the Principal Funding Account for the purposes of
carrying out the Servicer's or Trustee's duties hereunder. Pursuant to the
authority granted to the Paying Agent in Section 5.01 of this Supplement and

Section 6.07 of the Agreement, the Paying Agent shall have the power to withdraw
funds from the Principal Funding Account for the purpose of making distributions
to the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders.


(c) The Controlled Accumulation Period is scheduled to
commence at the close of business on the last day of the April 2005 Monthly
Period; provided, however, that if the Controlled Accumulation Period Length
(which shall be determined as described below) is less than 12 months, the date
on which the Controlled Accumulation Period actually commences will be delayed
to the close of business on the last day of the month preceding the month that
is the number of months prior to the Expected Final Payment Date at least equal
to the Controlled Accumulation Period Length and, as a result, the number of
Monthly Periods in the Controlled Accumulation Period will at least equal the
Controlled Accumulation Period Length. On the Determination Date immediately
preceding the April 2005 Distribution Date, and on each Determination Date
thereafter that occurs prior to the Determination Date occurring in the Monthly
Period in which the Controlled Accumulation Period commences, the


18





Servicer will determine the "Controlled Accumulation Period Length" which will
equal the number of months such that the sum of the Controlled Accumulation
Period Factors for each month during such period will be equal to or greater
than the Required Accumulation Factor Number; provided, however, that the
Controlled Accumulation Period Length shall not be less than one month.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Controlled Accumulation Period Length
shall have been determined to be less than 12 months and, after the date on
which such determination is made, a Pay-Out Event or Reinvestment Event (as
those terms are defined in the Supplement for such Series) shall occur with
respect to any outstanding Principal Sharing Series other than Series 2001-6,
the Controlled Accumulation Period will commence on the earlier of (i) the first
day of the Monthly Period immediately succeeding the date that such Pay-Out
Event or Reinvestment Event shall have occurred with respect to such Series and

(ii) the date on which the Controlled Accumulation Period is then scheduled to
commence.


Section 4.04. Required Amount.


(a) With respect to each Distribution Date, on the related
Determination Date, the Servicer shall determine the amount (the "Class A
Required Amount"), if any, by which (x) the sum of (i) Class A Monthly Interest
for such Distribution Date, (ii) any Class A Monthly Interest previously due but
not paid to the Class A Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date, (iii)
any Class A Additional Interest for such Distribution Date and (iv) any Class A
Additional Interest previously due but not paid to the Class A
Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date, (v) if TRS or an Affiliate of
TRS is no longer the Servicer, the Class A Servicing Fee for such Distribution
Date, (vi) if TRS or an Affiliate of TRS is no longer the Servicer, any Class A
Servicing Fee previously due but not paid to the Servicer, and (vii) the Class A
Investor Default Amount, if any, for such Distribution Date exceeds (y) the
Class A Available Funds. In the event that the difference between (x) the Class
A Required Amount for such Distribution Date and (y) the amount of Excess Spread
and Excess Finance Charge Collections applied with respect thereto pursuant to
subsection 4.07(a) on such Distribution Date is greater than zero, the Servicer
shall give written notice to the Trustee of such excess Class A Required Amount
on the date of computation.


(b) With respect to each Distribution Date, on the related
Determination Date, the Servicer shall determine the amount (the "Class B
Required Amount"), if any, equal to the sum of (x) the amount, if any, by which
(A) the sum of (i) Class B Monthly Interest for such Distribution Date, (ii) any
Class B Monthly Interest previously due but not paid to the Class B
Certificateholders, (iii) Class B Additional Interest, if any, for such
Distribution Date, (iv) any Class B Additional Interest previously due but not
paid to the Class B Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date, (v) if TRS
or an Affiliate of TRS is no longer the Servicer, the Class B Servicing Fee for
such Distribution Date and (vi) if TRS or an Affiliate of TRS is no longer the
Servicer, any Class B Servicing Fee previously due but not paid to the Servicer
exceeds (B) the Class B Available Funds and (y) the Class B Investor Default
Amount for such Distribution Date. In the event that the difference between (x)
the Class B Required Amount for such Distribution Date and (y) the amount of
Excess Spread and Excess Finance Charge Collections applied with respect thereto
pursuant to subsection 4.07(c) on such Distribution Date is greater than zero,
the Servicer shall give written notice to the Trustee of such excess Class B
Required Amount on the date of computation.


Section 4.05. Application of Class A Available Funds, Class B
Available Funds, Collateral Available Funds and Available Principal Collections.
The Servicer shall apply, or shall cause the Trustee to apply by written
instruction to the Trustee, on each Distribution Date, Class A Available Funds,
Class B Available Funds, Collateral Available Funds and Available Principal
Collections on deposit in the Collection Account with respect to such
Distribution Date to make the following distributions:


(a) On each Distribution Date, an amount equal to the Class A
Available Funds with respect to such Distribution Date will be distributed or
deposited in the following priority:


19





(i) an amount equal to Class A Monthly Interest for
such Distribution Date, plus the amount of any Class A Monthly
Interest previously due but not distributed to Class A
Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date, plus the
amount of any Class A Additional Interest for such
Distribution Date and any Class A Additional Interest
previously due but not distributed to Class A
Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date, shall be
distributed to the Paying Agent for payment to the Class A
Certificateholders;


(ii) if TRS or an Affiliate of TRS is no longer the
Servicer, an amount equal to the Class A Servicing Fee for
such Distribution Date, plus the amount of any Class A
Servicing Fee previously due but not distributed to the
Servicer on a prior Distribution Date, shall be distributed to
the Servicer (unless such amount has been netted against
deposits to the Collection Account in accordance with Section
4.03 of the Agreement);


(iii) an amount equal to the Class A Investor Default
Amount for such Distribution Date shall be treated as a
portion of Available Principal Collections for such
Distribution Date; and


(iv) the balance, if any, shall constitute Excess
Spread and shall be allocated and distributed or deposited as
set forth in Section 4.07.


(b) On each Distribution Date, an amount equal to the Class B
Available Funds with respect to such Distribution Date will be distributed or
deposited in the following priority:


(i) an amount equal to Class B Monthly Interest for
such Distribution Date, plus the amount of any Class B Monthly
Interest previously due but not distributed to Class B
Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date, plus the
amount of any Class B Additional Interest for such
Distribution Date and any Class B Additional Interest
previously due but not distributed to Class B
Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date, shall be
distributed to the Paying Agent for payment to the Class B
Certificateholders;


(ii) if TRS or an Affiliate of TRS is no longer the
Servicer, an amount equal to the Class B Servicing Fee for
such Distribution Date, plus the amount of any Class B
Servicing Fee previously due but not distributed to the
Servicer on a prior Distribution Date, shall be distributed to
the Servicer (unless such amount has been netted against
deposits to the Collection Account in accordance with Section
4.03 of the Agreement); and


(iii) the balance, if any, shall constitute Excess
Spread and shall be allocated and distributed or deposited as
set forth in Section 4.07.


(c) On each Distribution Date, an amount equal to the
Collateral Available Funds with respect to such Distribution Date will be
distributed or deposited in the following priority:


(i) if TRS or an Affiliate of TRS is no longer the
Servicer, an amount equal to the Collateral Servicing Fee for
such Distribution Date, plus the amount of any Collateral
Servicing Fee previously due but not distributed to the
Servicer on a prior Distribution Date, shall be distributed to
the Servicer (unless such amount has been netted against
deposits to the Collection Account in accordance with Section
4.03 of the Agreement); and


20





(ii) the balance, if any, shall constitute Excess
Spread and shall be allocated and distributed or deposited as
set forth in Section 4.07.


(d) On each Distribution Date with respect to the Revolving
Period, an amount equal to the Available Principal Collections deposited in the
Collection Account for the related Monthly Period shall be distributed in the
following order of priority:


(i) an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the
Collateral Invested Amount over the Required Collateral
Invested Amount shall be paid to the Collateral Interest
Holder for application in accordance with the Loan Agreement;
and


(ii) the balance of such Available Principal
Collections shall be treated as Shared Principal Collections
and applied in accordance with Section 4.04 of the Agreement.


(e) On each Distribution Date with respect to the Controlled
Accumulation Period, an amount equal to the Available Principal Collections
deposited in the Collection Account for the related Monthly Period shall be
distributed in the following order of priority:


(i) an amount equal to the lesser of (x) the
Controlled Deposit Amount and (y) the sum of the Class A
Adjusted Invested Amount and the Class B Adjusted Invested
Amount shall be deposited in the Principal Funding Account;


(ii) for each Distribution Date prior to the
Distribution Date on which the Class B Invested Amount is paid
in full, after giving effect to paragraph (i) above, an amount
equal to the balance, if any, of such Available Principal
Collections shall be paid to the Collateral Interest Holder
for application in accordance with the Loan Agreement to the
extent the Collateral Invested Amount exceeds the Required
Collateral Invested Amount;


(iii) for each Distribution Date beginning on the
Distribution Date on which the Class B Invested Amount shall
have been paid in full, an amount up to the Collateral
Invested Amount shall be paid to the Collateral Interest
Holder for application in accordance with the Loan Agreement;
and


(iv) the balance of such Available Principal
Collections shall be treated as Shared Principal Collections
and applied in accordance with Section 4.04 of the Agreement.


(f) On each Distribution Date with respect to the Early
Amortization Period, an amount equal to Available Principal Collections
deposited in the Collection Account for the related Monthly Period shall be
distributed or deposited in the following order of priority:


(i) an amount up to the Class A Adjusted Invested
Amount on such Distribution Date shall be deposited in the
Principal Funding Account for distribution to the Class A
Certificateholders;


(ii) for each Distribution Date beginning on the
Distribution Date on which the Class A Invested Amount is paid
in full, an amount up to the Class B Adjusted Invested Amount
on such Distribution Date shall be deposited in the Principal
Funding Account for distribution to the Class B
Certificateholders;


21





(iii) for each Distribution Date beginning on the
Distribution Date on which the Class B Invested Amount is paid
in full, an amount up to the Collateral Invested Amount on
such Distribution Date shall be paid to the Collateral
Interest Holder for application in accordance with the Loan
Agreement; and


(iv) for each Distribution Date, after giving effect
to paragraphs (i), (ii) and (iii) above, an amount equal to
the balance, if any, of such Available Principal Collections
will be treated as Shared Principal Collections and applied in
accordance with Section 4.04 of the Agreement.


Section 4.06. Defaulted Amounts; Investor Charge-Offs.


(a) On each Determination Date, the Servicer shall calculate
the Class A Investor Default Amount, if any, for the related Distribution Date.
If, on any Distribution Date, the Class A Required Amount for the related
Monthly Period exceeds the sum of (x) the amount of Reallocated Principal
Collections allocated to Series 2001-6 with respect to such Monthly Period and

(y) the amount of Excess Spread and the Excess Finance Charge Collections
allocable to Series 2001-6 with respect to such Monthly Period, the Collateral
Invested Amount, if any, will be reduced by the amount of such excess, but not
by more than the Class A Investor Default Amount for such Distribution Date. In
the event that such reduction would cause the Collateral Invested Amount to be a
negative number, the Collateral Invested Amount will be reduced to zero and the
Class B Invested Amount shall be reduced by the amount by which the Collateral
Invested Amount would have been reduced below zero, but not by more than the
excess, if any, of the Class A Investor Default Amount for such Distribution
Date over the amount of such reduction, if any, of the Collateral Invested
Amount with respect to such Distribution Date. In the event that such reduction
would cause the Class B Invested Amount to be a negative number, the Class B
Invested Amount shall be reduced to zero, and the Class A Invested Amount shall
be reduced by the amount by which the Class B Invested Amount would have been
reduced below zero, but not by more than the excess, if any, of the Class A
Investor Default Amount for such Distribution Date over the aggregate amount of
the reductions, if any, of the Collateral Invested Amount and the Class B
Invested Amount for such Distribution Date (a "Class A Investor Charge-Off").
Class A Investor Charge-Offs shall thereafter be reimbursed and the Class A
Invested Amount increased (but not by an amount in excess of the aggregate
unreimbursed Class A Investor Charge-Offs) on any Distribution Date by the
amount of Excess Spread and Excess Finance Charge Collections allocated and
available for that purpose pursuant to subsection 4.07(b). References to
"negative numbers" above shall be determined without regard to the requirement
that the Invested Amount of a Class not be reduced below zero.


(b) On each Determination Date, the Servicer shall calculate
the Class B Investor Default Amount, if any, for the related Distribution Date.
If, on any Distribution Date, the Class B Required Amount for such Distribution
Date exceeds the sum of (x) the amount of Excess Spread and Excess Finance
Charge Collections allocated to Series 2001-6 with respect to the related
Monthly Period which are allocated and available to pay such amount pursuant to
subsection 4.07(c) and (y) the Reallocated Principal Collections allocable to
the Collateral Interest and not required to pay the Class A Required Amount with
respect to such Distribution Date, then the Collateral Invested Amount shall be
reduced by the amount of such excess. In the event that such reduction would
cause the Collateral Invested Amount to be a negative number, the Collateral
Invested Amount shall be reduced to zero, and the Class B Invested Amount shall
be reduced by the amount by which the Collateral Invested Amount would have been
reduced below zero, but not by more than the excess, if any, of the Class B
Investor Default Amount for such Distribution Date over the amount of such
reduction, if any, of the Collateral Invested Amount with respect to such
Distribution Date (a "Class B Investor Charge-Off"). Class B Investor
Charge-Offs shall thereafter be reimbursed and the Class B Invested Amount
increased (but not by an amount in excess of the aggregate unreimbursed Class B
Investor Charge-Offs) on any Distribution Date by the amount of Excess Spread
and Excess Finance Charge Collections allocated and available for


22





that purpose pursuant to subsection 4.07(e). References to "negative numbers"
above shall be determined without regard to the requirement that the Invested
Amount of a Class not be reduced below zero.


(c) On each Determination Date, the Servicer shall calculate
the Collateral Default Amount. If on any Distribution Date the Collateral
Default Amount for the previous Monthly Period exceeds the amount of Excess
Spread and Excess Finance Charge Collections allocated to Series 2001-6 with
respect to the related Monthly Period which are allocated and available to pay
such amount pursuant to subsection 4.07(h), the Collateral Invested Amount will
be reduced by the amount of such excess but not by more than the lesser of the
Collateral Default Amount and the Collateral Invested Amount for such
Distribution Date (a "Collateral Charge-Off"). The Collateral Invested Amount
will be reimbursed after any reduction pursuant to this Section 4.06 on any
Distribution Date by the amount of Excess Spread and Excess Finance Charge
Collections allocated and available on such Distribution date for that purpose
as described under subsection 4.07(i).


Section 4.07. Excess Spread; Excess Finance Charge
Collections. The Servicer shall apply, or shall cause the Trustee to apply by
written instruction to the Trustee, on each Distribution Date, Excess Spread and
Excess Finance Charge Collections allocated to Series 2001-6 with respect to the
related Monthly Period, to make the following distributions or deposits in the
following order of priority:


(a) an amount equal to the Class A Required Amount, if any,
with respect to such Distribution Date shall be distributed by the Trustee to
fund the Class A Required Amount in accordance with, and in the priority set
forth in, subsections 4.05(a)(i), (ii) and (iii);


(b) an amount equal to the aggregate amount of Class A
Investor Charge-Offs which have not been previously reimbursed shall be treated
as a portion of Available Principal Collections for such Distribution Date;


(c) an amount equal to interest on the aggregate outstanding
principal balance of the Class B Certificates not otherwise distributed to the
Class B Certificateholders pursuant to Section 4.05(b)(i), at a rate per annum
equal to the Class B Certificate Rate, shall be distributed to the Class B
Certificateholders, except that interest previously due but not paid will accrue
interest at a rate per annum equal to the Class B Certificate Rate plus 2% per
annum;


(d) an amount equal to the Class B Required Amount, if any,
with respect to such Distribution Date will be (i) used to fund the Class B
Required Amount and be applied in accordance with subsection 4.05(b)(ii), and
then (ii) an amount up to the Class B Investor Default Amount will be treated
and applied as Available Principal Collections for such Distribution Date;


(e) an amount equal to the aggregate amount by which the Class
B Invested Amount has been reduced pursuant to clauses (c), (d) and (e) of the
definition of "Class B Invested Amount" in Section 2.01 of this Supplement (but
not in excess of the aggregate amount of such reductions which have not been
previously reimbursed) shall be treated as a portion of Available Principal
Collections for such Distribution Date;


(f) an amount equal to Collateral Monthly Interest for such
Distribution Date, plus the amount of any Collateral Monthly Interest previously
due but not distributed to the Collateral Interest Holder on a prior
Distribution Date, plus the amount of any Collateral Additional Interest for
such Distribution Date and any Collateral Additional Interest previously due but
not distributed to the Collateral Interest Holder on a prior Distribution Date,
shall be distributed to the Collateral Interest Holder for application in
accordance with the Loan Agreement;


23





(g) an amount equal to the Monthly Servicing Fee for such
Distribution Date that has not been paid to the Servicer and any Monthly
Servicing Fee due but not paid to the Servicer on a prior Distribution Date
shall be paid to the Servicer;


(h) an amount equal to the Collateral Default Amount, if any,
for such Distribution Date shall be treated as a portion of Available Principal
Collections for such Distribution Date;


(i) an amount equal to the aggregate amount by which the
Collateral Invested Amount has been reduced pursuant to clauses (c), (d) and (e)
of the definition of "Collateral Invested Amount" (but not in excess of the
aggregate amount of such reductions which have not been previously reimbursed)
shall be treated as a portion of Available Principal Collections for such
Distribution Date;


(j) on each Distribution Date from and after the Reserve
Account Funding Date, but prior to the date on which the Reserve Account
terminates pursuant to subsection 4.12(f), an amount up to the excess, if any,
of the Required Reserve Account Amount over the Available Reserve Account Amount
shall be deposited into the Reserve Account;


(k) an amount equal to the aggregate of any other amounts then
required to be applied pursuant to the Loan Agreement (to the extent such
amounts are required to be applied pursuant to the Loan Agreement out of Excess
Spread and Excess Finance Charge Collections) shall be distributed to the
Collateral Interest Holder for application in accordance with the Loan
Agreement; and


(l) the balance, if any, will constitute a portion of Excess
Finance Charge Collections for such Distribution Date and will be available for
allocation to other Series or to the Holders of the Transferor Certificates as
described in Section 4.05 of the Agreement.


Section 4.08. Reallocated Principal Collections. On each
Distribution Date, the Servicer shall apply, or shall cause the Trustee to
apply, Reallocated Principal Collections with respect to such Distribution Date,
to make the following distributions or deposits in the following order of
priority:


(a) an amount equal to the excess, if any, of (i) the Class A
Required Amount, if any, with respect to such Distribution Date over (ii) the
amount of Excess Spread and Excess Finance Charge Collections allocated to
Series 2001-6 with respect to the related Monthly Period shall be distributed by
the Trustee to fund any deficiency pursuant to and in the priority set forth in
subsections 4.05(a)(i), (ii) and (iii); and


(b) an amount equal to the excess, if any, of (i) the Class B
Required Amount, if any, with respect to such Distribution Date over (ii) the
amount of Excess Spread and Excess Finance Charge Collections allocated and
available to the Class B Certificates pursuant to subsections 4.07(c) and (d) on
such Distribution Date shall be applied first to fund any deficiency pursuant to
subsections 4.05(b)(i) and (ii) and then to fund any deficiency pursuant to and
in the priority set forth in subsections 4.07(c) and (d).


On each Distribution Date, the Collateral Invested Amount
shall be reduced by the amount of Reallocated Principal Collections for such
Distribution Date. In the event that such reduction would cause the Collateral
Invested Amount (after giving effect to any Collateral Charge-Offs for such
Distribution Date) to be a negative number, the Collateral Invested Amount

(after giving effect to any Collateral Charge-Offs for such Distribution Date)

shall be reduced to zero and the Class B Invested Amount shall be reduced by the
amount by which the Collateral Invested Amount would have been reduced below
zero. In the event that the reallocation of Reallocated Principal Collections
would cause the Class B Invested Amount (after giving effect to any Class B
Investor Charge-Offs for such Distribution Date) to be a negative number on any
Distribution Date, Reallocated Principal Collections shall be reallocated on
such Distribution Date in an aggregate amount not to exceed the amount which
would cause the Class B Invested Amount (after giving to any Class B Investor
Charge-Offs for such


24





Distribution Date) to be reduced to zero. References to "negative numbers" above
shall be determined without regard to the requirement that the Invested Amount
of a Class not be reduced below zero.


Section 4.09. Excess Finance Charge Collections. Series 2001-6
shall be an Excess Allocation Series. Subject to Section 4.05 of the Agreement,
Excess Finance Charge Collections with respect to the Excess Allocation Series
for any Distribution Date will be allocated to Series 2001-6 in an amount equal
to the product of (x) the aggregate amount of Excess Finance Charge Collections
with respect to all the Excess Allocation Series for such Distribution Date and

(y) a fraction, the numerator of which is the Finance Charge Shortfall for
Series 2001-6 for such Distribution Date and the denominator of which is the
aggregate amount of Finance Charge Shortfalls for all the Excess Allocation
Series for such Distribution Date. The "Finance Charge Shortfall" for Series
2001-6 for any Distribution Date will be equal to the excess, if any, of (a) the
full amount required to be paid, without duplication, pursuant to subsections
4.05(a), 4.05(b) and 4.05(c) and subsections 4.07(a) through (k) on such
Distribution Date over (b) the sum of (i) the Reallocated Investor Finance
Charge Collections, (ii) if such Monthly Period relates to a Distribution Date
with respect to the Controlled Accumulation Period or Early Amortization Period,
the amount of Principal Funding Investment Proceeds, if any, with respect to
such Distribution Date and (iii) the amount of funds, if any, to be withdrawn
from the Reserve Account which, pursuant to subsection 4.12(d), are required to
be included in Class A Available Funds with respect to such Distribution Date.


Section 4.10. Reallocated Investor Finance Charge Collections.


(a) That portion of Group II Investor Finance Charge
Collections for any Distribution Date equal to the amount of Reallocated
Investor Finance Charge Collections for such Distribution Date will be allocated
to Series 2001-6 and will be distributed as set forth in this Supplement.


(b) Reallocated Investor Finance Charge Collections with
respect to any Distribution Date shall equal the sum of (i) the aggregate amount
of Series 2001-6 Monthly Interest, Investor Default Amount, Series 2001-6
Monthly Fees and Series 2001-6 Additional Amounts for such Distribution Date and

(ii) that portion of excess Group II Investor Finance Charge Collections to be
included in Reallocated Investor Finance Charge Collections pursuant to
subsection (c) hereof; provided, however, that if the amount of Group II
Investor Finance Charge Collections for such Distribution Date is less than the
sum of (w) Group II Investor Monthly Interest, (x) Group II Investor Default
Amount, (y) Group II Investor Monthly Fees and (z) Group II Investor Additional
Amounts, then Reallocated Investor Finance Charge Collections shall equal the
sum of the following amounts for such Distribution Date:


(A) The product of (I) Group II Investor Finance
Charge Collections (up to the amount of Group II Investor
Monthly Interest) and (II) a fraction, the numerator of which
is Series 2001-6 Monthly Interest and the denominator of which
is Group II Investor Monthly Interest;


(B) the product of (I) Group II Investor Finance
Charge Collections less the amount of Group II Investor
Monthly Interest (up to the Group II Investor Default Amount)
and (II) a fraction, the numerator of which is the Investor
Default Amount and the denominator of which is the Group II
Investor Default Amount;


(C) the product of (I) Group II Investor Finance
Charge Collections less the amount of Group II Investor
Monthly Interest and the Group II Investor Default Amount (up
to Group II Investor Monthly Fees) and (II) a fraction, the
numerator of which is Series 2001-6 Monthly Fees and the
denominator of which is Group II Investor Monthly Fees; and


25





(D) the product of (I) Group II Investor Finance
Charge Collections less the sum of (i) Group II Investor
Monthly Interest, (ii) the Group II Investor Default Amount
and (iii) Group II Investor Monthly Fees and (II) a fraction,
the numerator of which is Series 2001-6 Additional Amounts and
the denominator of which is Group II Investor Additional
Amounts.


(c) If the amount of Group II Investor Finance Charge
Collections for such Distribution Date exceeds the sum of (i) Group II Investor
Monthly Interest, (ii) Group II Investor Default Amount, (iii) Group II Investor
Monthly Fees and (iv) Group II Investor Additional Amounts, then Reallocated
Investor Finance Charge Collections for such Distribution Date shall include an
amount equal to the product of (x) the amount of such excess and (y) a fraction,
the numerator of which is the Invested Amount as of the last day of the second
preceding Monthly Period (or, for Series 2001-6 only, with respect to the first
Distribution Date, as of the Closing Date) and the denominator of which is the
sum of such Invested Amount and the aggregate invested amounts for all other
Series included in Group II as of such last day (or, for Series 2001-6 only,
with respect to the first Distribution Date, as of the Closing Date).


Section 4.11. Shared Principal Collections. Subject to Section
4.04 of the Agreement, Shared Principal Collections for any Distribution Date
will be allocated to Series 2001-6 in an amount equal to the product of (x) the
aggregate amount of Shared Principal Collections with respect to all Principal
Sharing Series for such Distribution Date and (y) a fraction, the numerator of
which is the Series 2001-6 Principal Shortfall for such Distribution Date and
the denominator of which is the aggregate amount of Principal Shortfalls for all
the Series which are Principal Sharing Series for such Distribution Date. The
"Series 2001-6 Principal Shortfall" will be equal to (a) for any Distribution
Date with respect to the Revolving Period, zero, (b) for any Distribution Date
with respect to the Controlled Accumulation Period, the excess, if any, of the
Controlled Deposit Amount with respect to such Distribution Date over the amount
of Available Principal Collections for such Distribution Date (excluding any
portion thereof attributable to Shared Principal Collections), and (c) for any
Distribution Date with respect to the Early Amortization Period, the excess, if
any, of the Invested Amount over the amount of Available Principal Collections
for such Distribution Date (excluding any portion thereof attributable to Shared
Principal Collections).


Section 4.12. Reserve Account.


(a) The Servicer shall establish and maintain, in the name of
the Trustee, on behalf of the Trust, for the benefit of the Class A
Certificateholders and the Collateral Interest Holder, an Eligible Deposit
Account (the "Reserve Account") bearing a designation clearly indicating that
the funds deposited therein are held for the benefit of the Class A
Certificateholders and the Collateral Interest Holder. The Reserve Account shall
initially be established with The Bank of New York. The Trustee shall possess
all right, title and interest in all funds on deposit from time to time in the
Reserve Account and in all proceeds thereof. The Reserve Account shall be under
the sole dominion and control of the Trustee for the benefit of the Class A
Certificateholders and the Collateral Interest Holder. If at any time the
Reserve Account ceases to be an Eligible Deposit Account, the Trustee (or the
Servicer on its behalf) shall within 10 Business Days (or such longer period,
not to exceed 30 calendar days, as to which each Rating Agency shall consent)
establish a new Reserve Account meeting the conditions specified above as an
Eligible Deposit Account, and shall transfer any cash or any investments to such
new Reserve Account. The Trustee, at the direction of the Servicer, shall (i)
make withdrawals from the Reserve Account from time to time in an amount up to
the Available Reserve Account Amount at such time, for the purposes set forth in
this Supplement, and (ii) on each Distribution Date (from and after the Reserve
Account Funding Date) prior to the termination of the Reserve Account make a
deposit into the Reserve Account in the amount specified in, and otherwise in
accordance with, subsection 4.07(j).


26





(b) Funds on deposit in the Reserve Account shall be invested
at the written direction of the Servicer by the Trustee in Eligible Investments.
Funds on deposit in the Reserve Account on any Transfer Date, after giving
effect to any withdrawals from the Reserve Account on such Transfer Date, shall
be invested in such investments that will mature so that such funds will be
available for withdrawal on or prior to the following Transfer Date. No such
Eligible Investment shall be disposed of prior to its maturity; provided,
however, that the Trustee may sell, liquidate or dispose of any such Eligible
Investment before its maturity, at the written direction of the Servicer, if
such sale, liquidation or disposal would not result in a loss of all or part of
the principal portion of such Eligible Investment or if, prior to the maturity
of such Eligible Investment, a default occurs in the payment of principal,
interest or any other amount with respect to such Eligible Investment. On each
Distribution Date, all interest and earnings (net of losses and investment
expenses) accrued since the preceding Distribution Date on funds on deposit in
the Reserve Account shall be retained in the Reserve Account (to the extent that
the Available Reserve Account Amount is less than the Required Reserve Account
Amount) and the balance, if any, shall be deposited in the Collection Account
and treated as collections of Finance Charge Receivables allocable to Series
2001-6. For purposes of determining the availability of funds or the balance in
the Reserve Account for any reason under this Supplement, except as otherwise
provided in the preceding sentence, investment earnings on such funds shall be
deemed not to be available or on deposit.


(c) On the Determination Date preceding each Distribution Date
with respect to the Controlled Accumulation Period and the first Special Payment
Date, the Servicer shall calculate the "Reserve Draw Amount" which shall be
equal to the excess, if any, of the Covered Amount with respect to such
Distribution Date or Special Payment Date over the Principal Funding Account
Investment Proceeds with respect to such Distribution Date or Special Payment
Date; provided, that such amount will be reduced to the extent that funds
otherwise would be available for deposit in the Reserve Account under subsection
4.07(j) with respect to such Distribution Date or Special Payment Date.


(d) In the event that for any Distribution Date the Reserve
Draw Amount is greater than zero, the Reserve Draw Amount, up to the Available
Reserve Account Amount, shall be withdrawn from the Reserve Account on the
related Transfer Date by the Trustee (acting in accordance with the instructions
of the Servicer), deposited into the Collection Account and included in Class A
Available Funds for such Distribution Date.


(e) In the event that the Reserve Account Surplus on any
Distribution Date, after giving effect to all deposits to and withdrawals from
the Reserve Account with respect to such Distribution Date, is greater than
zero, the Trustee, acting in accordance with the written instructions of the
Servicer, shall withdraw from the Reserve Account, and pay to the Collateral
Interest Holder for application in accordance with the Loan Agreement, an amount
equal to such Reserve Account Surplus.


(f) Upon the earliest to occur of (i) the day on which the
Invested Amount is paid in full to the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders, (ii) if
the Controlled Accumulation Period has not commenced, the occurrence of a
Pay-Out Event with respect to Series 2001-6, (iii) if the Controlled
Accumulation Period has commenced, the earlier of the first Special Payment Date
and the Expected Final Payment Date and (iv) the termination of the Trust
pursuant to the Agreement, the Trustee, acting in accordance with the
instructions of the Servicer, after the prior payment of all amounts owing to
the Class A Certificateholders which are payable from the Reserve Account as
provided herein, shall withdraw from the Reserve Account and pay to the
Collateral Interest Holder for application in accordance with the Loan Agreement
all amounts, if any, on deposit in the Reserve Account and the Reserve Account
shall be deemed to have terminated for purposes of this Supplement.


Section 4.13. Investment Instructions.


(a) Any investment instructions required to be given to the
Trustee pursuant to the terms hereof must be given to the Trustee no later than
10:30 a.m. (New York City time) on the date such


27





investment is to be made. In the event the Trustee receives such investment
instruction later than such time, the Trustee may, but shall have no obligation
to, make such investment. In the event the Trustee is unable to make an
investment required in an investment instruction received by the Trustee after
10:30 a.m. (New York City time) on such day, such investment shall be made by
the Trustee on the next succeeding Business Day. In no event shall the Trustee
be liable for any investment not made pursuant to investment instructions
received after 10:30 a.m. (New York City time) on the day such investment is
requested to be made.


(b) The Trustee shall hold each Eligible Investment that
constitutes investment property through a securities intermediary, which
securities intermediary shall agree with the Trustee that (i) such investment
property at all times shall be credited to a securities account of the Trustee,

(ii) all property credited to such securities account shall be treated as a
financial asset, (iii) such securities intermediary shall treat the Trustee as
entitled to exercise the rights that comprise each financial asset credited to
such securities account, (iv) such securities intermediary shall comply with
entitlement orders originated by the Trustee without the further consent of any
other person or entity, (v) such securities intermediary shall not agree with
any person or entity other than the Trustee to comply with entitlement orders
originated by any person or entity other than the Trustee, (vi) such securities
account and all property credited thereto shall not be subject to any lien,
security interest, right of set-off, or encumbrance in favor of such securities
intermediary or anyone claiming through such securities intermediary (other than
the Trustee), and (vii) such agreement between such securities intermediary and
the Trustee shall be governed by the laws of the State of New York. The Trustee
shall maintain possession of each other Eligible Investment in the State of New
York, separate and apart from all other property held by the Trustee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Supplement, the Trustee shall not
hold any Eligible Investment through an agent except as expressly permitted by
this Section 4.13(b). Each term used in this Section 4.13(b) and defined in the
New York Uniform Commercial Code shall have the meaning set forth in the New
York Uniform Commercial Code.


Section 4.14. Determination of LIBOR.


(a) On each LIBOR Determination Date, the Trustee will
determine LIBOR for the related Interest Accrual Period, which shall be the rate
for deposits in United States dollars for a period equal to one month
(commencing on the first day of such Interest Accrual Period) that appears on
Telerate Page 3750 as of 11:00 a.m., London time, on such date. Upon such
determination, the Trustee shall notify the Servicer of LIBOR for such LIBOR
Determination Date. If such rate does not appear on Telerate Page 3750, the rate
for the LIBOR Determination Date will be determined on the basis of the rates at
which deposits in United States dollars are offered by the Reference Banks at
approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, on that day to prime banks in the London
interbank market for a period equal to one month (commencing on the first day of
such Interest Accrual Period). The Servicer will request the principal London
office of each of the Reference Banks to provide a quotation of its rate. If at
least two such quotations are provided, the rate for that LIBOR Determination
Date will be the arithmetic mean of the quotations. If fewer than two quotations
are provided as requested, the rate for that LIBOR Determination Date will be
the arithmetic mean of the rates quoted by major banks in New York City,
selected by the Servicer, at approximately 11:00 a.m., New York City time, on
that day for loans in United States dollars to leading European banks for a
period equal to one month (commencing on the first day of such Interest Accrual
Period). If the banks selected by the Servicer are not quoting rates as provided
in the immediately preceding sentence, LIBOR for such Interest Accrual Period
will be LIBOR in effect for the immediately preceding Interest Accrual Period.


(b) The Servicer shall determine, and promptly notify the
Trustee of, the Class A Certificate Rate and the Class B Certificate Rate for
the applicable Interest Accrual Period. The Class A Certificate Rate and Class B
Certificate Rate applicable to the then current and the immediately preceding
Interest Accrual Periods may be obtained by any Investor Certificateholder by
telephoning the Trustee at its Corporate Trust Office at (212) 815-5738.


28





(c) On each LIBOR Determination Date prior to 3:00 p.m., New
York City time, the Trustee shall send to the Servicer by facsimile,
notification of LIBOR for the following Interest Accrual Period.



ARTICLE V



Distributions and Reports to

Series 2001-6 Certificateholders


Section 5.01. Distributions.


(a) On each Distribution Date, the Paying Agent shall
distribute to each Class A Certificateholder of record on the related Record
Date (other than as provided in Section 12.02 of the Agreement) such Class A
Certificateholder's pro rata share of the amounts held by the Paying Agent that
are allocated and available on such Distribution Date to pay interest on the
Class A Certificates pursuant to this Supplement.


(b) On each Special Payment Date and on the Expected Final
Payment Date, the Paying Agent shall distribute (in accordance with the
Certificate delivered by the Servicer pursuant to Section 3.04(b) of the
Agreement) to each Class A Certificateholder of record on the related Record
Date (other than as provided in Section 12.02 of the Agreement) such Class A
Certificateholder's pro rata share of the amounts on deposit in the Principal
Funding Account or otherwise held by the Paying Agent that are allocated and
available on such date to pay principal of the Class A Certificates pursuant to
this Supplement up to a maximum amount on any such date equal to the Class A
Invested Amount on such date (unless there has been an optional repurchase of
the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders' Interest pursuant to Section 10.01 of the
Agreement, in which event the foregoing limitation will not apply).


(c) On each Distribution Date, the Paying Agent shall
distribute (in accordance with the Certificate delivered by the Servicer
pursuant to Section 3.04(b) of the Agreement) to each Class B Certificateholder
of record on the related Record Date (other than as provided in Section 12.02 of
the Agreement) such Class B Certificateholder's pro rata share of the amounts
held by the Paying Agent that are allocated and available on such Distribution
Date to pay interest on the Class B Certificates pursuant to this Supplement.


(d) On each Special Payment Date, and on the Expected Final
Payment Date, the Paying Agent shall distribute (in accordance with the
Certificate delivered by the Servicer pursuant to Section 3.04(b) of the
Agreement) to each Class B Certificateholder of record on the related Record
Date (other than as provided in Section 12.02 of the Agreement) such Class B
Certificateholder's pro rata share of the amounts on deposit in the Principal
Funding Account or otherwise held by the Paying Agent that are allocated and
available on such date to pay principal of the Class B Certificates pursuant to
this Supplement up to a maximum amount on any such date equal to the Class B
Invested Amount on such date (unless there has been an optional repurchase of
the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders' Interest pursuant to Section 10.01 of the
Agreement, in which event the foregoing limitation will not apply).


(e) The distributions to be made pursuant to this Section 5.01
are subject to the provisions of Sections 2.06, 9.02, 10.01 and 12.02 of the
Agreement and Sections 8.01 and 8.02 of this Supplement.


(f) Except as provided in Section 12.02 of the Agreement with
respect to a final distribution, distributions to Series 2001-6
Certificateholders hereunder shall be made by check mailed to each Series 2001-6
Certificateholder at such Series 2001-6 Certificateholder's address appearing in
the Certificate Register without presentation or surrender of any Series 2001-6
Certificate or the making of any notation thereon; provided, however, that with
respect to Series 2001-6 Certificates registered in the


29





name of a Clearing Agency, such distributions shall be made to such Clearing
Agency in immediately available funds.


Section 5.02. Reports and Statements to Series 2001-6
Certificateholders.


(a) On each Distribution Date, the Paying Agent, on behalf of
the Trustee, shall forward to each Series 2001-6 Certificateholder a statement
substantially in the form of Exhibit C to this Supplement prepared by the
Servicer and delivered to the Paying Agent.


(b) Not later than each Determination Date, the Servicer shall
deliver to the Trustee, the Paying Agent, each Rating Agency and the Collateral
Interest Holder (i) a statement substantially in the form of Exhibit C to this
Supplement prepared by the Servicer and (ii) a certificate of a Servicing
Officer substantially in the form of Exhibit D.


(c) A copy of each statement or certificate provided pursuant
to paragraph (a) or (b) may be obtained by any Series 2001-6 Certificateholder
or any Certificate Owner thereof by a request in writing to the Servicer.


(d) On or before January 31 of each calendar year, beginning
with calendar year 2002, the Paying Agent, on behalf of the Trustee, shall
furnish or cause to be furnished to each Person who at any time during the
preceding calendar year was a Series 2001-6 Certificateholder, a statement
prepared by the Servicer containing the information which is required to be
contained in the statement to Series 2001-6 Certificateholders, as set forth in
paragraph (a) above aggregated for such calendar year or the applicable portion
thereof during which such Person was a Series 2001-6 Certificateholder, together
with other information as is required to be provided by an issuer of
indebtedness under the Code. Such obligation of the Servicer shall be deemed to
have been satisfied to the extent that substantially comparable information
shall be provided by the Paying Agent pursuant to any requirements of the Code
as from time to time in effect.



ARTICLE VI




Pay-Out Events



Section 6.01. Pay-Out Events. If any one of the following
events shall occur with respect to the Series 2001-6 Certificates:


(a) the occurrence of an Insolvency Event relating to any
Transferor or other holder of the Original Transferor Certificate;


(b) the Trust becomes an investment company within the meaning
of the Investment Company Act;


(c) failure on the part of any Transferor (i) to make any
payment or deposit required by the terms of the Agreement or this Supplement on
or before the date occurring five Business Days after the date such payment or
deposit is required to be made therein or herein or (ii) duly to observe or
perform any other covenants or agreements of the Transferors set forth in the
Agreement or this Supplement, which failure has a material adverse effect on the
Series 2001-6 Certificateholders and which continues unremedied for a period of
60 days after the date on which written notice of such failure, requiring the
same to be remedied, shall have been given to such Transferor by the Trustee, or
to the Transferors and the Trustee by any Holder of the Series 2001-6
Certificates;


(d) any representation or warranty made by any Transferor in
the Agreement or this Supplement, or any information contained in a computer
file or microfiche list required to be delivered by


30





any Transferor pursuant to Section 2.01 or subsection 2.08(f) of the Agreement
shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or when
delivered, which continues to be incorrect in any material respect for a period
of 60 days after the date on which written notice of such failure, requiring the
same to be remedied, shall have been given to such Transferor by the Trustee, or
to such Transferor and the Trustee by any Holder of the Series 2001-6
Certificates and as a result of which the interests of the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders are materially and adversely affected for such period;
provided, however, that a Pay-Out Event pursuant to this subsection 6.01(d)
shall not be deemed to have occurred hereunder if a Transferor has accepted
reassignment of the related Receivable, or all of such Receivables, if
applicable, during such period (or such longer period not to exceed an
additional 60 days as the Trustee may specify) in accordance with the provisions
of the Agreement;


(e) a failure by a Transferor to convey Receivables in
Additional Accounts or Participation Interests to the Trust within five Business
Days after the day on which it is required to convey such Receivables or
Participation Interests pursuant to subsection 2.09(a) of the Agreement;


(f) any Servicer Default which would have an Adverse Effect
shall occur;


(g) the average Series Adjusted Portfolio Yield for any three
consecutive Monthly Periods is reduced to a rate which is less than the average
of the Base Rates for such period;


(h) the Class A Invested Amount and the Class B Invested
Amount shall not be paid in full on the Expected Final Payment Date; or


(i) a Transfer Restriction Event shall occur;


then, in the case of any event described in subparagraph (c), (d) or (f), after
the applicable grace period, if any, set forth in such subparagraphs, either the
Trustee or the Holders of Series 2001-6 Certificates evidencing more than 50% of
the aggregate unpaid principal amount of Series 2001-6 Certificates by notice
then given in writing to the Transferors and the Servicer (and to the Trustee if
given by the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders) may declare that a Pay-Out Event
has occurred with respect to Series 2001-6 as of the date of such notice, and,
in the case of any event described in subparagraph (a), (b), (e), (g), (h) or

(i), a Pay-Out Event shall occur with respect to Series 2001-6 without any
notice or other action on the part of the Trustee or the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders immediately upon the occurrence of such event.



ARTICLE VII




Optional Repurchase; Series Termination



Section 7.01. Optional Repurchase.


(a) On any day occurring on or after the date on which the
Invested Amount is reduced to 5% or less of the Initial Invested Amount, the
Transferors shall have the option to purchase the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders' Interest, at a purchase price equal to (i) if such day is a
Distribution Date, the Reassignment Amount for such Distribution Date or (ii) if
such day is not a Distribution Date, the Reassignment Amount for the
Distribution Date following such day. If, on the date on which the Transferors
exercise such option, the long-term unsecured debt obligations of either
Transferor purchasing the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders' Interest is not
rated at least in the third highest rating category by the Rating Agency, such
Transferor shall deliver to the Trustee, with a copy to the Rating Agency, an
Officer's Certificate which shall have attached to it the relevant fraudulent
conveyance statute, if any, and set forth the factual basis for a conclusion
that the exercise of such optional repurchase would not constitute a fraudulent
conveyance of such Transferor.


31





(b) The Transferors shall give the Servicer and the Trustee at
least 30 days prior written notice of the date on which the Transferors intend
to exercise such purchase option. Not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time,
on such day the Transferors shall deposit the Reassignment Amount into the
Collection Account in immediately available funds. Such purchase option is
subject to payment in full of the Reassignment Amount. Following the deposit of
the Reassignment Amount into the Collection Amount in accordance with the
foregoing, the Invested Amount for Series 2001-6 shall be reduced to zero and
the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders shall have no further interest in the
Receivables. The Reassignment Amount shall be distributed as set forth in
subsection 8.01(b).


Section 7.02. Series Termination.


(a) If, on the October 2008 Distribution Date, the Invested
Amount (after giving effect to all changes therein on such date) would be
greater than zero, the Servicer, on behalf of the Trustee, shall, within the
40-day period which begins on such Distribution Date, solicit bids for the sale
of Principal Receivables and the related Finance Charge Receivables (or
interests therein) in an amount equal to the Invested Amount at the close of
business on the last day of the Monthly Period preceding the Series 2001-6
Termination Date (after giving effect to all distributions required to be made
on the Series 2001-6 Termination Date, except pursuant to this Section 7.02).
Such bids shall require that such sale shall (subject to subsection 7.02(b))
occur on the Series 2001-6 Termination Date. The Transferors and the Collateral
Interest Holder shall be entitled to participate in, and to receive from the
Trustee a copy of each other bid submitted in connection with, such bidding
process. Each Transferor and its Affiliates shall be permitted to bid for the
Receivables and, in addition, shall have the right to match any bid and to
purchase the Receivables at such matched price if such matched price shall be
the highest bid price received by the Trustee.


(b) The Servicer, on behalf of the Trustee, shall sell such
Receivables (or interests therein) on the Series 2001-6 Termination Date to the
bidder who made the highest cash purchase offer. The proceeds of any such sale
shall be treated as Collections on the Receivables allocated to the Series
2001-6 Certificateholders pursuant to the Agreement and this Supplement;
provided, however, that the Servicer shall determine conclusively the amount of
such proceeds which are allocable to Finance Charge Receivables and the amount
of such proceeds which are allocable to Principal Receivables. During the period
from the October 2008 Distribution Date to the Series 2001-6 Termination Date,
the Servicer shall continue to collect payments on the Receivables and allocate
and deposit such Collections in accordance with the provisions of the Agreement
and the Supplements.



ARTICLE VIII




Final Distributions



Section 8.01. Sale of Receivables or Certificateholders'
Interest pursuant to Section 2.06 or 10.01 of the Agreement and Section 7.01 or
7.02 of this Supplement.


(a) (i) The amount to be paid by the Transferors with respect
to Series 2001-6 in connection with a reassignment of
Receivables to the Transferors pursuant to Section 2.06 of the
Agreement shall equal the Reassignment Amount for the first
Distribution Date following the Monthly Period in which the
reassignment obligation arises under the Agreement.


(ii) The amount to be paid by the Transferors with
respect to Series 2001-6 in connection with a repurchase of
the Certificateholders' Interest pursuant to Section 10.01 of
the Agreement shall equal the sum of (x) the Reassignment
Amount for the Distribution Date of such repurchase and (y)
the sum of (A) the excess, if any, of (I) a price equivalent
to the average of bids quoted on the Record Date preceding the
date of


32





repurchase or, if not a Business Day, on the next succeeding
Business Day by at least two recognized dealers selected by
the Trustee for the purchase by such dealers of a security
which is similar to the Class A Certificates with a remaining
maturity approximately equal to the remaining maturity of the
Class A Certificates and rated by each Rating Agency in the
rating category originally assigned to the Class A
Certificates over (II) the portion of the Reassignment Amount
attributable to the Class A Certificates and (B) the excess,
if any, of (I) a price equivalent to the average of bids
quoted on such Record Date, or if not a Business Day, on the
next succeeding Business Day by at least two recognized
dealers selected by the Trustee for the purchase by such
dealers of a security which is similar to the Class B
Certificates with a remaining maturity approximately equal to
the remaining maturity of the Class B Certificates and rated
by each Rating Agency in the rating category originally
assigned to the Class B Certificates over (II) the portion of
the Reassignment Amount attributable to the Class B
Certificates.


(b) With respect to the Reassignment Amount deposited into the
Collection Account pursuant to Section 7.01 or any amounts allocable to the
Series 2001-6 Certificateholders' Interest deposited into the Collection Account
pursuant to Section 7.02, the Trustee shall, in accordance with the written
direction of the Servicer, not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the
related Distribution Date, make deposits or distributions of the following
amounts (in the priority set forth below and, in each case after giving effect
to any deposits and distributions otherwise to be made on such date) in
immediately available funds: (i) (x) the Class A Invested Amount on such
Distribution Date will be distributed to the Paying Agent for payment to the
Class A Certificateholders and (y) an amount equal to the sum of (A) Class A
Monthly Interest for such Distribution Date, (B) any Class A Monthly Interest
previously due but not distributed to the Class A Certificateholders on a prior
Distribution Date and (C) the amount of Class A Additional Interest, if any, for
such Distribution Date and any Class A Additional Interest previously due but
not distributed to the Class A Certificateholders on any prior Distribution
Date, will be distributed to the Paying Agent for payment to the Class A
Certificateholders, (ii) (x) the Class B Invested Amount on such Distribution
Date will be distributed to the Paying Agent for payment to the Class B
Certificateholders and (y) an amount equal to the sum of (A) Class B Monthly
Interest for such Distribution Date, (B) any Class B Monthly Interest previously
due but not distributed to the Class B Certificateholders on a prior
Distribution Date and (C) the amount of Class B Additional Interest, if any, for
such Distribution Date and any Class B Additional Interest previously due but
not distributed to the Class B Certificateholders on any prior Distribution
Date, will be distributed to the Paying Agent for payment to the Class B
Certificateholders and (iii) the balance, if any, will be distributed to the
Collateral Interest Holder for application in accordance with the Loan
Agreement.


(c) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this
Supplement or the Agreement, all amounts distributed to the Paying Agent
pursuant to subsection 8.01(b) for payment to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders shall be deemed distributed in full to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders on the date on which such funds are distributed to the Paying
Agent pursuant to this Section and shall be deemed to be a final distribution
pursuant to Section 12.02 of the Agreement.


Section 8.02. Distribution of Proceeds of Sale, Disposition or
Liquidation of the Receivables pursuant to Section 9.01 of the Agreement.


(a) Not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the
Distribution Date following the date on which the Insolvency Proceeds are
deposited into the Collection Account pursuant to subsection 9.01(b) of the
Agreement, the Trustee shall in accordance with the written direction of the
Servicer (in the following priority and, in each case, after giving effect to
any deposits and distributions otherwise to be made on such Distribution Date)

(i) deduct an amount equal to the Class A Invested Amount on such Distribution
Date from the portion of the Insolvency Proceeds allocated to Series 2001-6
Allocable Principal Collections and distribute such amount to the Paying Agent
for payment to the Class A Certificateholders, provided that the amount of such
distribution shall not exceed the product of (x) the


33





portion of the Insolvency Proceeds allocated to Series 2001-6 Allocable
Principal Collections and (y) the Principal Allocation Percentage with respect
to the related Monthly Period, (ii) deduct an amount equal to the Class B
Invested Amount on such Distribution Date from the portion of the Insolvency
Proceeds allocated to Series 2001-6 Allocable Principal Collections and
distribute such amount to the Paying Agent for payment to the Class B
Certificateholders, provided that the amount of such distribution shall not
exceed (x) the product of (A) the portion of such Insolvency Proceeds allocated
to Series 2001-6 Allocable Principal Collections and (B) the Principal
Allocation Percentage with respect to the related Monthly Period minus (y) the
amount distributed to the Paying Agent pursuant to clause (i) of this sentence
and (iii) deduct an amount equal to the Collateral Invested Amount, if any, on
such Distribution Date from the portion of the Insolvency Proceeds allocated to
Series 2001-6 Allocable Principal Collections and distribute such amount to the
Collateral Interest Holder for application in accordance with the Loan
Agreement, provided that the amount of such distribution shall not exceed (x)
the product of (1) the portion of the Insolvency Proceeds allocated to Series
2001-6 Allocable Principal Collections and (2) the Principal Allocation
Percentage with respect to such Monthly Period minus (y) the amounts distributed
to the Paying Agent pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) of this sentence. To the
extent that the product of (A) the portion of the Insolvency Proceeds allocated
to Series 2001-6 Allocable Principal Collections and (B) the Principal
Allocation Percentage with respect to the related Monthly Period exceeds the
aggregate amounts distributed to the Paying Agent pursuant to the preceding
sentence, the excess shall be allocated to the Transferor's Interest and shall
be released to the Holders of the Transferor Certificates on such Distribution
Date.


(b) Not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on such
Distribution Date, the Trustee shall in accordance with the written direction of
the Servicer (in the following priority and, in each case, after giving effect
to any deposits and distributions otherwise to be made on such Distribution
Date) (i) deduct an amount equal to the sum of (w) Class A Monthly Interest for
such Distribution Date, (x) any Class A Monthly Interest previously due but not
distributed to the Class A Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date and

(y) the amount of Class A Additional Interest, if any, for such Distribution
Date and any Class A Additional Interest previously due but not distributed to
the Class A Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date from the portion of
the Insolvency Proceeds allocated to Collections of Finance Charge Receivables
and distribute such amount to the Paying Agent for payment to the Class A
Certificateholders, provided that the amount of such distribution shall not
exceed the product of (x) the portion of the Insolvency Proceeds allocated to
Series 2001-6 Allocable Finance Charge Collections, (y) the Floating Allocation
Percentage with respect to the related Monthly Period and (z) the Class A
Floating Percentage with respect to such Monthly Period and (ii) deduct an
amount equal to the sum of (w) Class B Monthly Interest for such Distribution
Date, (x) Class B Monthly Interest previously due but not distributed to the
Class B Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date and (y) the amount of
Class B Additional Interest, if any, for such Distribution Date and any Class B
Additional Interest previously due but not distributed to the Class B
Certificateholders on a prior Distribution Date from the portion of the
Insolvency Proceeds allocated to Series 2001-6 Allocable Finance Charge
Collections and distribute such amount to the Paying Agent for payment to the
Class B Certificateholders, provided that the amount of such distribution shall
not exceed the product of (x) the portion of the Insolvency Proceeds allocated
to Series 2001-6 Allocable Finance Charge Collections, (y) the Floating
Allocation Percentage with respect to the related Monthly Period and (z) the
Class B Floating Percentage with respect to such Monthly Period. To the extent
that the product of (A) the portion of the Insolvency Proceeds allocated to
Series 2001-6 Allocable Finance Charge Collections and (B) the Floating
Allocation Percentage with respect to the related Monthly Period exceeds the
aggregate amount distributed to the Paying Agent pursuant to the preceding
sentence, the excess shall be released to the Collateral Interest Holder for
application by the Collateral Interest Holder in accordance with the Loan
Agreement.


(c) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this
Supplement or the Agreement, all amounts distributed to the Paying Agent
pursuant to this Section for payment to the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders
shall be distributed in full to the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders on the date
on which


34





funds are distributed to the Paying Agent pursuant to this Section and shall be
deemed to be a final distribution pursuant to Section 12.02 of the Agreement.



ARTICLE IX




Miscellaneous Provisions



Section 9.01. Ratification of Agreement. As supplemented by
this Supplement, the Agreement is in all respects ratified and confirmed and the
Agreement as so supplemented by this Supplement shall be read, taken and
construed as one and the same instrument.


Section 9.02. Counterparts. This Supplement may be executed in
two or more counterparts, and by different parties on separate counterparts,
each of which shall be an original, but all of which shall constitute one and
the same instrument.


Section 9.03. Governing Law. THIS SUPPLEMENT SHALL BE

CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, WITHOUT
REFERENCE TO ITS CONFLICT OF LAW PROVISIONS, AND THE OBLIGATIONS, RIGHTS AND
REMEDIES OF THE PARTIES HEREUNDER SHALL BE DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUCH
LAWS.


Section 9.04. Certain Accounting Related Amendments. In
addition to being subject to amendment pursuant to any other provisions relating
to amendments in either the Agreement or this Supplement, the Agreement or this
Supplement will be amended by the Transferors without the consent of the
Servicer, the Trustee or any Investor Certificateholder to account for the
transfer of assets as sales in accordance with FASB Statement No. 140, including
providing for the transfer of receivables from American Express Centurion Bank
to a bankruptcy-remote special purpose entity and from that entity to the trust;
provided that the Transferors shall have delivered a Tax Opinion on the date of
such amendment. Promptly after the effectiveness of any amendment pursuant to
this Section 9.04, the Transferors shall deliver a copy of such amendment to
each of the Servicer, the Trustee and each Rating Agency.


[The signature page follows this page.]


35





IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have caused this
Supplement to be duly executed and delivered by their respective duly authorized
officers on the day and year first above written.



AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES

FINANCING CORPORATION II,


as a Transferor,






By:    /s/ Leslie R. Scharfstein
       -------------------------------------------
       Name:  Leslie R. Scharfstein
       Title: President








AMERICAN EXPRESS CENTURION BANK,


as a Transferor,






By:    /s/ Maureen A. Ryan
       -------------------------------------------
       Name:  Maureen A. Ryan
       Title: Assistant Treasurer








AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED

SERVICES COMPANY, INC.,


as the Servicer,






By:    /s/ Jay B. Stevelman
       -------------------------------------------
       Name:  Jay B. Stevelman
       Title: Senior Vice President and Treasurer








THE BANK OF NEW YORK,


as Trustee,






By:    /s/ Catherine Cerilles
       -------------------------------------------
       Name:  Catherine Cerilles
       Title: Assistant Vice President







[Signature page - Series 2001-6 Supplement]











                           FORM OF CLASS A CERTIFICATE               EXHIBIT A-1
                           ---------------------------               -----------



REGISTERED                                                       $__________ 1/

No. R-____________                                        CUSIP No._____________








Unless this Class A Certificate is presented by an authorized
representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation ("DTC"),
to American Express Centurion Bank, American Express Receivables Financing
Corporation II or their agent for registration of transfer, exchange or payment,
and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such
other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any
payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an
authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR
VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered
owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.



AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST




SERIES 2001-6




CLASS A FLOATING RATE ASSET BACKED CERTIFICATE



Expected Final Payment Date:

The May 2006 Distribution Date


Each $1,000 minimum denomination represents a
1/577,500ths undivided interest
in Class A of the



AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST, SERIES 2001-6



Evidencing an undivided interest in certain assets of a trust, the corpus of
which consists primarily of an interest in receivables generated from time to
time in the ordinary course of business in a portfolio of credit and charge
accounts serviced by



AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED SERVICES COMPANY, INC.,



and other assets and interests constituting Trust Assets under the Pooling and
Servicing Agreement referred to below.


(Not an interest in or obligation of American Express Travel Related Services
Company, Inc., American Express Centurion Bank, American Express Receivables
Financing Corporation II or any of their respective affiliates)




1 /      Denominations of $1,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess
thereof.





This certifies that CEDE & CO. (the "Class A Certificateholder") is the
registered owner of a fractional undivided interest in certain assets of a trust
(the "Trust") created pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as
of May 16, 1996 (as amended and supplemented, the "Agreement"), as supplemented
by the Series 2001-6 Supplement dated as of June 12, 2001 (as amended and
supplemented, the "Supplement"), among American Express Centurion Bank and
American Express Receivables Financing Corporation II, as transferors (together,
the "Transferors"), American Express Travel Related Services Company, Inc., as
servicer, and The Bank of New York, a New York banking corporation, as trustee
(the "Trustee"). The corpus of the Trust consists of (i) the Transferors'
ownership interest in a portfolio of receivables (the "Receivables") existing in
credit and charge accounts identified under the Agreement from time to time (the
"Accounts"), (ii) all Receivables generated under the Accounts from time to time
thereafter, (iii) funds collected or to be collected from cardmembers in respect
of the Receivables, (iv) all funds which are from time to time on deposit in the
Collection Account, the Special Funding Account and any other Series Accounts
and (v) all other assets and interests constituting the Trust. The Holder of
this Certificate is entitled to the benefits of the subordination of the Class B
Certificates and the Collateral Interest to the extent provided in the
Supplement. Although a summary of certain provisions of the Agreement and the
Supplement is set forth below and in the Summary of Terms and Conditions
attached hereto and made a part hereof, this Class A Certificate does not
purport to summarize the Agreement and the Supplement and reference is made to
the Agreement and the Supplement for information with respect to the interests,
rights, benefits, obligations, proceeds and duties evidenced hereby and the
rights, duties and obligations of the Trustee. A copy of the Agreement and the
Supplement (without schedules) may be requested from the Trustee by writing to
the Trustee at the Corporate Trust Office. To the extent not defined herein, the
capitalized terms used herein have the meanings ascribed to them in the
Agreement or the Supplement, as applicable.


This Class A Certificate is issued under and is subject to the
terms, provisions and conditions of the Agreement and the Supplement, to which
Agreement and Supplement, each as amended and supplemented from time to time,
the Class A Certificateholder by virtue of the acceptance hereof assents and is
bound.


It is the intent of the Transferors and the Class A
Certificateholder that, for federal, state and local income and franchise tax
purposes, the Class A Certificates will qualify as indebtedness of the
Transferors secured by the Receivables. The Class A Certificateholder, by the
acceptance of this Class A Certificate, agrees to treat this Class A Certificate
for federal, state and local income and franchise tax purposes as debt of the
Transferors.


In general, payments of principal with respect to the Class A
Certificates are limited to the Class A Invested Amount, which may be less than
the unpaid principal balance of the Class A Certificates. The Expected Final
Payment Date is the May 2006 Distribution Date, but principal with respect to
the Class A Certificates may be paid earlier or later under certain
circumstances described in the Agreement and the Supplement. If for one or more
months during the Controlled Accumulation Period there are not sufficient funds
to pay the Controlled Deposit Amount, then to the extent that excess funds are
not available on subsequent Distribution Dates with respect to the Controlled
Accumulation Period to make up for such shortfalls, the final payment of
principal of the Class A Certificates will occur later than the Expected Final
Payment Date.


Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been
executed by or on behalf of the Trustee, by manual signature, this Class A
Certificate shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Agreement or the
Supplement or be valid for any purpose.


A-1-2





IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Transferors have caused this Class A
Certificate to be duly executed.



AMERICAN EXPRESS CENTURION BANK




By:





Name:



Title:



AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING

CORPORATION II




By:





Name:



Title:


Dated: June 12, 2001


A-1-3






TRUSTEE'S CERTIFICATE OF AUTHENTICATION



This is one of the American Express Credit Account Master Trust Series 2001-6
Class A Certificates described in the within-mentioned Agreement and Supplement.



THE BANK OF NEW YORK,


as Trustee,



By:



Authorized Signatory



or



By:





as Authenticating Agent
for the Trustee,




By:






Authorized Signatory



A-1-4






AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST




SERIES 2001-6




CLASS A FLOATING RATE ASSET BACKED CERTIFICATE




Summary of Terms and Conditions



The Receivables consist of Principal Receivables which arise
generally from the purchase of goods and services and amounts advanced to
cardmembers as cash advances and Finance Charge Receivables. This Class A
Certificate is one of a Series of Certificates entitled American Express Credit
Account Master Trust, Series 2001-6 (the "Series 2001-6 Certificates"), and one
of a class thereof entitled Class A Series 2001-6 Floating Rate Asset Backed
Certificates (the "Class A Certificates"), each of which represents a
fractional, undivided interest in certain assets of the Trust. The assets of the
Trust are allocated in part to the investor certificateholders of all
outstanding Series (the "Certificateholders' Interest") with the remainder
allocated to the Holders of the Transferor Certificates. The aggregate interest
represented by the Class A Certificates at any time in the Principal Receivables
in the Trust shall not exceed an amount equal to the Class A Invested Amount at
such time. The Class A Initial Invested Amount is $577,500,000. The Class A
Invested Amount on any date will be an amount equal to (a) the Class A Initial
Invested Amount, minus (b) the aggregate amount of principal payments made to
the Class A Certificateholder on or prior to such date, minus (c) the excess, if
any, of the aggregate amount of Class A Investor Charge-Offs for all prior
Distribution Dates over Class A Investor Charge-Offs reimbursed pursuant to
subsection 4.07(b) of the Supplement prior to such date.


Subject to the terms and conditions of the Agreement, the
Transferors may, from time to time, direct the Trustee, on behalf of the Trust,
to issue one or more new Series of Investor Certificates, which will represent
fractional, undivided interests in certain of the Trust Assets.


On each Distribution Date, the Paying Agent shall distribute
to each Class A Certificateholder of record on the last day of the preceding
calendar month (each a "Record Date") such Class A Certificateholder's pro rata
share of such amounts (including amounts on deposit in the Collection Account
and Principal Funding Account) as are payable to the Class A Certificateholder
pursuant to the Agreement and the Supplement. Distributions with respect to this
Class A Certificate will be made by the Paying Agent by check mailed to the
address of the Class A Certificateholder of record appearing in the Certificate
Register without the presentation or surrender of this Class A Certificate or
the making of any notation thereon (except for the final distribution in respect
of this Class A Certificate) except that with respect to Class A Certificates
registered in the name of Cede & Co., the nominee for The Depository Trust
Company, distributions will be made in the form of immediately available funds.
Final payment of this Class A Certificate will be made only upon presentation
and surrender of this Class A Certificate at the office or agency specified in
the notice of final distribution delivered by the Trustee to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders in accordance with the Agreement and the Supplement.


On any day occurring on or after the day on which the Invested
Amount is reduced to 5% or less of the Initial Invested Amount, the Transferors
have the option to repurchase the Series 2001-6 Certificateholders' Interest in
the Trust. The repurchase price will be equal to (a) if such day is a
Distribution Date, the Reassignment Amount for such Distribution Date or (b) if
such day is not a Distribution Date, the Reassignment Amount for the
Distribution Date following such day. Following the deposit of the Reassignment
Amount in the Collection Account, Series 2001-6 Certificateholders will not have
any interest in the Receivables and the Series 2001-6 Certificates will
represent only the right to receive such Reassignment Amount.


A-1-5





This Class A Certificate does not represent an obligation of,
or an interest in, the Transferors or the Servicer or any affiliate of any of
them and is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation or any other governmental agency or instrumentality. This Class A
Certificate is limited in right of payment to certain Collections with respect
to the Receivables (and certain other amounts), all as more specifically set
forth hereinabove and in the Agreement and the Supplement.


The Class A Certificates are issuable only in minimum
denominations of $1,000 and integral multiples of $1,000. The transfer of this
Class A Certificate shall be registered in the Certificate Register upon
surrender of this Class A Certificate for registration of transfer at any office
or agency maintained by the Transfer Agent and Registrar accompanied by a
written instrument of transfer, in a form satisfactory to the Trustee or the
Transfer Agent and Registrar, duly executed by the Class A Certificateholder or
such Class A Certificateholder's attorney, and duly authorized in writing with
such signature guaranteed, and thereupon one or more new Class A Certificates of
authorized denominations and for the same aggregate fractional undivided
interest will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.


As provided in the Agreement and subject to certain
limitations therein set forth, Class A Certificates are exchangeable for new
Class A Certificates evidencing like aggregate fractional, undivided interests
as requested by the Class A Certificateholder surrendering such Class A
Certificates. No service charge may be imposed for any such exchange but the
Servicer or Transfer Agent and Registrar may require payment of a sum sufficient
to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection
therewith.


The Servicer, the Trustee, the Paying Agent and the Transfer
Agent and Registrar and any agent of any of them, may treat the person in whose
name this Class A Certificate is registered as the owner hereof for all
purposes, and neither the Servicer nor the Trustee, the Paying Agent, the
Transfer Agent and Registrar, nor any agent of any of them, shall be affected by
notice to the contrary except in certain circumstances described in the
Agreement.


THIS CLASS A CERTIFICATE SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, WITHOUT REFERENCE TO ITS CONFLICT OF LAW
PROVISIONS, AND THE OBLIGATIONS, RIGHTS AND REMEDIES OF THE PARTIES HEREUNDER
SHALL BE DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUCH LAWS.


A-1-6






ASSIGNMENT



Social Security or other identifying number of assignee


FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned hereby sells, assigns and
transfers unto




(name and address of assignee)


the within certificate and all rights thereunder, and hereby irrevocably
constitutes and appoints _________________, attorney, to transfer said
certificate on the books kept for registration thereof, with full power of
substitution in the premises.








Dated: ______________                                          ______________2/

                                                        Signature Guaranteed:

                                                    ----------------------------










2/   NOTE: The signature to this assignment must correspond with the name of the
registered owner as it appears on the face of the within Certificate in every
particular, without alteration, enlargement or any change whatsoever.


A-1-7






FORM OF CLASS B CERTIFICATE                   EXHIBIT A-2




THIS CLASS B CERTIFICATE MAY NOT BE ACQUIRED BY OR FOR THE ACCOUNT OF PERSONS
INVESTING ASSETS OF A BENEFIT PLAN (AS DEFINED BELOW) OR AN INDIVIDUAL
RETIREMENT ACCOUNT OTHER THAN BY INSURANCE COMPANIES INVESTING ASSETS SOLELY OF
THEIR GENERAL ACCOUNTS.



REGISTERED                                                       $__________ 3/




No. R-_____________                                       CUSIP No._____________



Unless this Class B Certificate is presented by an authorized
representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation ("DTC"),
to American Express Centurion Bank, American Express Receivables Financing
Corporation II or their agent for registration of transfer, exchange or payment,
and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such
other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any
payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an
authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR
VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered
owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.



AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST




SERIES 2001-6




CLASS B FLOATING RATE ASSET BACKED CERTIFICATE



Expected Final Payment Date:

The May 2006 Distribution Date


Each $1,000 minimum denomination represents a
1/56,000ths undivided interest
in Class B of the



AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST, SERIES 2001-6



Evidencing an undivided interest in certain assets of a trust, the corpus of
which consists primarily of an interest in receivables generated from time to
time in the ordinary course of business in a portfolio of credit and charge
accounts serviced by



AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED SERVICES COMPANY, INC.,



and other assets and interests constituting Trust Assets under the Pooling and
Servicing Agreement referred to below.


(Not an interest in or obligation of American Express Travel Related Services
Company, Inc., American Express Centurion Bank, American Express Receivables
Financing Corporation II or any of their respective affiliates)




3 /  Denominations of $1,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof.





This certifies that CEDE & CO. (the "Class B Certificateholder") is the
registered owner of a fractional, undivided interest in certain assets of a
trust (the "Trust") created pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement,
dated as of May 16, 1996 (as amended and supplemented, the "Agreement"), as
supplemented by the Series 2001-6 Supplement dated as of June 12, 2001 (as
amended and supplemented, the "Supplement"), among American Express Centurion
Bank and American Express Receivables Financing Corporation II, as transferors
(together, the "Transferors"), American Express Travel Related Services Company,
Inc., as servicer, and The Bank of New York, a New York banking corporation, as
trustee (the "Trustee"). The corpus of the Trust consists of (i) the
Transferors' ownership interest in a portfolio of receivables (the
"Receivables") existing in credit and charge accounts identified under the
Agreement from time to time (the "Accounts"), (ii) all Receivables generated
under the Accounts from time to time thereafter, (iii) funds collected or to be
collected from cardmembers in respect of the Receivables, (iv) all funds which
are from time to time on deposit in the Collection Account, the Special Funding
Account, and any other Series Accounts and (v) all other assets and interests
constituting the Trust. Although a summary of certain provisions of the
Agreement and the Supplement is set forth below and in the Summary of Terms and
Conditions attached hereto and made a part hereof, this Class B Certificate does
not purport to summarize the Agreement and the Supplement and reference is made
to the Agreement and the Supplement for information with respect to the
interests, rights, benefits, obligations, proceeds and duties evidenced hereby
and the rights, duties and obligations of the Trustee. A copy of the Agreement
and the Supplement (without schedules) may be requested from the Trustee by
writing to the Trustee at the Corporate Trust Office. To the extent not defined
herein, the capitalized terms used herein have the meanings ascribed to them in
the Agreement or the Supplement, as applicable.


This Class B Certificate is issued under and is subject to the
terms, provisions and conditions of the Agreement and the Supplement, to which
Agreement and Supplement, each as amended and supplemented from time to time,
the Class B Certificateholder by virtue of the acceptance hereof assents and is
bound.


No Class B Certificate may be acquired by or for the account
of any employee benefit plan, trust or account, including an individual
retirement account, that is subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security
Act of 1974, as amended, or that is described in Section 4975(e)(1) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or an entity whose underlying assets
include plan assets by reason of a plan's investment in such entity (a "Benefit
Plan"), unless (i) such acquirer or holder is an insurance company, (ii) the
source of funds used to acquire or hold such Certificate (or interest therein)
is an "insurance company general account" (as defined in U.S. Department of
Labor Prohibited Transaction Class Exemption ("PTCE") 95-60), and (iii) the
conditions set forth in Sections I and III of PTCE 95-60 have been satisfied. By
acquiring any interest in this Class B Certificate, each applicable Certificate
Owner shall be deemed to have represented and warranted either (i) that it is
not a Benefit Plan and is not acting for the account of any Benefit Plan or (ii)
that (1) it is an insurance company, (2) the source of funds used to acquire or
hold an interest in such Certificate is an "insurance company general account"
(as such term is defined in PTCE 95-60), and (3) the conditions set forth in
Sections I and III of PTCE 95-60 have been satisfied.


THIS CLASS B CERTIFICATE IS SUBORDINATED TO THE EXTENT
NECESSARY TO FUND PAYMENTS ON THE CLASS A CERTIFICATES TO THE EXTENT SPECIFIED
IN THE SUPPLEMENT.


It is the intent of the Transferors and the Class B
Certificateholder that, for federal, state and local income and franchise tax
purposes, the Class B Certificates will qualify as indebtedness of the
Transferors secured by the Receivables. The Class B Certificateholder, by the
acceptance of this Class B Certificate, agrees to treat this Class B Certificate
for federal, state and local income and franchise tax purposes as debt of the
Transferors.


A-2-2





In general, payments of principal with respect to the Class B
Certificates are limited to the Class B Invested Amount, which may be less than
the unpaid principal balance of the Class B Certificates. The Expected Final
Payment Date is the May 2006 Distribution Date, but principal with respect to
the Class B Certificates may be paid earlier or later under certain
circumstances described in the Agreement and the Supplement. If for one or more
months during the Controlled Accumulation Period there are not sufficient funds
to pay the Controlled Deposit Amount, then to the extent that excess funds are
not available on subsequent Distribution Dates with respect to the Controlled
Accumulation Period to make up for such shortfalls, the final payment of
principal of the Class B Certificates will occur later than the Expected Final
Payment Date.


Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been
executed by or on behalf of the Trustee, by manual signature, this Class B
Certificate shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Agreement or the
Supplement or be valid for any purpose.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Transferors have caused this Class B
Certificate to be duly executed.



AMERICAN EXPRESS CENTURION BANK




By:





Name:



Title:



AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING

CORPORATION II




By:





Name:



Title:


Dated: June 12, 2001


A-2-3






TRUSTEE'S CERTIFICATE OF AUTHENTICATION



This is one of the American Express Credit Account Master
Trust Series 2001-6 Class B Certificates described in the within mentioned
Agreement and Supplement.



THE BANK OF NEW YORK,

as Trustee




By:



Authorized Signatory



or



By:





as Authenticating Agent
for the Trustee




By:






Authorized Signatory



A-2-4






AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST




SERIES 2001-6




CLASS B FLOATING RATE ASSET BACKED CERTIFICATE




Summary of Terms and Conditions



The Receivables consist of Principal Receivables which arise
generally from the purchase of goods and services and amounts advanced to
cardmembers as cash advances and Finance Charge Receivables. This Class B
Certificate is one of a Series of Certificates entitled American Express Credit
Account Master Trust, Series 2001-6 (the "Series 2001-6 Certificates"), and one
of a class thereof entitled Class B Series 2001-6 Floating Rate Asset Backed
Certificates (the "Class B Certificates"), each of which represents a
fractional, undivided interest in certain assets of the Trust. The assets of the
Trust are allocated in part to the investor certificateholders of all
outstanding Series (the "Certificateholders' Interest") with the remainder
allocated to the Holders of the Transferor Certificates. The aggregate interest
represented by the Class B Certificates at any time in the Principal Receivables
in the Trust shall not exceed an amount equal to the Class B Invested Amount at
such time. The Class B Initial Invested Amount is $56,000,000. The Class B
Invested Amount on any date will be an amount equal to (a) the Class B Initial
Invested Amount, minus (b) the aggregate amount of principal payments made to
the Class B Certificateholder on or prior to such date, minus (c) the excess, if
any, of the aggregate amount of Class B Investor Charge-Offs for all prior
Distribution Dates over Class B Investor Charge-Offs reimbursed, minus (d) the
amount of Reallocated Principal Collections allocated on all prior Distribution
Dates pursuant to subsection 4.08(a) of the Supplement (excluding any
Reallocated Principal Collections that have resulted in a reduction in the
Collateral Invested Amount pursuant to Section 4.08), minus (e) an amount equal
to the amount by which the Class B Invested Amount has been reduced to cover the
Class A Investor Default Amount on all prior Distribution Dates, and plus (f)
the amount of Excess Spread and Excess Finance Charge Collections allocated to
Series 2001-6 and applied on all prior Distribution Dates for the purpose of
reimbursing amounts deducted pursuant to the foregoing clauses (c), (d) and (e);
provided, however, that the Class B Invested Amount may not be reduced below
zero.


Subject to the terms and conditions of the Agreement, the
Transferors may, from time to time, direct the Trustee, on behalf of the Trust,
to issue one or more new Series of Investor Certificates, which will represent
fractional, undivided interests in certain of the Trust Assets.


On each Distribution Date, the Paying Agent shall distribute
to each Class B Certificateholder of record on the last day of the preceding
calendar month (each a "Record Date") such Class B Certificateholder's pro rata
share of such amounts (including amounts on deposit in the Collection Account
and Principal Funding Account) as are payable to the Class B Certificateholder
pursuant to the Agreement and the Supplement. Distributions with respect to this
Class B Certificate will be made by the Paying Agent by check mailed to the
address of the Class B Certificateholder of record appearing in the Certificate
Register without the presentation or surrender of this Class B Certificate or
the making of any notation thereon (except for the final distribution in respect
of this Class B Certificate) except that with respect to Class B Certificates
registered in the name of Cede & Co., the nominee for The Depository Trust
Company, distributions will be made in the form of immediately available funds.
Final payment of this Class B Certificate will be made only upon presentation
and surrender of this Class B Certificate at the office or agency specified in
the notice of final distribution delivered by the Trustee to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders in accordance with the Agreement and the Supplement.


On any day occurring on or after the day on which the Invested
Amount is reduced to 5% or less of the Initial Invested Amount, the Transferors
have the option to repurchase the Series 2001-6


A-2-5





Certificateholders' Interest in the Trust. The repurchase price will be equal to

(a) if such day is a Distribution Date, the Reassignment Amount for such
Distribution Date or (b) if such day is not a Distribution Date, the
Reassignment Amount for the Distribution Date next following such day. Following
the deposit of the Reassignment Amount in the Collection Account, Series 2001-6
Certificateholders will not have any interest in the Receivables and the Series
2001-6 Certificates will represent only the right to receive such Reassignment
Amount.


This Class B Certificate does not represent an obligation of,
or an interest in, the Transferors or the Servicer or any affiliate of any of
them and is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation or any other governmental agency or instrumentality. This Class B
Certificate is limited in right of payment to certain Collections with respect
to the Receivables (and certain other amounts), all as more specifically set
forth hereinabove and in the Agreement and the Supplement.


The Class B Certificates are issuable only in minimum
denominations of $1,000 and integral multiples of $1,000. The transfer of this
Class B Certificate shall be registered in the Certificate Register upon
surrender of this Class B Certificate for registration of transfer at any office
or agency maintained by the Transfer Agent and Registrar accompanied by a
written instrument of transfer, in a form satisfactory to the Trustee or the
Transfer Agent and Registrar, duly executed by the Class B Certificateholder or
such Class B Certificateholder's attorney, and duly authorized in writing with
such signature guaranteed, and thereupon one or more new Class B Certificates of
authorized denominations and for the same aggregate fractional undivided
interest will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.


As provided in the Agreement and subject to certain
limitations therein set forth, Class B Certificates are exchangeable for new
Class B Certificates evidencing like aggregate fractional undivided interests as
requested by the Class B Certificateholder surrendering such Class B
Certificates. No service charge may be imposed for any such exchange but the
Servicer or Transfer Agent and Registrar may require payment of a sum sufficient
to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection
therewith.


The Servicer, the Trustee, the Paying Agent and the Transfer
Agent and Registrar and any agent of any of them, may treat the person in whose
name this Class B Certificate is registered as the owner hereof for all
purposes, and neither the Servicer nor the Trustee, the Paying Agent, the
Transfer Agent and Registrar, nor any agent of any of them, shall be affected by
notice to the contrary except in certain circumstances described in the
Agreement.


THIS CLASS B CERTIFICATE SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK, WITHOUT REFERENCE TO ITS CONFLICT OF LAW
PROVISIONS, AND THE OBLIGATIONS, RIGHTS AND REMEDIES OF THE PARTIES HEREUNDER
SHALL BE DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUCH LAWS.


A-2-6






ASSIGNMENT



Social Security or other identifying number of assignee ________________________


FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned hereby sells, assigns and
transfers unto




(name and address of assignee)


the within certificate and all rights thereunder, and hereby irrevocably
constitutes and appoints ___________________, attorney, to transfer said
certificate on the books kept for registration thereof, with full power of
substitution in the premises.








Dated: ______________                                       _________________4/

                                                        Signature Guaranteed:

                                                      ------------------------










4 / NOTE: The signature to this assignment must correspond with the name of the
registered owner as it appears on the face of the within Certificate in every
particular, without alteration, enlargement or any change whatsoever.






EXHIBIT B




FORM OF MONTHLY PAYMENT INSTRUCTIONS AND

NOTIFICATION TO THE TRUSTEE






AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST




SERIES 2001-6





The undersigned, a duly authorized representative of American
Express Travel Related Services Company, Inc. ("TRS"), as Servicer pursuant to
the Pooling and Servicing Agreement dated as of May 16, 1996 (as amended and
supplemented, the "Pooling and Servicing Agreement"), among TRS, American
Express Centurion Bank and American Express Receivables Financing Corporation
II, as transferors (together, the "Transferors") and The Bank of New York, as
trustee (the "Trustee"), does hereby certify as follows:


1. Capitalized terms used in this Certificate have their
respective meanings set forth in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement or the
Series 2001-6 Supplement dated as of June 12, 2001, among TRS, the Transferors
and the Trustee (as amended and supplemented, the "Supplement"), as applicable.


2. TRS is the Servicer.


3. The undersigned is a Servicing Officer.



I. INSTRUCTION TO MAKE A WITHDRAWAL



Pursuant to subsections 4.05(a), (b) and (c), the Servicer does hereby instruct
the Trustee (i) to make withdrawals from the Collection Account on
____________________, ________________, which date is a Distribution Date under
the Supplement, in the aggregate amounts (equal to the Class A Available Funds,
Class B Available Funds and Collateral Available Funds, respectively) as set
forth below in respect of the following amounts and (ii) to apply the proceeds
of such withdrawals in accordance with subsections 4.05(a), (b) and (c):


With respect to the Class A Certificates,








A)       Pursuant to subsection 4.05(a)(i):

         (1)      Interest at the Class A Certificate Rate for
                  the related Interest Accrual Period on the
                  Class A Invested Amount..............................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      Class A Monthly Interest previously
                  due but not paid.....................................$
                                                                       --------

















         (3)      Class A Additional Interest and any Class A
                  Additional Interest due but not paid.................$
                                                                       --------

B)       Pursuant to subsection 4.05(a)(ii):

         (1)      The Class A Servicing Fee for the preceding
                  Monthly Period, if applicable........................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      Accrued and unpaid Class A Servicing Fees, if
                  applicable...........................................$
                                                                       --------

C)       Pursuant to subsection 4.05(a)(iii):

         (1)      Class A Investor Default Amount for the
                  preceding Monthly Period.............................$
                                                                       --------

With respect to the Class B Certificates,

A)       Pursuant to subsection 4.05(b)(i):

         (1)      Interest at the Class B Certificate Rate for
                  the related Interest Accrual Period on the
                  Class B Invested Amount..............................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      Class B Monthly Interest previously due but
                  not paid.............................................$
                                                                       --------

         (3)      Class B Additional Interest and any Class B
                  Additional Interest previously due but not
                  paid.................................................$
                                                                       --------

B)       Pursuant to subsection 4.05(b)(ii):

         (1)      The Class B Servicing Fee for the preceding
                  Monthly Period, if applicable........................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      Accrued and unpaid Class B Servicing Fees,
                  if applicable........................................$
                                                                       --------

With respect to the Collateral Interest.........................

A)       Pursuant to subsection 4.05(c)(i):

         (1)      The Collateral Servicing Fee for the
                  preceding Monthly Period, if applicable..............$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      Accrued and unpaid Collateral Servicing Fee,
                  if applicable........................................$
                                                                       --------








Pursuant to subsections 4.05(d), (e) and (f), the Servicer
hereby instructs the Trustee (i) to make withdrawals from the Collection Account
on , which date is a Distribution Date under the Supplement, in the aggregate
amounts (equal to the Available Principal Collections) as set


B-2





forth below in respect of the following amounts and (ii) to apply the proceeds
of such withdrawals in accordance with subsections 4.05(d), (e) and (f):








A)       Pursuant to subsection 4.05(d):

         (1)      The excess, if any, of the Collateral
                  Invested Amount over the Required Collateral
                  Invested Amount paid to the Collateral
                  Interest Holder pursuant to the Loan
                  Agreement............................................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      Amount to be treated as Shared Principal
                  Collections..........................................$
                                                                       --------

B)       Pursuant to subsection 4.05(e):

         (1)      The Lesser of the Controlled Deposit Amount
                  and the sum of the Class A Adjusted Invested
                  Amount and the Class B Adjusted Invested
                  Amount deposited in the Principal Funding
                  Account..............................................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      After the Class B Invested Amount is paid in
                  full, the amount paid to the Collateral
                  Interest Holder (up to the Collateral
                  Invested Amount) pursuant to the Loan
                  Agreement............................................$
                                                                       --------

         (3)      Prior to the date the Class B Invested
                  Amount is paid in full, excess of the
                  Collateral Invested Amount over the Required
                  Collateral Invested Amount paid to the
                  Collateral Interest Holder pursuant to the
                  Loan Agreement.......................................$
                                                                       --------

         (4)      Prior to the date the Class B Invested
                  Amount is paid in full, amount to be treated
                  as Shared Principal Collections......................$
                                                                       --------

C)       Pursuant to subsection 4.05(f):

         (1)      An amount up to the Class A Adjusted Invested
                  Amount deposited in the Principal Funding
                  Account..............................................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      On and after the Distribution Date on which
                  the Class A Invested Amount is paid in full,
                  an amount up to the Class B Invested Amount
                  deposited in the Principal Funding Account...........$
                                                                       --------

         (3)      On an after the Distribution Date on which
                  the Class B Invested Amount is paid in full,
                  an amount up to the Collateral Invested
                  Amount paid to the Collateral Interest
                  Holder pursuant to the Loan Agreement................$
                                                                       --------








B-3





Pursuant to Section 4.07, the Servicer does hereby instruct
the Trustee to apply on ___________________, which is a Distribution Date under
the Supplement, any Excess Spread and Excess Finance Charge Collections
allocated to Series 2001-6 as follows:








A)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(a):
         ------------------------------

         Class A Required Amount applied in the priority set forth in
         subsections 4.05(a)(i), (ii) and (iii)........................$
                                                                       --------

B)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(b):
         ------------------------------

         Aggregate amount of Class A Investor Charge-Offs not
         previously reimbursed allocated to Available Principal
         Collections...................................................$
                                                                       --------

C)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(c):
         ------------------------------

         Class B Required Amount applied in the priority set forth in
         subsections 4.05(b)(i)........................................$
                                                                       --------

D)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(d):
         -------------------------------

         Interest accrued on aggregate outstanding principal
         balance of the Class B Certificates not otherwise
         distributed to Class B Certificateholders pursuant to
         Section 4.07(c)...............................................$
                                                                       --------
E)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(d):
         -------------------------------

         Amount (up to the Class B Investor Default) to be applied
         as Available Principal Collections............................$
                                                                       --------

F)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(e):
         ------------------------------

         The amount by which the "Class B Invested Amount" has been
         reduced pursuant to clauses (c), (d) and (e) of the
         definition thereof allocated to Available Principal
         Collections...................................................$
                                                                       --------

G)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(f):
         ------------------------------

         (1)      Collateral Monthly Interest..........................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      Collateral Monthly Interest previously due but not
                  paid.................................................$
                                                                       --------

         (3)      Collateral Additional Interest and any Collateral
                  Additional Interest previously due and not paid......$
                                                                       --------








B-4











H)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(g):
         ------------------------------

         Monthly Servicing Fee for such Distribution Date that has
         not been paid to the Servicer and any Monthly Servicing Fee
         previously due but not paid to the Servicer...................$
                                                                       --------

I)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(h):
         ------------------------------

         Collateral Default Amount allocated to Available Principal
         Collections...................................................$
                                                                       --------

J)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(i):
         ------------------------------

         The amount by which the "Collateral Invested Amount" has
         been reduced pursuant to clauses (c), (d) and (e) of the
         definition thereof allocated to Available Principal
         Collections...................................................$
                                                                       --------

K)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(j):
         ------------------------------

         The excess of the Required Reserve Account Amount over the
         Available Reserve Amount deposited into the Reserve
         Account.......................................................$
                                                                       --------








B-5











L)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(k):
         ------------------------------

         Paid to the Collateral Interest Holder pursuant to the Loan
         Agreement.....................................................$
                                                                       --------

M)       Pursuant to subsection 4.07(l):
         ------------------------------

         Treated as Excess Finance Charge Collections and allocated
         to other Series or paid to the Holders of the Transferor
         Certificates..................................................$
                                                                       --------








Pursuant to Section 4.08, the Servicer does hereby instruct
the Trustee to apply on __________________, which is a Distribution Date under
the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, $_________ of Reallocated Principal
Collections to fund any deficiencies in the Required Amount after applying Class
A Available Funds, Class B Available Funds, Excess Spread and Excess Finance
Charge Collections thereto.




II.      INSTRUCTION TO MAKE CERTAIN PAYMENTS


Pursuant to Section 5.01 of the Series Supplement, the
Servicer does hereby instruct the Trustee to pay in accordance with Section 5.01
from the Interest Funding Account or the Principal Funding Account, as
applicable, on , which date is a Payment Date under the Supplement, the
following amounts as set forth below:






A)       Pursuant to subsection 5.01(a):
         -------------------------------

         Interest to be distributed to Class A
         Certificateholders............................................$
                                                                       --------

B)       Pursuant to subsection 5.01(b):
         -------------------------------

         On the Expected Final Payment Date or a Special Payment
         Date, principal to be distributed to the Class A
         Certificateholders............................................$
                                                                       --------

C)       Pursuant to subsection 5.01(c):
         ------------------------------

         Interest to be distributed to Class B
         Certificateholders............................................$
                                                                       --------

D)       Pursuant to subsection 5.01(d):
         ------------------------------

         On the Expected Final Payment Date or a Special
         Payment Date, on or after the date Class A Invested
         Amount is paid in full, principal to be distributed
         to the Class B Certificateholders.............................$
                                                                       --------










III.     ACCRUED AND UNPAID AMOUNTS


After giving effect to the withdrawals and transfers to be
made in accordance with this notice, the following amounts will be accrued and
unpaid with respect to all Monthly Periods preceding the current calendar month.






1.       Subsection 4.06(a):
         ------------------








B-6











         The aggregate amount of all unreimbursed Class A
         Investor Charge-Offs.................................$
                                                              --------

2.       Subsection 4.06(a), (b) and 4.08(a):
         -----------------------------------

         The aggregate amount by which the "Class B
         Invested Amount" has been reduced pursuant to
         clauses (c), (d) and (e) of the definition
         thereof..............................................$
                                                              --------

3.       Subsection 4.06(a), (b), (c) and 4.08(a) and (b):
         ------------------------------------------------

         The aggregate amount by which the "Collateral
         Invested Amount" has been reduced pursuant to
         clauses (c), (d) and (e) of the definition
         thereof..............................................$
                                                              --------








IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has duly executed this Certificate
this day of -------------, --------.



AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED

SERVICES COMPANY, INC., as Servicer




By:





Name:



Title:


B-7






EXHIBIT C




FORM OF MONTHLY STATEMENT




AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST

SERIES 2001-6



Pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement dated as of May 16,
1996 (hereinafter as such agreement may have been or may be from time to time,
amended or otherwise modified, the "Pooling and Servicing Agreement"), among
American Express Travel Related Services Company, Inc. ("TRS"), as Servicer,
American Express Centurion Bank and American Express Receivables Financing
Corporation II, as transferors (together, the "Transferors"), and The Bank of
New York, as trustee (the "Trustee"), as supplemented by the Series 2001-6
Supplement dated as of June 12, 2001 (the "Supplement") among TRS, the
Transferors and the Trustee, TRS, as Servicer is required to prepare certain
information each month regarding current distributions to the Series 2001-6
Certificateholders and the performance of the American Express Credit Account
Master Trust (the "Trust") during the previous month. The information which is
required to be prepared with respect to the Distribution Date of ______________,
and with respect to the performance of the Trust during the month of
_________________ is set forth below. Certain of the information is presented on
the basis of an original principal amount of $1,000 per Series 2001-6
Certificate (a "Certificate"). Certain other information is presented based on
the aggregate amounts for the Trust as a whole. Capitalized terms used in this
Monthly Statement have their respective meanings set forth in the Pooling and
Servicing Agreement and the Supplement.








A)       Information regarding distributions in respect of the Class
         A Certificates per $1,000 original certificate principal
         amount

         (1)      The total amount of the distribution in respect
                  of Class A Certificates, per $1,000 original
                  certificate principal amount.........................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      The amount of the distribution set forth in
                  paragraph 1 above in respect of interest on the
                  Class A Certificates, per $1,000 original
                  certificate principal amount.........................$
                                                                       --------

         (3)      The amount of the distribution set forth in
                  paragraph 1 above in respect of principal of the
                  Class A Certificates, per $1,000 original
                  certificate principal amount.........................$
                                                                       --------

B)       Class A Investor Charge Offs and Reimbursement of Charge Offs

         (1)      The amount of Class A Investor Charge Offs...........$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      The amount of Class A Investor Charge Offs set
                  forth in paragraph 1 above, per $1,000 original
                  certificate principal amount.........................$
                                                                       --------

















         (3)      The total amount reimbursed in respect of Class A
                  Investor Charge Offs.................................$
                                                                       --------

         (4)      The amount set forth in paragraph 3 above, per
                  $1,000 original certificate principal amount.........$
                                                                       --------

         (5)      The amount, if any, by which the outstanding
                  principal balance of the Class A Certificates
                  exceeds the Class A Invested Amount after giving
                  effect to all transactions on such Distribution
                  Date.................................................$
                                                                       --------

C)       Information regarding distributions in respect of the Class
         B Certificates, per $1,000 original certificate principal
         amount

         (1)      The total amount of the distribution in respect
                  of Class B Certificates, per $1,000 original
                  certificate principal amount.........................$
                                                                       --------
         (2)      The amount of the distribution set forth in
                  paragraph 1 above in respect of interest on the
                  Class B Certificates, per $1,000 original
                  certificate principal amount.........................$
                                                                       --------
         (3)      The amount of the distribution set forth in
                  paragraph 1 above in respect of principal of the
                  Class B Certificates, per $1,000 original
                  certificate principal amount.........................$
                                                                       --------

D)       Amount of reductions in Class B Invested Amount
         pursuant to clauses (c), (d), and (e) of the
         definition of Class B Invested Amount

         (1)      The amount of reductions in Class B Invested
                  Amount pursuant to clauses (c), (d) and (e) of
                  the definition of Class B Invested Amount............$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      The amount of the reductions in the Class B
                  Invested Amount set forth in paragraph 1 above,
                  per $1,000 original certificate principal amount.....$
                                                                       --------

         (3)      The total amount reimbursed in respect of such
                  reductions in the Class B Invested Amount............$
                                                                       --------

         (4)      The amount set forth in paragraph 3 above, per
                  $1,000 original certificate principal amount.........$
                                                                       --------








C-2











         (5)      The amount, if any, by which the outstanding
                  principal balance of the Class B Certificates
                  exceeds the Class B Invested Amount after giving
                  effect to all transactions on such Distribution
                  Date.................................................$
                                                                       --------

E)       Information regarding certain distributions to the
         Collateral Interest Holder

         (1)      The amount distributed to the Collateral Interest
                  Holder in respect of interest on the Collateral
                  Invested Amount......................................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      The amount distributed to the Collateral Interest
                  Holder in respect of principal on the Collateral
                  Invested Amount......................................$
                                                                       --------

F)       Amount of reductions in Collateral  Invested  Amount pursuant
         to clauses (c), (d), and (e) of the  definition of Collateral
         Invested Amount

         (1)      The amount of reductions in the Collateral
                  Invested Amount pursuant to clauses (c), (d) and
                  (e) of the definition of Collateral Invested
                  Amount...............................................$
                                                                       --------

         (2)      The total amount reimbursed in respect of such
                  reductions in the Collateral Invested Amount.........$
                                                                       --------









AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED

SERVICES COMPANY, INC., as Servicer




By:





Name:



Title:


C-3








RECEIVABLES --







Beginning of the Month Principal Receivables:                                             $
                                                                                          -----------------
Beginning of the Month Finance Charge Receivables:                                        $
                                                                                          -----------------
Beginning of the Month Discounted Receivables:                                            $
                                                                                          -----------------
Beginning of the Month Premium Receivables:                                               $
                                                                                          -----------------
Beginning of the Month Total Receivables:                                                 $
                                                                                          -----------------


Removed Principal Receivables:                                                            $
                                                                                          -----------------
Removed Finance Charge Receivables:                                                       $
                                                                                          -----------------
Removed Total Receivables:                                                                $
                                                                                          -----------------


Additional Principal Receivables:                                                         $
                                                                                          -----------------
Additional Finance Charge Receivables:                                                    $
                                                                                          -----------------
Additional Total Receivables:                                                             $
                                                                                          -----------------


Discounted Receivables Generated this Period:                                             $
                                                                                          -----------------
Premium Receivables Generated this Period:                                                $
                                                                                          -----------------
End of the Month Principal Receivables:                                                   $
                                                                                          -----------------
End of the Month Finance Charge Receivables:                                              $
                                                                                          -----------------
End of the Month Discounted Receivables:                                                  $
                                                                                          -----------------
End of the Month Premium Receivables:                                                     $
                                                                                          -----------------
End of the Month Total Receivables:                                                       $


Special Funding Account Balance:                                                          $
                                                                                          -----------------
Aggregate Invested Amount (all Master Trust Series)::                                     $
                                                                                          -----------------
End of the Month Transferor Amount:                                                       $
                                                                                          -----------------

DELINQUENCIES AND LOSSES --


End of the Month Delinquencies:                                                           RECEIVABLES
                                                                                          -----------
         30-59 Days Delinquent                                                            $
                                                                                          -----------------
         60-89 Days Delinquent                                                            $
                                                                                          -----------------
         90+ Days Delinquent                                                              $
                                                                                          -----------------








C-4











         Total 30+ Days Delinquent                                                        $
                                                                                          -----------------

Defaulted Accounts During the Month:                                                      $
                                                                                          -----------------


INVESTED AMOUNTS --


         Class A Initial Invested Amount                     $577,500,000

         Class B Initial Invested Amount                     $56,000,000

         Collateral Initial Invested Amount                  $66,500,000


INITIAL INVESTED AMOUNT                                                                   $700,000,000


         Class A Invested Amount                             $
                                                              -----------
         Class B Invested Amount                             $
                                                              -----------
         Collateral Invested Amount                          $
                                                              -----------
INVESTED AMOUNT                                                                           $
                                                                                          -----------------
         Class A Adjusted Invested Amount                                                 $
                                                                                          -----------------
         Class B Adjusted Invested Amount                                                 $
                                                                                          -----------------
ADJUSTED INVESTED AMOUNT                                                                  $
                                                                                          -----------------

MONTHLY SERVICING FEE                                                                     $
                                                                                          -----------------

INVESTOR DEFAULT AMOUNT                                                                   $
                                                                                          -----------------


GROUP II INFORMATION


         WEIGHTED AVERAGE CERTIFICATE RATE FOR ALL SERIES IN GROUP II                     $
                                                                                          -----------------

         GROUP II INVESTOR FINANCE CHARGE COLLECTIONS                                     $
                                                                                          -----------------
         GROUP II INVESTOR ADDITIONAL AMOUNTS                                             $
                                                                                          -----------------
         GROUP II INVESTOR DEFAULT AMOUNT                                                 $
                                                                                          -----------------
         GROUP II INVESTOR MONTHLY FEES                                                   $
                                                                                          -----------------
         GROUP II INVESTOR MONTHLY INTEREST                                               $
                                                                                          -----------------








C-5











SERIES 2001-6 INFORMATION

         SERIES 2001-6 ALLOCATION PERCENTAGE                                                               %
                                                                                          -----------------
         SERIES 2001-6 ALLOCABLE FINANCE CHARGE COLLECTIONS                               $
                                                                                          -----------------
         SERIES 2001-6 ADDITIONAL AMOUNTS                                                 $
                                                                                          -----------------
         SERIES 2001-6 ALLOCABLE DEFAULTED AMOUNT                                         $
                                                                                          -----------------
         SERIES 2001-6 MONTHLY FEES                                                       $
                                                                                          -----------------
         SERIES 2001-6 ALLOCABLE PRINCIPAL COLLECTIONS                                    $
                                                                                          -----------------
         SERIES 2001-6 REQUIRED TRANSFEROR AMOUNT                                         $
                                                                                          -----------------
         FLOATING ALLOCATION PERCENTAGE                                                   $
                                                                                          -----------------
         INVESTOR FINANCE CHARGE COLLECTIONS                                                               %
                                                                                          -----------------
         INVESTOR DEFAULT AMOUNT                                                          $
                                                                                          -----------------
         REALLOCATED INVESTOR FINANCE CHARGE COLLECTIONS                                  $
                                                                                          -----------------
         PRINCIPAL ALLOCATIONS PERCENTAGE                                                                  %
                                                                                          -----------------
         AVAILABLE PRINCIPAL COLLECTIONS                                                  $
                                                                                          -----------------

CLASS A AVAILABLE FUNDS --


CLASS A FLOATING PERCENTAGE                                                                                %
                                                                                          -----------------

         Class A Floating Percentage of Reallocated          $
                                                              --------------------
         Investor Finance Charge Collections
         Other Amounts                                       $
                                                              --------------------

TOTAL CLASS A AVAILABLE FUNDS                                                             $
                                                                                          -----------------

         Class A Monthly Interest                            $
                                                              --------------------
         Class A Servicing Fee (if applicable)               $
                                                              --------------------
         Class A Investor Default Amount                     $
                                                              --------------------

TOTAL CLASS A EXCESS SPREAD                                                               $
                                                                                          -----------------


CLASS A REQUIRED AMOUNT                                                                   $
                                                                                          -----------------








C-6











CLASS B AVAILABLE FUNDS --                                                                $
                                                                                          -----------------

CLASS B FLOATING PERCENTAGE                                                                                %
                                                                                          -----------------


CLASS B AVAILABLE FUNDS                                                                   $
                                                                                          -----------------

         Class B Monthly Interest                            $
                                                              --------------------
         Class B Servicing Fee (if applicable)               $
                                                              --------------------
COLLATERAL AVAILABLE FUNDS
COLLATERAL FLOATING PERCENTAGE                                                                             %
                                                                                          -----------------
COLLATERAL AVAILABLE FUNDS                                                                $
                                                                                          -----------------

         Collateral Interest Servicing Fee (if applicable)                                $
                                                                                          -----------------
TOTAL COLLATERAL EXCESS SPREAD                                                            $
                                                                                          -----------------

TOTAL CLASS B EXCESS SPREAD                                                               $
                                                                                          -----------------

EXCESS SPREAD --

TOTAL EXCESS SPREAD                                                                       $
                                                                                          -----------------

         Excess Spread Applied to Class A Required Amount    $
                                                              --------------------
         Excess Spread Applied to Class A Investor Charge    $
         Offs                                                 --------------------
         Excess Spread Applied to Class B Required Amount    $
                                                              --------------------
         Excess Spread Applied to Reductions of Class B      $
         Invested Amount pursuant to clauses (c), (d) and     --------------------
         (e)
         Excess Spread Applied to Collateral Monthly         $
         Interest                                             --------------------
         Excess Spread Applied to Unpaid Monthly Servicing   $
         Fee                                                  --------------------
         Excess Spread Applied Collateral Default Amount     $
                                                              --------------------








C-7











         Excess Spread Applied to Reductions of Collateral   $
         Invested Amount Pursuant to Clauses (c), (d) and    ---------------------
         (e)
         Excess Spread Applied to Reserve Account            $
                                                              --------------------
         Excess Spread Applied to Other Amounts Owed to      $
         Collateral Interest Holder                          ---------------------


TOTAL EXCESS FINANCE CHARGE COLLECTIONS ELIGIBLE FOR OTHER   $
EXCESS ALLOCATION SERIES                                     ---------------------

EXCESS FINANCE CHARGES COLLECTIONS


TOTAL EXCESS FINANCE CHARGE COLLECTIONS FOR ALL ALLOCATION   $
SERIES                                                       ---------------------

SERIES 2001-6 EXCESS FINANCE CHARGE COLLECTIONS

EXCESS FINANCE CHARGE COLLECTIONS ALLOCATED TO SERIES        $
2001-6                                                       ---------------------


         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Class A Required Amount                             ---------------------

         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Class A Investor Charge Offs                        ---------------------

         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Class B Required Amount                             ---------------------

         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Reductions of Class B Invested Amount Pursuant to   ---------------------
         Clauses (c), (d) and (e)

         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Collateral Monthly Interest                         ---------------------

         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Unpaid Monthly Servicing Fee                        ---------------------

         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Collateral Default Amount                           ---------------------








C-8











         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Reductions of Collateral Invested Amount Pursuant   ---------------------
         to Clauses (c), (d) and (e)

         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Reserve Account                                     ---------------------

         Excess Finance Charge Collections Applied to        $
         Other Amounts Owed to Collateral Interest Holder    ---------------------

YIELD AND BASE RATE --

         Base Rate (Current Month)                                               %
                                                             --------------------
         Base Rate (Prior Month)                                                 %
                                                             --------------------
         Base Rate (Two Months Ago)                                              %
                                                             --------------------
THREE MONTH AVERAGE BASE RATE                                                                              %
                                                                                          -----------------

         Series Adjusted Portfolio Yield (Current Month)                         %
                                                             --------------------
         Series Adjusted Portfolio Yield (Prior Month)                           %
                                                             --------------------
         Series Adjusted Portfolio Yield (Two Months Ago)    $                   %
                                                              -------------------
THREE MONTH AVERAGE SERIES ADJUSTED PORTFOLIO YIELD                                                        %
                                                                                          -----------------

PRINCIPAL COLLECTIONS --

CLASS A PRINCIPAL PERCENTAGE                                                                               %
                                                                                          -----------------

         Class A Principal Collections                       $
                                                              --------------------


CLASS B PRINCIPAL PERCENTAGE                                                                               %
                                                                                          -----------------
         Class B Principal Collections                       $
                                                              --------------------

COLLATERAL PRINCIPAL PERCENTAGE                                                                            %
                                                                                          -----------------








C-9











         Collateral Principal Collections                    $
                                                              --------------------


AVAILABLE PRINCIPAL COLLECTIONS                                                           $
                                                                                          -----------------

REALLOCATED PRINCIPAL COLLECTIONS                                                         $
                                                                                          -----------------

SERIES 2001-6 PRINCIPAL SHORTFALL                                                         $
                                                                                          -----------------

SHARED PRINCIPAL COLLECTIONS ALLOCABLE FROM OTHER
PRINCIPAL SHARING SERIES                                                                  $
                                                                                          -----------------

ACCUMULATION --  -


         Controlled Accumulation Amount                      $
                                                              --------------------

         Deficit Controlled Accumulation Amount              $
                                                              --------------------

CONTROLLED DEPOSIT AMOUNT                                                                 $
                                                                                          -----------------

PRINCIPAL FUNDING ACCOUNT BALANCE                                                         $
                                                                                          -----------------

SHARED PRINCIPAL COLLECTIONS ELIGIBLE FOR OTHER PRINCIPAL
SHARING SERIES                                                                            $
                                                                                          -----------------

INVESTOR CHARGE OFFS AND REDUCTIONS--

CLASS A INVESTOR CHARGE OFFS                                                              $
                                                                                          -----------------

REDUCTIONS IN CLASS B INVESTED AMOUNT (OTHER THAN BY
PRINCIPAL PAYMENTS)                                                                       $
                                                                                          -----------------

REDUCTIONS IN COLLATERAL INVESTED AMOUNT (OTHER THAN BY
PRINCIPAL PAYMENTS)                                                                       $
                                                                                          -----------------

PREVIOUS CLASS A CHARGE OFFS REIMBURSED                                                   $
                                                                                          -----------------








C-10











PREVIOUS CLASS B INVESTED AMOUNT REDUCTIONS REIMBURSED                                    $
                                                                                          -----------------

PREVIOUS COLLATERAL INVESTED AMOUNT REDUCTIONS REIMBURSED                                 $
                                                                                          -----------------









AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED

SERVICES COMPANY, INC., as Servicer




By:





Name:



Title:


C-11






EXHIBIT D




FORM OF MONTHLY SERVICER'S CERTIFICATE




AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED SERVICES COMPANY, INC.




AMERICAN EXPRESS CREDIT ACCOUNT MASTER TRUST

SERIES 2001-6



The undersigned, a duly authorized representative of American
Express Travel Related Services Company, Inc., as Servicer ("TRS"), pursuant to
the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as of May 16, 1996 (as amended and
supplemented, the "Agreement"), as supplemented by the Series 2001-6 Supplement
dated as of June 12, 2001 (as amended and supplemented, the "Series
Supplement"), among TRS, as Servicer, American Express Centurion Bank and
American Express Receivables Financing Corporation II, as Transferors, and The
Bank of New York, as Trustee, does hereby certify as follows:


1.   Capitalized  terms used in this Certificate have their
respective meanings as set forth in the Agreement or the Series Supplement, as
applicable.


2.   TRS is, as of the date hereof, the Servicer under the
Agreement.


3.   The undersigned is a Servicing Officer.


4.   This Certificate relates to the Distribution Date
occurring on _______________ _____, 200 .


5.   As of the date hereof, to the best knowledge of the
undersigned, the Servicer has performed in all material respects all its
obligations under the Agreement through the Monthly Period preceding such
Distribution Date [or, if there has been a default in the performance of any
such obligation, set forth in detail the (i) nature of such default, (ii) the
action taken by the Servicer, if any, to remedy such default and (iii) the
current status of each such default; if applicable, insert "None"].


6.   As of the date hereof, to the best knowledge of the
undersigned, no Pay Out Event occurred on or prior to such Distribution Date.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has duly executed and
delivered this Certificate this _________ day of _________________, 200 .



AMERICAN EXPRESS TRAVEL RELATED

SERVICES COMPANY, INC., as Servicer




By:





Name:



Title:










 






Small Business Loans | Merchant Financing | American Express





























































 Skip to main content







Start of menu






My AccountYou are under My Account tab

Card AccountsExpand / Collapse

Account Home
Statements & Activity
Profile
Card Benefits



Business AccountsExpand / Collapse

OPEN Small Business
Merchant Home
American Express @ Work



Other AccountsExpand / Collapse

Savings Accounts and CDs
Membership Rewards® Point Summary
Membership Rewards® Point Summary
Credit Secure
Bluebird Alternative to Banking







 



CARDSYou are under Cards tab

Personal CardsExpand / Collapse

Learn about Charge & Credit Cards
Choose a Card With Our Help
View all Personal Charge & Credit Cards
Learn about Charge & Credit Cards
Choose a Card With Our Help
View all Personal Charge & Credit Cards



Small Business CardsExpand / Collapse

Small Business Charge & Credit Cards
Compare Cards by Benefits
View All Small Business Cards



Corporate CardsExpand / Collapse

Corporate Cards
Compare Corporate Card Solutions
Find a Custom Corporate Solution



Prepaid CardsExpand / Collapse

Reloadable Prepaid Cards
Gift Cards
Gift Cards

 



TRAVELYou are under Travel tab

Personal TravelExpand / Collapse

Book A Trip
Book Hotels
Book Flights, Cars, Cruises, Vacations
Fine Hotels & Resorts
Benefits of a Travel Specialist
Find a Destination Expert



Business TravelExpand / Collapse

Corporate Travel Solutions



Other Travel ServicesExpand / Collapse

Travel Insurance
Travelers Cheques
Find a Travel Service Office
Global Assist Hotline







 



REWARDSYou are under Rewards tab

Membership RewardsExpand / Collapse

Membership Rewards® Home
Membership Rewards® Home
Use Points
Point Summary



Card Rewards and BenefitsExpand / Collapse

Explore Your Cards Rewards Program
Entertainment and Events
Entertainment and Events
Refer a Friend







 



BUSINESSYou are under Business tab

Open Small BusinessExpand / Collapse

Small Business Home
Small Business Charge & Credit Cards
Order Employee Cards
OPEN Forum



CorporationsExpand / Collapse

Corporate Cards
Supplier Payment Solutions
Corporate Travel Solutions
Meetings and Events
FX International Payments



MerchantsExpand / Collapse

Merchant Home
Find Payment Solutions
Get Support
Get a Merchant Account
Learn About Business Loans




Global NetworkExpand / Collapse

Issuers and Acquirers
Providers and Developers








 










United States(Change Country)


Log In<a id="Logout" title="Logout from the account" href="https://www209.americanexpress.com/merchant/services/en_US/logout?inav=Logout" class="iNavLinkLogout">Log Out</a>







Search US websiteSearchSearch





Frequently Asked QuestionsGet answers instantly.Contact UsAnswers over the phone in minutes.Connect SociallyAsk questions and connect with us and others.Search US websiteSearchSearch


Site FAQ
Contact Us
Change Country

Close Menu



Merchant HomeMerchant Home
Merchant Home
Settings
Manage Locations


Streamline Payments
Find Solutions for Your Business
Manage Cash Flow with Merchant Financing
Route Online Transactions with Payment Gateway
Save on Foreign Currency Payments
Find Payment & Terminal Support
Manage Your Business


Streamline Payments
Save on Foreign Currency Payments


Attract Customers
Find Solutions for Your Business
Order Logos, Decals, Supplies & Decals
Grow Your Business
Take Advantage of Shop Small® Resources


Attract Customers
Order Logos, Supplies & Decals
Take Advantage of Shop Small® Resources


Get Support
Visit the Knowledge Center
Access Tools for New Merchants
See Data Security Best Practices
View Merchant Policy
Reduce & Prevent Fraud
Learn About Accepting Our Pre-paid Products
Update Your Tax Information


Get Support
View Merchant Policy


Get a Merchant Account
Why Accept Credit Cards?
Why Accept American Express® Cards?
Our Merchant Pricing
Apply for a Merchant Account


More













Merchant Financing



					1-855-298-1209



MANAGE LOAN
X Close


CONTINUE APPLICATION
X Close













Welcome back!

                                Access your Merchant Financing account online, view your information 24/7 and keep track of repayment.  
                          



Log In























Forgot  User ID  or  Password?


















Forgot your User ID?
Tell us a bit about your account and we'll contact you by email, or call 1-855-298-1209





 


 




Back












Forgot/Reset Password
Please enter your online account User ID.  We will send you a temporary password to your email address.




























We are unable to recognize your email address or password.  Please try again or call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.


Your Merchant Financing account is locked.  Please call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.


We're sorry - our system is temporarily unavailable, but we're working on it. Please try again shortly.


Back




A new link to create a password has been sent to your email address.
Didn’t you get it?  If not, please check your email junk folder or re-enter your email address.
Still having problems?  Please call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.











 Register your account
Access your American Express®  Merchant Financing account online, view your
                                information 24/7 and keep track of repayments.

Go Back







Verify your account





 





 Next





















Verify your account


 












Create a password


                                            Your password must contain 6-20 characters, including at least one letter, one number, and no special characters.
                                        


























 Submit 























Thank you
Your account has been successfully
                            registered. You'll receive a confirmation email shortly. 


 Close












Welcome back! 
Log in to continue your application or upload your  documents. Please provide the following information. All fields are required.


Forgot/Reset Password 
 Please provide the following information.




































We are unable to recognize your email address or password.  Please try again or call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.


You have two more login attempts remaining before your account is locked for security reasons. Please re-enter your email address and password or call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.


You have one more login attempt remaining before your account is locked for security reasons. Please re-enter your email address and password or call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.


For security purposes, your Merchant Financing account has been locked. Please call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.


Your Merchant Financing account is locked.  Please call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.


We're sorry - our system is temporarily unavailable, but we're working on it. Please try again shortly.


Authentication Successful.. Logging you in.. Please wait....



Forgot Password?












































We are unable to recognize your email address or password.  Please try again or call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.


Your Merchant Financing account is locked.  Please call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.


We're sorry - our system is temporarily unavailable, but we're working on it. Please try again shortly.


Back




A new link to create a password has been sent to your email address.
Didn’t you get it?  If not, please check your email junk folder or re-enter your email address.
Still having problems?  Please call 1-855-298-1209 for assistance.
















Get more cash. Do more business.

				Use the slider to indicate your total annual credit and debit card 
            receivables.

















$50K
$100K
$200K
$300K
$400K
$500K
$1M
$1.5M
$2M
$3M
$4.5M+


$50K
$300K
$500K
$4.5M+














You could be eligible for up to







One-Year Financing fee: 6 - 14%No loan origination fee

				
3 - step online application 
                Automatic Repayment
                


See If You Qualify






Your email addresses do not match.  Please try again.














First Name



Last Name



E-mail Address



Re-enter E-mail Address



Phone



Business Legal Name



Business Zip Code



Tax ID or American Express Merchant Account Number




Total Annual Credit and Debit Card Receivables


Please click here for further eligibility requirements




Submit













Here’s  how other businesses are using it 













Retail














Restaurants














Lodging














Other industries

















See Others Videos


 
View transcript














Here's how it works

Once approved, qualified merchants benefit from a flat fixed fee and early repayment rebates. 
        



Complete your application online in three easy steps.



Receive cash directly into your business bank account.



Repay automatically from your receivables or business bank account.




Watch this short video for more details about how Merchant Financing works.









See Others Videos

 View transcript







Start Your Application







Here are the details

PRODUCT OVERVIEW
ELIGIBILITY & ENROLLMENT
FUNDING
REPAYMENT









                                    Merchant Financing and Your Merchant Fees
                                    




                                Your merchant fees remain as stated in your processor's card service agreement. If you select your repayment option from credit and debit receivables, repayment is made after merchant fees and any amounts due for chargebacks, credits, and other fees are deducted in accordance with the terms of your processor's agreement.
                            






                                    Type of Funding
                                    




                               American Express Merchant Financing products are commercial loans, not purchases or discounts of receivables or cash advances. You must repay the loan in full, together with the loan fee, regardless of your future revenue.
                                Settlement Advance 

Loan Amount:  Based, in part, on all your historical credit and debit card receivables each month; with a loan amount ranging from $10,000 to $1,000,000.
Term: One year agreement, automatically renewed unless either party provides 60 days notice to terminate. There are no early termination fees if you choose to cancel.
Repayment: Automatic, not manual.
Disbursements: Monthly, on the same date each month, which you select, into your business bank account. Monthly loan amount is reevaluated every six months.
Fee: 0.5- 0.67%
Additional Information: Ideal for helping to manage monthly cash flow. To apply for Settlement Advance, please call 1-855-298-1209 today.

 Six Month Financing

Loan Amount: Based, in part, on your historical credit and debit card receivables for the past 12 months and performance to date; with a loan amount ranging from $36,000 to $2,000,000.
Term: Six months
Repayment: Automatic, not manual.
Disbursement: One time disbursement.
Fee: 3-7%
Additional Information: Ideal for upgrading to new equipment or funding large projects. No early termination fee.

 One Year Financing

Loan Amount: Based, in part, on your historical credit and debit card receivables for the past 12 months and performance to date; with a loan amount ranging from $5,000 to $2,000,000.
For loans, $35,000 and below, a personal guaranty may be required.
Term: One year
Repayment: Automatic, not manual.
Disbursement: One time disbursement.
Fee: 6-14%
Additional Information: Ideal for upgrading to new equipment or funding large projects. No early termination fee.

 Two Year Financing

Loan Amount: Based, in part, on your historical credit and debit card receivables for the past 12-24 months and performance to date; with a loan amount ranging from $36,000 to $2,000,000.
Term: Two-Years
Repayment: Automatic, not manual.
Disbursement: One time disbursement.
Fee: 12-28%
Additional Information: Ideal for upgrading to new equipment or funding large projects. No early termination fee.








                                    Additional Terms & Conditions
                                    




                                This website contains a summary of the Merchant Financing products offered by American Express Bank, FSB.  For additional information, please call us at 1-855-298-1209.
                            












                                    Enrollment Options 
                                    




                                You can enroll in only one product at any given time.
                            






                                    Pre-Qualification or Pre-Approvals
                                    




                                Approval of your application is subject to there being no material changes to the financial condition or other creditworthiness of you and/or your business, fraud review and other eligibility requirements.
                            






                                    Documents Necessary for Enrollment
                                    




                                Application documents we require vary depending on the type of loan product and various other criteria. Examples may include business financials (such as tax returns, bank statements, monthly statements from processors) and proof of ownership. Additional documents may be required. For a full list of documents we may require, please contact a Merchant Financing Specialist at 1-855-298-1209.
                            






                                    Product Eligibility
                                    




To qualify for financing, the minimum eligibility requirements for your business are as follows:

Accepts American Express Cards.
Have a minimum of $50,000 in annual business revenue.
Have a minimum of $12,000 in annual credit and debit receivables.
Have been in business for at least 24 months.
In addition, to qualify for Two-Year Financing, your business must have accepted American Express® for the past 24 months.
To learn more or discuss in detail, please call us at 1-855-298-1209.








                                    Ineligible Industries
                                    




Merchants in the following industries are not eligible for Merchant Financing.

 Cruise lines
Airlines, private jets, or chartered airlines
Ticket sales and brokers
Adult entertainment (specifically, online digital content sites)
Pornography
Escort and massage services
Medical marijuana dispensary
Prostitution
Check cashing/guarantee
Financial services equities, unit trusts, mutual funds
Insurance
Bail bonds
Debt collection (exceptions include outside agency collection fees,
                                        licensed insolvency practitioners and bail bondsmen fees)
Investment made on future maturity of goods/services with an intention of gaining return on investment. e.g., stock market, wine future, horse breeding, or timber investment. (excludes travel related services, membership services, e.g., magazine subscriptions, ticket sales to future events, or real estate deposits)
Non-profit organizations
For-profit colleges and trade schools
Unregulated charities
Bureau de change establishments (establishment where foreign money is exchanged)
Detective agencies
Door-to-door sales (exception for payment on delivery directly to the company or to the franchisee)
Gambling (exception for accommodation, restaurant bar, or gift shop facilities within a casino)
Multi-level pyramid selling (exception for payment on delivery directly to the
                                    company or to the franchisee)
Political parties (except in U.S.)
Unlawful sale of prescription drugs or tobacco
Leasing
Mortgage payments
Condo down payments














                                    Next Business Day
                                    





                                    Next business day funding is dependent on a variety of factors, including, your processor/processing arrangements, your repayment method, loan amount and product term. Next business day funding is also only available for applications that are approved between 9am-6pm ET Monday to Friday, with the exception of Federal bank holidays. For more information please call 1-855-298-1209.
                                







                                    Financing Amounts
                                    




                                Financing is driven by forecasted receivables. Available financing amount will vary depending on your repayment method.  You can choose to repay using American Express only receivables or you can potentially increase the loan amount by using all of your credit and debit card receivables to repay. As your total receivables increase, so will your potential financing amount.
                                Settlement Advance

                                        We re-evaluate your loan every 6 months.  The calculation for each 6-month period of disbursement will be based on your historical credit and debit card receivables.
                           		
  Six-Month Financing

                                        Your loan amount is calculated based on your historical credit and debit card receivables for the past 12 months and performance to date.  The minimum amount of funding is $36,000 and the maximum available funding is $2,000,000.
                                
  One-Year Financing

                                        Your loan amount is calculated based on your historical credit and debit card receivables for the past 12 months and performance to date. The minimum amount of funding is $5,000 and the maximum available funding is $2,000,000. For loans $35,000 or less, we may require personal guaranty.
                                
  Two-Year Financing

                                        Your loan amount is calculated based on your historical credit and debit card receivables for the past 24 months and performance to date. The minimum amount of funding is $36,000 and the maximum available funding is $2,000,000.
                                







                                    Receiving Financing Funds
                                    




Receiving Settlement Advance Funds

                                    Loan funding is disbursed as a single payment, each month, into your business bank account on file, on a fixed day of the month.
                                
Receiving Six-Month, One-Year or Two-Year Financing 

                                    Your loan funds will be disbursed as a single payment into the business bank account you provide.
                                







                                    Uses for Funds
                                    





                                    The financing offered through the Merchant Financing program is a commercial loan. Proceeds may only be used for business purposes and will be disbursed only to the business bank account in which you receive settlements for your credit and debit card transactions. The funds loaned to you through Merchant Financing may not be used for personal, family or household purposes, including paying dividends to principals and paying off debts to an American Express Bank, FSB affiliate. In addition, the loan may not be used to purchase real estate or fund construction.
                                













                                    Six-Month, One-Year or Two-Year Financing
                                    




Your American Express Receivables (only for loans greater than $35,000) 
                                

						            A percentage of your American Express receivables will be used to repay your Merchant Financing loan, before settlement in your business bank account on file. You will be offered a 
						            repayment rate  that will correlate to the loan amount you are applying for. The cumulative amount due every month is listed on your payment schedule. The repayment rate will remain constant so long as you remain current on your loan.

                                
Repayment from All of Your Receivables Repaid by Debit ACH (only for Six-Month & One-Year Financing loans up to $150,000).

                                

                                    A fixed amount will be automatically debited each business day from your approved business bank account(s). You will need to grant American Express permission for Debit ACH payments. Fees for insufficient funds may also apply.

                                
Repaid by Transfer Account

                                    To obtain loan repayments from the card receivables that your processor receives, Merchant Financing will open a Transfer Account at Wells Fargo Bank on your behalf. This account will be used as a temporary settlement account. On a daily basis, your processor will submit your receivables into the Transfer Account. American Express takes a portion of your receivables to repay the loan and releases the remaining funds to your business bank account on file. If you are in Puerto Rico or the Virgin Islands, you may be unable to use this repayment method. The repayment rate will remain constant so long as you remain current on your loan.

                                
Repaid by Split Funding (processor dependent)

                                    To obtain loan repayments from the card receivables that your processor receives, Merchant Financing will partner with your processor, who will split daily card receivables so that a fixed percentage will be used to repay the loan and the remaining funds will be released to your business bank account on file. 
									The process is automatic. Funding occurs after verification that the merchant processes with a Split Funding partner.For further information, please call 1-855-298-1209.  



                                







                                    Settlement Advance
                                    




Settlement Advance Based on Your American Express Receivables Only
During the application process, you will be offered a repayment rate that correlates to the amount of loan that you are applying for. This will determine the amount that will be withheld from your American Express daily receivables.  The repayment rate will remain constant as long as you remain current on your loan.
                                
Settlement Advance Based on All Your Credit and Debit Card Receivables

                                    To obtain loan repayments from the card receivables that your processor receives, Merchant Financing will open a Transfer Account at Wells Fargo Bank on your behalf. This account will be used as a temporary settlement account. On a daily basis, your processor will submit your receivables into the Transfer Account. American Express takes a portion of your receivables to repay the loan and releases the remaining funds to your business bank account on file. If you are in Puerto Rico or the Virgin Islands, you may be unable to use this repayment method. The repayment rate will remain constant as long as you remain current on your loan.For further information, please call 1-855-298-1209.
                                







                                    Early Repayment
                                    




Your  business could qualify for a rebate on your flat, fixed fee.  If it applies, it will be deposited into the business bank account on file.  
									

For Six-Month Financing:

You could receive a rebate of 25% if the outstanding balance is paid in full within 90 days of disbursement and 10% if the outstanding balance is paid in full within 135 days of disbursement. 
            						 

For One-Year Financing:

You could receive a rebate of 25% if the outstanding balance is paid in full within 180 days of disbursement and 10% if the outstanding balance is paid in full within 270 days of disbursement. 
            						 

For Two-Year Financing:

You  could receive a rebate of 25% if the outstanding balance is paid in full within 360 days of disbursement and 10% if the outstanding balance is paid in full within 540 days of disbursement.
Early repayment rebate on the loan fee is contingent on there being no event of default on the loan. For more information please call 1-855-298-1209.







                                    No Interest Rate
                                    




Fees
 There is no interest rate associated with the Merchant Financing products. We only charge a flat, fixed fee. Because these are fixed-fee products, you know exactly how much you are paying in financing fees. Loan fee may vary by customer; eligibility for lowest available loan fee is based on a variety of factors, including your processing arrangements, referral source, creditworthiness, and history with American Express. For more information, please call 1-855-298-1209.
                                
If Outstanding Balance Is Not Fully Repaid by End of Month for Settlement Advance
  Each disbursement is due in full by the end of each monthly period. If you foresee that this may not happen, please contact us so that we can adjust your repayment rate accordingly.  Paying less than the full amount owed at the end of the monthly period will affect the amount of the next monthly disbursement. If you repay less than 70% of the funded amount, we may initiate a debit ACH from your business bank account on file for the unpaid amount. You can also pay this amount by check. You will be eligible for the next month's funding if the amount is repaid successfully.

                                
If Outstanding Balance Is Not Fully Repaid by End of Term for Six-Month, One-Year or Two-Year Financing
At the end of the term, the outstanding balance is immediately due and payable in full. If the outstanding balance is not fully repaid at the end of the term, the repayment rate will be increased to 100% until the outstanding balance is repaid. We may also initiate a debit ACH from your business bank account on file for the unpaid amount.For more details, please refer to your Business Loan and Security Agreement.
                                















        <link media="all" type="text/css" href="https://www.aexp-static.com/nav/ngn/css/inav_responsive.css" rel="stylesheet" />
    








About American Express
Investor Relations
Careers
Site Map
Contact Us
Mobile & Tablet Apps
















Products & Services
Credit Cards
Small Business Credit Cards
Corporate Cards
Prepaid Cards
Savings Accounts & CDs
Gift Cards




Links You May Like
Membership Rewards®
Mobile & Tablet Apps
Credit Reports
Serve®
Bluebird®
Accept Amex Cards
Refer a Friend





Terms of Service
Privacy Center New
AdChoices
Card Agreements
Security Center
Financial Education
Servicemember Benefits
 All users of our online services subject to Privacy Statement and agree to be bound by Terms of Service. Please review. © 2017 American Express Company. All rights reserved. 

























 








American Express Receivables Financing Corp Ii 8-k - Form 8 K Special Events Filing - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   >      > AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING CORP II 8-K

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















American Express Receivables Financing Corp Ii 8-k
Form 8 K Special Events Filing



You are currently viewing:
 This  involves AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING CORP II. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING CORP II 8-K Date: 10/12/2010 









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day










     Table of
Contents

 


 



 



SECURITIES
AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

Washington,
D.C. 20549


 


FORM
8-K

CURRENT
REPORT
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE
SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934

Date of
Report (Date of earliest event reported) October 7,
2010




 



 



 



 



 





 



 





AMERICAN
EXPRESS
RECEIVABLES
FINANCING
CORPORATION II



 



AMERICAN
EXPRESS
RECEIVABLES
FINANCING
CORPORATION III LLC



 



AMERICAN
EXPRESS
RECEIVABLES
FINANCING
CORPORATION IV LLC




(as
Originators of the American Express Credit Account Master
Trust)

(Exact
name of registrant as specified in its charter)

on behalf
of 
American Express Credit Account Master Trust 




 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 





 



 





Delaware

(State or Other
Jurisdiction of
Incorporation
or
Organization)



 



333-155765-02

(Commission
File Number)



 



13-3854638

(I.R.S.
Employer
Identification
Number)



 



Delaware

(State or Other
Jurisdiction of
Incorporation or
Organization)



 



333-155765

(Commission File
Number)



 



20-0942395

(I.R.S.
Employer
Identification
Number)



 



Delaware

(State or Other
Jurisdiction of
Incorporation or
Organization)



 



333-155765-01

(Commission
File Number)



 



20-0942445

(I.R.S.
Employer
Identification
Number)





 



 



 



 



 





 



 





200 Vesey
Street, Room 138
Mail Stop 01-31-12
New York, New York 10285
(212) 640-2000



 



4315
South 2700 West, Room 1900
Mail Stop 02-01-50
Salt Lake City, Utah 84184
(801) 945-2550



 



4315
South 2700 West, Room 1900
Mail Stop 02-01-56
Salt Lake City, Utah 84184
(801) 945-2068



























(Address,
Including Zip Code, and Telephone Number,
Including Area Code, of each Registrant’s Principal Executive
Offices) 




 



 



 



 



 





 



 





N/A



 



N/A



 



N/A





(Former
Name or Former Address, if



 



(Former
Name or Former Address, if



 



(Former
Name or Former Address, if





Changed
Since Last Report)



 



Changed
Since Last Report)



 



Changed
Since Last Report)




Check the
appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to
simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant
under any of the following provisions.

 




o



 



Written
communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act
(17 CFR 230.425)





 



 





o



 



Soliciting
material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17
CFR 240.14a-12)





 



 





o



 



Pre-commencement
communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange
Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))





 



 





o



 



Pre-commencement
communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange
Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))





 



 


  

 

 

 

 
TABLE OF
CONTENTS

 

 




 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 



 





Item 8.01





Item 9.01. Exhibits





SIGNATURES





EXHIBIT
INDEX





EX-4.1





EX-4.2





EX-4.3




 

 

 Table of
Contents

 

INFORMATION
TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT




  



 



 





 



 





Item 8.01.



 



On
October 7, 2010, the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as
of May 16, 1996, as amended and restated as of January 1,
2006 and as further amended from time to time, among American
Express Receivables Financing Corporation II, American Express
Receivables Financing Corporation III LLC, American Express
Receivables Financing Corporation IV LLC, American Express Travel
Related Services Company, Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon,
relating to the American Express Credit Account Master Trust, was
amended by the Fourth Amendment to Pooling and Servicing Agreement.
The amendment is attached hereto as Exhibit 4.1.





 



 



 





 



 



On
October 7, 2010, the Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as
of April 16, 2004, between American Express Centurion Bank and
American Express Receivables Financing Corporation III LLC, was
amended by the Third Amendment to Receivables Purchase Agreement.
The amendment is attached hereto as Exhibit 4.2.





 



 



 





 



 



On
October 7, 2010, the Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as
of April 16, 2004, between American Express Bank, FSB and
American Express Receivables Financing Corporation IV LLC, was
amended by the Third Amendment to Receivables Purchase Agreement.
The amendment is attached hereto as Exhibit 4.3.




  Item 9.01.
Exhibits.

The
following are filed as Exhibits to this Report under
Exhibit 4.




 



 



 



 



 





 



 





 



 



Exhibit 4.1



 



Fourth
Amendment to Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as of
October 7, 2010, amending the Pooling and Servicing Agreement,
dated as of May 16, 1996, as amended and restated as of
January 1, 2006 and as further amended from time to time
(incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Registration No. 333-130508).





 



 



 



 



 





 



 



Exhibit 4.2



 



Third
Amendment to Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of
October 7, 2010, amending the Receivables Purchase Agreement,
dated as of April 16, 2004 (incorporated herein by reference
to Exhibit 4.4 to Registration
No. 333-113579).





 



 



 



 



 





 



 



Exhibit 4.3



 



Third
Amendment to Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of
October 7, 2010, amending the Receivables Purchase Agreement,
dated as of April 16, 2004 (incorporated herein by reference
to Exhibit 4.5 to Registration
No. 333-113579).




  

 

 

 Table of
Contents

 
SIGNATURES

     Pursuant
to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, the registrants have duly caused this report to be signed
on their behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly
authorized.




 



 



 



 



 



 



 





 



 





 



 



American
Express Receivables Financing
Corporation II,



 



 





 



 



as
originator of the Trust and Co-Registrant and as Transferor on
behalf of the Trust as Co-Registrant



 



 





 



 



 



 



 



 



 





 



 



   By:

   Name:



 



/s/
Anderson Y. Lee


 


Anderson
Y. Lee



 



 





 



 



   Title:



 



President



 



 





 



 



 



 



 



 



 





 



 



American
Express Receivables Financing
Corporation III LLC,



 



 





 



 



as
originator of the Trust and Co-Registrant and as Transferor on
behalf of the Trust as Co-Registrant



 



 





 



 



 



 



 



 



 





 



 



   By:

   Name:



 



/s/ Kevin
L. Thompson


 


Kevin L.
Thompson



 



 





 



 



   Title:



 



President



 



 





 



 



 



 



 



 



 





 



 



American
Express Receivables Financing
Corporation IV LLC,



 



 





 



 



as
originator of the Trust and Co-Registrant and as Transferor on
behalf of the Trust as Co-Registrant



 



 





 



 



 



 



 



 



 





 



 



   By:

   Name:



 



/s/ Denise
D. Roberts


 


Denise D.
Roberts



 



 





 



 



   Title:



 



President



 



 




  

 

 

 Table of
Contents

 
EXHIBIT
INDEX 




 



 



 





Exhibit



 



Description





 



 



 





Exhibit 4.1



 



Fourth
Amendment to Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as of
October 7, 2010, amending the Pooling and Servicing Agreement,
dated as of May 16, 1996, as amended and restated as of
January 1, 2006 and as further amended from time to time
(incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Registration No. 333-130508).





 



 



 





Exhibit 4.2



 



Third
Amendment to Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of
October 7, 2010, amending the Receivables Purchase Agreement,
dated as of April 16, 2004 (incorporated herein by reference
to Exhibit 4.4 to Registration
No. 333-113579).





 



 



 





Exhibit 4.3



 



Third
Amendment to Receivables Purchase Agreement, dated as of
October 7, 2010, amending the Receivables Purchase Agreement,
dated as of April 16, 2004 (incorporated herein by reference
to Exhibit 4.5 to Registration
No. 333-113579).




  

    

Exhibit 4.1

FOURTH
AMENDMENT TO 
POOLING AND SERVICING AGREEMENT

     This
FOURTH AMENDMENT TO THE POOLING AND SERVICING AGREEMENT, dated as
of October 7, 2010 (this “ Amendment ”), is
among American Express Receivables Financing Corporation II
(“ RFC II ”), American Express Receivables
Financing Corporation III LLC (“ RFC III ”),
American Express Receivables Financing Corporation IV LLC (“
RFC IV ”), American Express Travel Related Services
Company, Inc. (the “ Servicer ”) and The Bank of
New York Mellon (formerly The Bank of New York), as trustee (the
“ Trustee ”). This Amendment amends the Pooling
and Servicing Agreement, dated as of May 16, 1996, as amended
and restated as of January 1, 2006 and as amended as of
December 17, 2007, as of October 24, 2008 and as of
February 24, 2009 (the “ Pooling and Servicing
Agreement ” and, together with this Amendment, the
“ Amended Pooling and Servicing Agreement
”).

RECITALS

     1. Pursuant
to Section 13.01(a) of the Pooling and Servicing Agreement,
each of RFC II, RFC III and RFC IV has delivered to the Trustee an
Officer’s Certificate, dated the date of this Amendment,
stating that RFC II, RFC III and RFC IV, respectively, reasonably
believes that this Amendment will not have an Adverse
Effect.

     2. RFC
II, RFC III, RFC IV and the Servicer have satisfied all conditions
precedent contained in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement to
entering into this Amendment and this Amendment is authorized and
permitted under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. All
capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the
meanings assigned to such terms in the Pooling and Servicing
Agreement.

     3. Now,
therefore, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein
contained, and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt
and adequacy of which are hereby acknowledged, each party hereto
agrees as follows:

AMENDMENTS

     SECTION
1. Amendment to Section 1.01 .

     (a) The
definition of “ Fourth Amendment Effective Date
” shall be added to Section 1.01 of the Pooling and Servicing
Agreement and it shall read as follows:

     “
Fourth Amendment Effective Date ” shall mean
October 7, 2010.

     (b) The
definition of “ Monthly Period ” in
Section 1.01 of the Pooling and Servicing Agreement shall be
deleted in its entirety and inserted in its place shall be the
following:

“
Monthly Period ” shall mean, with respect to each
Distribution Date, unless otherwise provided in a Supplement, the
period (i) from and including the day following the last day
of the twenty-first billing cycle applicable to the
Accounts

  

 

 

  

 

ending
during the second preceding calendar month and (ii) to and
including the last day of the twenty-first billing cycle applicable
to the Accounts ending in the calendar month immediately preceding
the calendar month in which such Distribution Date shall occur;
provided, however, that the initial Monthly Period with
respect to any Series will commence on the Closing Date with
respect to such Series; provided further, however, that in
the event the last day of the twenty-first billing cycle and the
last day of the twenty-second billing cycle are the same day, any
transaction, receipt of collections or other activity occurring on
such day with respect to the Accounts associated with the
twenty-second billing cycle will be deemed to have occurred on the
first day of the following Monthly Period.

     SECTION
2. Miscellaneous . The amendments provided for by this
Amendment shall become effective as of the Fourth Amendment
Effective Date upon receipt by the Trustee of the
following:

     (a) Notification
in writing from each of Moody’s and Standard &
Poor’s to the effect that this Amendment will not result in a
reduction or withdrawal of the rating of any outstanding Series or
Class to which it is a Rating Agency.

     (b) An
Officer’s Certificate of each Transferor to the effect that
such Transferor reasonably believes that this Amendment will not
have an Adverse Effect.

     (c) An
Opinion of Counsel delivered pursuant to subsection 13.02(d)(i) of
the Pooling and Servicing Agreement.

     (d) Counterparts
of this Amendment, duly executed by the parties hereto.

     SECTION
3. Pooling and Servicing Agreement in Full Force and Effect as
Amended . The Pooling and Servicing Agreement is hereby amended
by providing that all references therein to the “Pooling and
Servicing Agreement,” “this Agreement,”
“hereby,” “hereof” and
“herei


 








 
















AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING CORP II - Securities Registration Statement (simplified form) (S-3) Centurion's Revolving Credit Businesses





















About EDGAR Online

|
Login












Dashboard
TodayCompany
Industry
Search
Screener
Analytics

  










 















Enter your Email for a Free Trial:








The following is an excerpt from a S-3 SEC Filing, filed by AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING CORP II on 1/3/2002.





 Next Section












 Previous Section





-- Use Sections To Navigate Through The Document --
FORM S-3
CALCULATION OF REGISTRATION FEE
SUBJECT TO COMPLETION, DATED _____, 2002
Transaction Summary
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Underwriting
Risk Factors
Use of Proceeds
Centurion's Revolving Credit Businesses
Description of the Certificates
Indemnification
Federal Income Tax Consequences--General
Plan of Distribution
Legal Matters
Where You Can Find More Information
PART II
Item 14. Other Expenses of Issuance and Distribution.
Item 15. Indemnification of Directors and Officers.
Item 16. Exhibits.
Item 17. Undertakings.
SIGNATURES
EXHIBIT INDEX
EXHIBIT 8.1












AMERICAN EXPRESS RECEIVABLES FINANCING CORP II - S-3 - 20020103 - BUSINESS





Centurion's Revolving Credit Businesses




General



Pursuant to the RFC II purchase agreement, Credco transferred to RFC II, and
pursuant to the pooling and servicing agreement, RFC II and Centurion
transferred to the trust, certain receivables generated from transactions made
by persons who are holders of consumer American Express revolving credit card
accounts, whether branded "Optima" Card accounts or otherwise, Optima Line of
Credit accounts and Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option revolving credit
accounts or features. Cards issued by Centurion are currently accepted
worldwide, and may be used for the purchase of merchandise and services. The
Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option is currently available only to holders
of American Express Card, American Express Gold Card, Platinum Card and
Centurion Card accounts, excluding corporate card accounts, but, in the
future, may be available to corporate card account holders. The consumer
American Express credit card accounts, Optima Line of Credit accounts and the
Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option accounts are owned by Centurion and are
primarily serviced either by Centurion at its headquarters and its application
processing branch or by TRS at its operations centers.


Subject to certain conditions, the transferors may convey to the trust
receivables arising in charge or credit accounts or other charge or credit
products that may be of a type not currently included as accounts. Such
accounts and products may be originated, underwritten, used or collected in a
different manner than the accounts described below and may differ with respect


21





to loss and delinquency experience, revenue experience and historical payment
rates. Such accounts and products may also have different terms than the
accounts described below and may be subject to different servicing, charge-off
and collection practices. Consequently, the addition to the trust of
receivables arising in such accounts or from such products could have the
effect of reducing the Portfolio Yield.


American Express Credit Card Accounts. The American Express credit card
accounts are accessed primarily by use of the credit cards and may be used to
purchase merchandise and services from participating service establishments or
to obtain cash advances through check access, by using a convenience check
available to transfer balances from other accounts or make other payments, or
from automated teller machines. The American Express credit card account was
first offered in early 1987 and branded as the "Optima Card." All American
Express credit card accounts are originated by Centurion and are generated by
direct mail solicitations and telemarketing to prospects. Offers are made to
existing cardmembers having a credit history with a charge card account and to
non-cardmembers. In addition, Centurion offers American Express credit card
accounts that are originated under affinity or co-branded programs between
Centurion and certain unaffiliated entities. Centurion also distributes
unsolicited or "Take-One" applications and runs print advertisements and radio
and television advertisements for American Express credit card accounts and
has a toll free telephone number for requests for information and
applications. Receivables are also generated by soliciting the transfer of
account balances from competitors' accounts.


Optima Line of Credit Accounts. The Optima Line of Credit account is an
unsecured revolving line of credit that is offered as an additional benefit in
association with certain approved cardmembers' charge card accounts. The
Optima Line of Credit accounts may be accessed by writing a check supplied to
cardmembers by Centurion, by using a loan activator check available only to
make payments on outstanding balances on the customer's charge card account,
or to obtain cash from automatic teller machines. The predecessor to the
Optima Line of Credit account was established in 1985. The Optima Line of
Credit accounts owned by Centurion were principally generated through (i)
applications mailed directly to existing cardmembers, (ii) direct mail
solicitations to existing or prospective cardmembers for accounts on a pre-
approved credit basis and (iii) with respect to certain Optima Line of Credit
accounts, purchases of accounts from other financial institutions providing
lines of credit to cardmembers.


Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option Accounts. The Sign & Travel/Extended
Payment Option accounts are features currently associated with consumer charge
card accounts although corporate charge card account holders may be offered
this feature in the future. Prior to 1994, all cardmembers had access to Sign
& Travel accounts. Since 1994, only qualified cardmembers who have been charge
card account holders in good standing, usually for at least one year, have
been invited to obtain a Sign & Travel account. A cardmember may use the Sign
& Travel account for certain travel-related purchases and may access the Sign
& Travel account by indicating to the travel product merchant or to TRS the
preference to have such travel items billed to the Sign & Travel account.
Certain nontravel-related charges may be allowed in the future. In addition,
selected cardmembers are invited to enroll in the Sign & Travel Express
service that automatically bills eligible travel purchases to the cardmember's
Sign & Travel Account. Selected cardmembers may also use this feature to repay
over time certain other designated charges. Currently this capability is
offered only with respect to


22





merchandise purchases on the charge card account above a designated amount,
usually $200. This feature is referred to as the "Extended Payment Option."
The predecessor to the Sign & Travel account was established in 1965 as a
closed-end credit account and was changed to an open-end credit account in
1983. All Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option accounts are owned by
Centurion.


Over a period of time, beginning in the later half of 1998, some Sign &
Travel/Extended Payment Option accounts became a feature of a multi-functional
product offered by Centurion. Such product consists of a pay-in-full feature
for purchasing merchandise and one or more interest-bearing revolving credit
features including the Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option. It is
anticipated that, in addition to the receivables generated by the Sign &
Travel/Extended Payment Option accounts, the receivables generated by such
other revolving credit features may, in the future, be conveyed to the trust.
This conversion may continue in the future.



Underwriting and Authorization Procedures



American Express Credit Card Accounts. Centurion uses two types of approval
processes in determining whether to open an American Express credit card
account: the "pre-approved process" and the "full application process." The
pre-approved process involves determining in advance that a person will
qualify for an American Express credit card account. Centurion determines the
minimum credit criteria required for a consumer to receive an offer. These
criteria were developed from proprietary risk models and commercially
available risk evaluation scores. Credit bureaus provide Centurion with the
credit attributes, scores, and encrypted names and addresses of persons
passing the minimum criteria. Centurion then screens out persons with prior
Centurion delinquencies and incidents of fraud, and uses its proprietary risk
and response modeling to finalize the solicitation pool. Centurion may also
determine the eligibility of such persons to receive an offer based on such
person's activities (e.g., membership in a rewards program, holding credit
cards, magazine or newspaper subscriptions, and college enrollment).


The full application process is used for evaluation of unsolicited
applications. The primary sources of these applications are the "inbound"
telemarketing program that features a toll-free telephone number and, on a
limited basis, the American Express "Take One" boxes located in a variety of
public establishments. The full application process entails receiving a
completed application, evaluating the application using proprietary scoring
models and credit bureau information, screening out prior Centurion
delinquencies and incidents of fraud, and verifying that the information on
the application is both accurate and provided by the true applicant.


In addition to the credit review performed in connection with origination of
accounts, Centurion has established credit authorization procedures applicable
to American Express credit card account utilizations. Utilizations of such
American Express credit card accounts are subject to authorization at the time
of such utilization based upon the cardmember's past spending and payment
activity and personal resources. Certain utilizations, such as purchases
indicating out-of-pattern spending, initial utilizations on new accounts and
charges to non-current accounts, are subject to closer credit scrutiny. The
credit limits for American Express credit card accounts generally range from
$500 to $15,000, although the credit limits applicable to certain American
Express credit card accounts may be as high as $100,000.


23





Optima Line of Credit Accounts. Optima Line of Credit accounts are no
longer actively solicited. They had been underwritten pursuant to procedures
similar to those for American Express credit card accounts. Authorization
based on cardmembers' past spending and payment behavior and personal
resources occurs at the time of utilization.


Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option Accounts. Centurion extends the right
to access a Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option account to qualified
cardmembers after they have been charge card account holders in good standing
for one year. There is no preset spending limit on these accounts. However,
utilizations of the Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option account are subject
to approval through a credit authorization process similar to credit
authorization procedures applicable to the American Express credit card
account.



Billing and Payments



The accounts owned by Centurion have various billing and payment structures,
including various annual fees and monthly finance charges. Each account holder
is subject to an agreement governing the terms and conditions of the American
Express credit card account, the Optima Line of Credit account and the Sign &
Travel/Extended Payment Option, as applicable. Pursuant to each such
agreement, Centurion reserves the right to change or terminate any terms,
conditions, services or features of the account (including increasing or
decreasing monthly finance charges, fees or minimum payments or changing the
order in which payments made by account holders will be applied to satisfy
amounts owing by account holders). Such changes are subject to the
requirements of applicable laws and to certain limitations in the Pooling and
Servicing Agreement described herein. Any announced increase in the formula
used to calculate the annual percentage rate, or APR, or other change making
the terms of an account more stringent, generally becomes effective on a
designated future date.


American Express Credit Card Accounts. Generally, an American Express
credit card account holder is charged (i) an annual fee for the Optima Card of
$0.00 to $135.00, (ii) finance charges on merchandise and services purchased
and on cash advances based on variable APRs equal to the prime rate as
published in The Wall Street Journal plus a spread ranging from 2.00% to
12.99%, depending on the cardmember's tenure, spending and payment patterns
and type of product (and a fixed default rate of 23.99%) (some products have
fixed standard APRs currently ranging from 9.99% - 15.99%), (iii) amounts
payable for certain uses of the American Express credit card, including the
standard network fee of 3% on cash advances obtained through an automated
teller machine, with a $3.00 minimum charge, and a 1% fee for obtaining
American Express Travelers Cheques, and (iv) if applicable, insufficient funds
fees, late fees, overlimit fees and other fees. American Express credit card
accounts are billed by Centurion on a cycle basis. Generally, American Express
credit card account holders must make a minimum payment equal to the greater
of (a) $15 or, if the balance is less than $15, such balance, or (b) 1/50th of
the new balance, plus any amount which is past due. Payments on the American
Express credit card accounts are currently generally applied, in order of
application, to balances in respect of finance charges and fees, cash
advances, and merchandise and services.


Optima Line of Credit Accounts. Billing and payment for Optima Line of
Credit accounts are the same as for credit card accounts.


24





Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option Accounts. There are no annual fee or
other fees imposed for the use of the Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option
accounts except for a monthly finance charge, based on an APR, on the
outstanding balance on the Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option accounts. The
APR for the Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option account balances is a
variable rate equal to the prime rate plus 9.9%. Sign & Travel/Extended
Payment Option accounts not in good standing are assessed interest at a fixed
APR of 23.99%. The Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option accounts are billed
by Centurion on a cycle basis at the same time as the obligor's charge card
account. Generally, Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option account holders must
make a monthly minimum payment equal to the greater of (a) $20.00 or, if the
balance is less than $20.00, such balance, or (b) 1/50th of the new balance,
plus any amount which is past due. Currently, payments made on the charge card
or Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option accounts are generally applied first,
to past due Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option account balances, second, to
past due charge card account balances, third, to current Sign & Travel/
Extended Payment Option account minimum payments, fourth, to current charge
card account balances, and finally, to outstanding Sign & Travel/Extended
Payment Option account balances. Each minimum monthly payment is applied first
to finance charges and then to the appropriate principal balance designated in
the preceding sentence. After the incorporation of a Sign & Travel/Extended
Payment Option Accounts into the multifunctional product referred to under "--
General--Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option  Accounts" above, it is
expected that payments made on such product shall be applied first to the pay-
in-full feature, and then to the revolving features. It is expected that the
lower rate-bearing features will be paid off prior to the higher rate-bearing
features.



Collection Efforts



Efforts to collect delinquent American Express credit card accounts, Optima
Line of Credit accounts and Sign & Travel/Extended Payment Option accounts are
made by Centurion and collection agencies and attorneys retained by Centurion.
Under current practice, Centurion includes a request for payment of overdue
amounts on all billing statements upon delinquency. Centurion uses its
proprietary risk evaluation systems to determine the appropriate collection
strategy. Account holders whom Centurion considers a high risk may be
contacted by either a letter or a telephone call when the account becomes
delinquent or sooner based on a number of factors, including the account
holder's tenure and the amount owed in relation to prior spending and payment
behavior. An account is generally considered to be delinquent if the minimum
payment specified in the account holder's most recent billing statement is not
received by the next statement cycle date. If Centurion determines that the
account holder is unable to pay the outstanding balance, the account is "pre-
empted"--i.e., the card is cancelled, credit privileges are revoked, and more
intensive collection action is initiated. For all other account holders,
credit privileges are generally cancelled no later than 90 days from initial
billing. For both the preempted accounts and those reaching the 90-day status,
attorney demand letters may also be sent. If an account remains delinquent, it
may be sent to collection agencies who continue with telephone calls, letters
and telegrams. Legal action may be instituted. Centurion may enter into
arrangements with account holders to extend or otherwise change payment
schedules to maximize collections. In the future, Centurion may sell its
rights to certain collections to collection agencies.


25





Generally, it is Centurion's practice to cause the receivables in an account
to be charged off no later than the date on which such account becomes six
contractual payments past due (i.e., approximately 180 days from initial
billing), although charge-offs may be made earlier in some circumstances, such
as confirmed bankruptcies. The credit evaluation, servicing, charge-off and
collection practices of Centurion may change over time in accordance with its
business judgment and applicable law.



RFC II, Credco, Centurion and TRS




RFC II



RFC II, a transferor, was incorporated under the laws of the State of
Delaware on August 7, 1995. All of its outstanding common stock is owned by
TRS. TRS is a wholly owned subsidiary of American Express Company, a publicly-
held corporation engaged principally, through its subsidiaries, in providing
travel related services, investors diversified financial services and
international banking services throughout the world. RFC II was organized for
the limited purpose of issuing securities of the type offered hereby,
purchasing, holding, owning and selling receivables and any activities
incidental to and necessary or convenient for the accomplishment of such
purposes. Neither TRS, as stockholder of RFC II, nor RFC II's board of
directors, intends to change the business purpose of RFC II. RFC II's
executive offices are located at 40 Wall Street, Mail Stop 10-19-06, New York,
New York 10005.



Credco



American Express Credit Corporation, or Credco, is a wholly owned subsidiary
of TRS primarily engaged in the business of purchasing charge card account
receivables generated by TRS and certain revolving credit account receivables
generated by Centurion. Its principal office is located at One Christina
Center, 301 N. Walnut Street, Wilmington, Delaware 19801.



Centurion



Centurion, a transferor, was incorporated under Utah laws as an industrial
loan company in 1987 and received FDIC insurance in 1989. Its principal office
is located at 6985 Union Park Center, Midvale, Utah 84047. Centurion is a
wholly owned subsidiary of TRS.


Centurion is the surviving company of a 1996 merger with an affiliated bank
which was also named American Express Centurion Bank. Prior to the merger, the
affiliated bank was one of the transferors. In connection with the merger,
Centurion assumed all of the rights and obligations of the affiliated bank as
a transferor under the pooling and servicing agreement and with respect to the
accounts owned by it.



TRS



TRS, a company incorporated under the laws of the State of New York on May
3, 1982, is a wholly owned subsidiary of American Express Company and the
parent company of Centurion, RFC II and Credco. TRS, directly or through its
subsidiaries, provides a variety of products and services, including the
Charge Card Accounts, consumer loans, American Express(R) Travelers Cheques,
corporate and consumer travel products and services, magazine publishing,
database marketing and management and insurance. TRS' principal office is
located at 40 Wall Street, Mail Stop 10-19-06, New York, New York 10005.


26






Merger or Consolidation of a Transferor or the Servicer



The pooling and servicing agreement provides that a transferor may not
consolidate with or merge into, or sell all or substantially all of its assets
as an entirety to, any other entity unless:


(i)     the surviving entity is organized under the laws of the United
States of America, any state thereof or the District of Columbia;


(ii)    the surviving entity, the transferors and the trustee shall have
entered into a supplement to the pooling and servicing agreement
providing for the entity's assumption of the applicable
transferor's obligations under the pooling and servicing
agreement;


(iii)   the applicable transferor shall have delivered to the trustee


(a)  an officer's certificate and an opinion of counsel
regarding the enforceability of such assumption agreement
against the surviving entity; and


(b)  a Tax Opinion;


(iv)    all filings required to perfect the trustee's interest in the
receivables to be conveyed by the surviving entity shall have been
duly made and copies thereof shall have been delivered to the
trustee;


(v)     the trustee shall have received an opinion of counsel with respect
to clause (iv) above and certain other matters specified in the
pooling and servicing agreement; and


(vi)    if the surviving entity is not subject to Title 11 of the United
States Code, the applicable transferor shall have delivered notice
to each Rating Agency of the transfer and assumption of such
transferor's obligations by the surviving entity. If the surviving
entity is not subject to Title 11 of the United States Code, the
applicable transferor shall have delivered the notice described
above and the transferors shall have received notice that the
Rating Agency Condition has been satisfied.


Under the pooling and servicing agreement, the servicer may not consolidate
with or merge into, or sell all or substantially all of its assets as an
entirety to, any other entity unless, among other things:


(i)     the surviving entity is an eligible servicer under the pooling and
servicing agreement;


(ii)    the surviving entity is a corporation organized and existing under
the laws of the United States of America, any state thereof or the
District of Columbia; and


(iii)   in a supplement to the pooling and servicing agreement, the
surviving entity expressly assumes the servicer's obligations
under such agreement.


27






Assumption of a Transferor's Obligations



The pooling and servicing agreement permits a transfer of all or a portion
of a transferor's credit or charge accounts and the receivables arising
thereunder. This transfer may include all (but not less than all) of the
accounts and such transferor's remaining interest in the receivables arising
thereunder, its interest in participations in receivables and its interest in
the trust, together with all servicing functions and other obligations under
the pooling and servicing agreement or relating to the transactions
contemplated thereby, to another entity that may or may not be affiliated with
that transferor. Pursuant to the pooling and servicing agreement, each
transferor is permitted to assign, convey, and transfer these assets and
obligations to such other entity, without the consent or approval or any
certificateholders, if the following conditions, among others, are satisfied:


(i)     the assuming entity is organized under the laws of the United
States of America, any state thereof or the District of Columbia;


(ii)    the assuming entity, the transferors and the trustee shall have
entered into a supplement to the pooling and servicing agreement
providing for the entity's assumption of the applicable
transferor's obligations under the pooling and servicing
agreement;


(iii)   the applicable transferor shall have delivered to the trustee


(a)  an officer's certificate and an opinion of counsel
regarding the enforceability of such assumption agreement
against the assuming entity; and


(b)  a Tax Opinion;


(iv)    all filings required to perfect the trustee's interest in the
receivables to be conveyed by the assuming entity shall have been
duly made and copies thereof shall have been delivered to the
trustee;


(v)     the trustee shall have received an opinion of counsel with respect
to clause (iv) above and certain other matters specified in the
pooling and servicing agreement; and


(vi)    if the assuming entity is not subject to Title 11 of the United
States Code, the applicable transferor shall have delivered notice
to each Rating Agency of the transfer and assumption of such
transferor's obligations by the surviving entity. If the assuming
entity is not subject to Title 11 of the United States Code, the
applicable transferor shall have delivered the notice described
above and the transferors shall have received notice that the
Rating Agency Condition has been satisfied.


The pooling and servicing agreement provides that the transferors, the
surviving entity and the trustee may enter into amendments to that agreement
to permit the transfer and assumption described above without the consent of
any certificateholders. After any permitted transfer and assumption, the
assuming entity will be considered to be a "transferor" for all purposes
hereof, and the applicable transferor will have no further liability or
obligation under the pooling and servicing agreement.


28






The Accounts



The receivables have arisen or will arise in certain revolving credit
accounts that have been selected from the Total Portfolio, in each case, on
the basis of criteria set forth in the pooling and servicing agreement. An
account in the Total Portfolio must be an Eligible Account to be selected for
inclusion in the portfolio of accounts, the receivables of which will be owned
by the trust. The accounts include and may include all related accounts that
satisfy certain conditions set forth in the pooling and servicing agreement or
are originated as a result of (a) a credit or charge card being lost or stolen
or (b) the conversion of an account into another type of Eligible Account.


Accounts which relate to bankrupt obligors or certain charged-off
receivables may be designated as accounts provided that the amount of
principal receivables in any such account is deemed to be zero for purposes of
all allocations under the pooling and servicing agreement.


Pursuant to the pooling and servicing agreement, in certain circumstances,
the transferors will be obligated (subject to certain limitations and
conditions) to designate, from time to time, eligible accounts to be included
as accounts and, pursuant to the RFC II purchase agreement, to the extent that
Credco owns any receivables arising in such accounts, Credco will be required
to convey to RFC II for ultimate conveyance to the trust the receivables of
such accounts. Such accounts must meet the eligibility criteria set forth in
the pooling and servicing agreement as of the date on which the transferors
designate such accounts to be Additional Accounts. Under the pooling and
servicing agreement, each transferor also has the right to convey
participation interests to the trust subject to the conditions described in
the pooling and servicing agreement. See "The Pooling and Servicing Agreement
Generally--Additions of Accounts or Participation Interests" in this
prospectus for a more detailed discussion of the circumstances and manner in
which the receivables arising in Additional Accounts or participation
interests will be conveyed to the trust.


As of each date with respect to which Additional Accounts are designated, to
the extent that Credco transfers to RFC II receivables arising in such
accounts, Credco will represent and warrant to RFC II that the receivables
generated under the Additional Accounts meet the eligibility requirements set
forth in the RFC II purchase agreement and, to the extent that any transferor
transfers any such receivables or participation interests, such transferor
will represent and warrant to the trust that such receivables or participation
interests, if any, meet the eligibility requirements set forth in the pooling
and servicing agreement. See "The Pooling and Servicing Agreement Generally--
Conveyance of Receivables" in this prospectus. Because the initial accounts
were designated as of the initial selection date and subsequent Aggregate
Addition Accounts may be designated from time to time, there can be no
assurance that all of such accounts will continue to meet the eligibility
requirements as of any series closing date.


Subject to certain limitations and restrictions, the transferors may also
designate certain accounts or participation interests, if any, for removal
from the trust, in which case such participation interests or the receivables
of the removed accounts will be reassigned to the transferors and Credco may,
but shall not be required to, repurchase receivables in the removed accounts.
Throughout the term of the trust, the receivables in the trust will consist of
receivables generated under the accounts, participation interests, if any, and
the receivables generated under Additional Accounts, but will not include the
receivables generated under removed accounts or removed participation
interests.


29





In the future, Centurion or any other transferor may determine to transfer
to the trust all or a portion of any merchant discount or other fees or
charges relating to transactions in the accounts, some of which may be similar
to interchange fees that are assessed in transactions on bank card networks.
Pursuant to the pooling and servicing agreement, such fees would be treated as
finance charge receivables.








BROKERAGE PARTNERS


































© 1995-2017
EDGAR Online, Inc.
All rights reserved  NASDAQ:
EDGR 
Solutions for Corporations  
Terms of Use  
Privacy Statement













Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















Business Invoice Factoring -










































Factor Your Accounts Receivable in 24 Hours. Don't let outstanding receivables slow your business’s growth. Factor your receivables with BlueVine and get cash now. 





Desired Credit Line






Desired Financing Type



















Get started










How it works
Pricing






Trustpilot















Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software












How Invoice Factoring Works with BlueVine









































Toggle navigation






Apply NowSign In(888) 216-9619
Line of Credit
Invoice Factoring
Why BlueVine
About Us

Overview
Team
In The News


(888) 216-9619Sign In







How It Works	






see how blueVine works
Click to watch our short video tour



Fast Funding. Hassle Free.

Open a free account in under two minutes
Applying is free, and takes minutes. The application is completely
online and paperless. There are no long-term contracts or termination fees.
Fund one or more invoices with a click of a button
You decide which invoices from what customers to submit, and only pay for what you use,
so you have complete control over your funding needs.
Get a response within 24 hours for your first advance
Once approved your credit line will be set, and you can use it as needed.
Subsequent funding requests can be approved in as fast as an hour.
Update your customer with your BlueVine Account
You are assigned a PO Box, where you can accept checks, and a bank account where
you can accept electronic payments, both in your business name.
Receive the funds directly to your bank account
Choose ACH as your payment option for 1-2 day delivery or choose wire for same
day availability. Use the funds to run, manage & grow your business!
 



Free Up Your Cash Today
Apply Now


BlueVine works with the most popular accounting software






Don’t use accounting software, yet? Not a problem! Questions? Call us at (888) 216-9619 or view our FAQ



 








Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software










Clear, Transparent, Pricing.







































Toggle navigation






Apply NowSign In(888) 216-9619
Line of Credit
Invoice Factoring
Why BlueVine
About Us

Overview
Team
In The News


(888) 216-9619Sign In







Pricing	




Full Flexibility. No Strings.
 No origination fees No termination fees No monthly minimums No long-term contracts No daily/weekly payments No pre-payment penalties




Simple and Transparent Pricing
We give you 85% of the invoice amount upfront and the rest, minus our fees, when your client pays. Our standard rate is 1% per week with a minimum of 3 weeks. There are no hidden fees, no surprises and absolutely no nickel and diming. 









Invoice Amount	

$3000





Invoice Due Within	

3 Weeks 










$2550

Advance Payment? 


$360

+ Rebate? 


$2910

Total Payment	

$90
Fees










Reduced Rates
You may qualify for a 20-30% discount on the standard rate as you build history with us. 
Invoicing over $30,000 per month? Contact us and get a customized quote immediately.
Apply Now




 









Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software










BlueVine FlexCredit - Business Line of Credit









































Toggle navigation






Apply NowSign In(888) 216-9619
Line of Credit
Invoice Factoring
Why BlueVine
About Us

Overview
Team
In The News


(888) 216-9619Sign In







Line of Credit








A fast and flexible business line of credit

Get the security of a true revolving line of credit.  Draw whenever you want, pay only for what you use.


Sign up for free 





Already have an account? Login







Fast cash, always there for you.

Get approved in 24 hours


Draw funds whenever you need


Available credit replenishes as you repay








Draw funds with a click of a button

Access your online dashboard from any computer or mobile device. Draw funds anytime in minutes. Repay in fixed weekly installments over 6 months. 









Our clients give us 5 stars
 Trustpilot 





Transparent fees. Interest as low as 6.9%
Transparent fees.Interest as low as 6.9%
No maintenance fees
No unused credit fees
No prepayment penalties


Sample pricing for $10,000 draw repaid after...




4 weeks
6 months


Total repayment
$10,227
$10,830








Draw from your credit line today


Sign up for free 
Want to speak with a financing advisor?




 








Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software










Contact Us







































Toggle navigation






Apply NowSign In(888) 216-9619
Line of Credit
Invoice Factoring
Why BlueVine
About Us

Overview
Team
In The News


(888) 216-9619Sign In






Contact Us	







 

Call us
(888) 216-9619
Office Hours
Monday through Friday
7am to 4:30pm Pacific Time
 




 









Questions? Feedback? powered by Olark live chat software








Business Factors & Finance






























 
























Close















Call Us Anytime: 800-672-3844


Se habla español









Reliable cash flow starts here. 


Say goodbye to the hassle of NET 30/60/90 and get paid faster.  Give your cash flow the boost it needs with secure and reliable invoice factoring from California Factors.  Start with a no-risk, no-obligation invoice factoring assessment.


California Factoring Experts


Watch "How It Works" Video


*We NEVER sell your information





Free Factoring Assessment











First Name





Last Name





Business Email





Business Phone





Outstanding Invoices: 

Under $10k



$10k - $25k



$25k - $100k



Over $100k
















GET STARTED



































Cash In 24-48 Hours Upon Approval









Ratings & Reviews


We've been helping fund businesses for decades. Check out what our customers are saying:




Trustpilot











Since 1999, California Factors (a division of Business Factors & Finance) has been the premier commercial financing services provider for California businesses, offering both traditional and alternative financial solutions to businesses of a range of sizes and industries. Supported by more than 40 years of industry expertise, Business Factors & Finance provides financial services for business valued at $900 million per year. As a result of its robust credit line, businesses large and small can rely on the strength of California Factors when they need to secure cash to support their growing enterprise. 


Trusted Since 1999












Submit Invoices


Get paid immediately on new invoices & use that cash flow to grow.


Receive Immediate Cash





Grow


Send your invoices directly to us.


Receive up to 96% of the invoice value wired directly to your bank account.


2





3


1


How It Works









Companies We've Factored








































Copyright 2017 California Factors |  10430-1 Pioneer Blvd Santa Fe Springs, CA 90670 


Privacy Policy | About Us | Contact Us




















Business Factors & Finance






























 
























Close















Call Us Anytime: 800-672-3844


Se habla español









Reliable cash flow starts here. 


Say goodbye to the hassle of NET 30/60/90 and get paid faster.  Give your cash flow the boost it needs with secure and reliable invoice factoring from California Factors.  Start with a no-risk, no-obligation invoice factoring assessment.


California Factoring Experts


Watch "How It Works" Video


*We NEVER sell your information





Free Factoring Assessment











First Name





Last Name





Business Email





Business Phone





Outstanding Invoices: 

Under $10k



$10k - $25k



$25k - $100k



Over $100k
















GET STARTED



































Cash In 24-48 Hours Upon Approval









Ratings & Reviews


We've been helping fund businesses for decades. Check out what our customers are saying:




Trustpilot











Since 1999, California Factors (a division of Business Factors & Finance) has been the premier commercial financing services provider for California businesses, offering both traditional and alternative financial solutions to businesses of a range of sizes and industries. Supported by more than 40 years of industry expertise, Business Factors & Finance provides financial services for business valued at $900 million per year. As a result of its robust credit line, businesses large and small can rely on the strength of California Factors when they need to secure cash to support their growing enterprise. 


Trusted Since 1999












Submit Invoices


Get paid immediately on new invoices & use that cash flow to grow.


Receive Immediate Cash





Grow


Send your invoices directly to us.


Receive up to 96% of the invoice value wired directly to your bank account.


2





3


1


How It Works









Companies We've Factored








































Copyright 2017 California Factors |  10430-1 Pioneer Blvd Santa Fe Springs, CA 90670 


Privacy Policy | About Us | Contact Us















